Summary
"Spacious and modern six bedroom HMO with current occupants in situ, paying a combined gross rent of £20,136.27."
"This significant site has been owned by the Denis Ferranti Group, a privately owned engineering business specialising in the manufacture of mechanical, electromechanical, and electronic products since 1951. Changes in design and technology have left large parts of this site redundant and as the c..."
"*Property Ref - IW0179* ** WATCH OUR VIDEO TOUR ON REQUEST ** ***More Pictures to Follow*** ****READY SUMMER 2023 - Buy Now and Pick Your Spec subject to neg****   An outstanding, contemporary, architectural masterpiece set in secure private..."
A rare opportunity to acquire this beautiful self-built detached five bedroom contemporary property located within a private elevated position commanding views towards the Snowdonia Mountain Range. Located just the off sought after Penrhos Road and within walking distance from the best...
"Enjoying a highly sought after location, in the leafy suburbs of Bangor, this family home has all the space you will ever need. With extra large rooms and an extensive garden this is a rare opportunity you can’t afford to miss."
"A fantastic detached Georgian coastal property - steeped in history and with breathtaking views. Cliff Cottage sits proudly above the shoreline with incredible views over the Menai Strait towards Anglesey, the Victorian Bangor Pier and the Great Orme. A truly unique coastal property. Wraparoun..."
"Renovated to a pleasingly high standard, this is a rare opportunity to acquire a substantial 3 Bedroomed Detached Residence situated within Llandygai’s Model Village, built in the 1840s in a vernacular revival style with ample gardens that are sure to delight – viewing essential!"
"A delightful stone built four double bedroomed detached house of character standing in private and beautifully landscaped gardens in a rural position some two miles from the city centre. It also benefits from a double garage, detached garden/hobbies room and a detached one bedroomed annexe, "
"Occupying a highly convenient yet private position in a select development of 3 similar properties, this detached family house offers distant views over fields to the Snowdonia mountains. Having undergone a recent renovation program to provide a modern convenience which is ready to move into this..."
"A most spacious detached 5 bedroom house together with a 2 bedroom annexe, equally suited as a family home or as a Bed and Breakfast business, situated on the outskirts of the city and within easy reach of the road network. The main residence briefly comprises entrance hall, lounge, sitting room..."
"Located on the outskirts of the city centre is this extensive family home which has previously been run as a Bed and Breakfast and is currently run as a commercial residential rental business. Offering plenty of adaptable space to the ground and first floor, there is also a self-contained annexe ..."
"A beautifully modernised & immaculately presented 3 bedroomed stone built detached farmhouse situated in a delightful rural setting on the outskirts of the city occupying a large plot with neat landscaped gardens, a range of outbuildings, ample private parking and with countryside views."
"A spacious and beautifully presented four/five bedroomed detached house situated in this select and much sought after cul de sac position which is conveniently placed within five minutes walk of three schools and within five minutes drive of Ysbyty Gwynedd, The University and the City Centre "
"A 4/5 bedroom detached house standing in a small cul de sac of 4 houses on the highly sought after Redrow development, conveniently located for the Hospital, Primary and Secondary Schools, University and the road network. The property has stunning views to the mountains from the front elevation ..."
"An exceptional example of a 4 bedroom detached executive house on a sought after residential estate in the Penrhosgarnedd area of Bangor.
Stylish contemporary living is enhanced by the recently build conservatory and additional Da Vinci Karndean flooring and bespoke light fittings added by the o..."
"Extended eight bedroom HMO, with a proven track record of generating > £44,000 income per annum and with current occupants in situ, paying £4,000 gross rent PCM. £47,892 Gross rent secured for 23/24 academic year."
A beautiful Grade II listed 'Arts & Crafts' style 4/5 bedroomed detached house occupying a good sized private plot in this popular & convenient location. It also has a delightful detached annexe which could be used to generate a separate income together with a detached double garage.
"A character Grade II listed detached residence in desirable residential area of Bangor City. Positioned on a larger than normal plot, not only does this family home enjoy private gardens and spacious adaptable accommodation there is a self contained annexe to the side of the property which would ..."
"An exceptionally well-presented and spacious Detached 4 Bedroomed Family Residence (built 2018) located in the popular Penrhosgarnedd district of Bangor, ideally placed for the A55 expressway (excellent for commuting), schools, general hospital and essential amenities. A must see home for sure!"
"Spacious and newly refurbished, seven-bedroom HMO, located only 70 yards from College Road, where the main University campus is situated. Sold with tenants in situ, providing £31,290 in rent for the 22/23 academic year and £41,310.75 for 23/24. "
"Being located on one of the main approaches into the city centre within less than 300 yards of the mainline railway station, directly opposite university lecture buildings and labs, and adjoining the entrance to an Asda supermarket this vacant site is suited to almost limitless uses, subject to t..."
"A substantial detached home in the heart of Bangor City Centre, located within a mile from the high street and Ysbyty Gwynedd. Having the local primary and secondary schools situated a short walk away, this 5-bedroom property would make the perfect family home in a convenient location."
"A great 3 bedroom detached executive house on a sought after residential estate in the Penrhosgarnedd area of Bangor. Stylish contemporary living, high specification throughout. Light & airy kitchen/dining/living area opening to the rear garden, lounge and a cloakroom to the ground floor. 3 be..."
An attractive detached property offering accommodation that is as well presented now as the day it was built. Conveniently located on the popular Redrow development in Penrhosgarnedd with 3 bedrooms this house would make a lovely family home for years to come.
"An exclusive opportunity, to purchase two HMO properties, situated side by side and located only 100 meters from the nearest university building. £44,153.29 combined gross rent secured for the 23/24 academic year."
"An extended three bedroomed detached house situated in a popular and convenient location which is within approx. 5 minutes' walk of three schools and within 5 minutes' drive of Ysbyty Gwynedd, the University and the city centre. "
A modernised and extended three bedroomed detached house situated in a sought after cul de sac position from which there are southerly views towards the mountains
Located very close to the waterfront on this most sought-after development with stunning sea and mountain views is this very well appointed 3 storey townhouse within easy walking of the city centre together with the Grade II listed Bangor pier. In addition to the amazing sunrises that can be (cont.)
"Located in a highly sought after location, close to the famous Bangor Pier, this imposing Grade II Listed Georgian Style Detached House is just perfect if you are looking for a conveniently positioned home within walking distance the city centre."
"A great 3 bedroom family house on a sought after residential estate in the Penrhosgarnedd area of Bangor. Stylish contemporary living, high specification throughout. Light & airy kitchen/dining/living area opening to the rear garden, lounge and a cloakroom to the ground floor. 3 bedrooms, ensuite..."
"Cilfach Crwys is located on a new and popular housing development, ideally positioned near to Ysbyty Gwynedd and the A55. A modern and spacious 3 Bedroom Detached family home, fitted with all the up to date fixtures and fittings you would expect and a large garden."
A three bedroom detached family home located on this popular housing development. The property is ex show home and is presented in excellent condition throughout. Located in an excellent established residential location on the outskirts of the University City of Bangor. Local amenities to ...
"Property Ref - IW0179 DETACHED FAMILY HOME / OR INVESTMENT WITH 4 HMO LICENCE  Are you looking for a significant property with low maintance in mind and having a modern flow? This home can be anything you wish, a family home..."
"A modern and spacious Detached 4 Bedroomed Family Residence located within a more recent residential development in the popular Penrhosgarnedd district of Bangor, ideally placed for the A55 expressway (excellent for commuting), schools, general hospital and essential amenities. "
An exciting opportunity to acquire a readymade six bedroom HMO with a strong tenancy in place for the 22/23 academic year. 
"26 Y Rhos is an extremely well presented Detached Bungalow, offering all the space a growing family could ever need and is ideally located for primary and secondary schools with Ysbyty Gwynedd only a few minute’s walk away."
"Six Bedroom student HMO with current occupants in situ and £34,398 GROSS rental income secured for the 23/24 academic year. "
A considerably enlarged three bedroomed semi detached house offering extensive and versatile family accommodation. It is situated in the ever popular Penrhosgarnedd area and is conveniently placed within a few minutes walk of Ysbyty Gwynedd and within easy access of schools & A55.
"A Detached 3 Bedroom property, featuring Gas Central Heating, Off-Road Parking, Garage & Workshop Area."
"An attractive 1930s three bedroomed semi detached house situated in this popular and much sought after location which is convenient for Ysbyty Gwynedd, a variety of schools and the city centre. The property occupies an elevated position and has superb uninterrupted views towards the mountains."
"A mature three bedroomed semi detached house situated in this popular and much sought after neighbourhood. The property occupies an elevated position and enjoys superb views towards the mountains, across Hirael Bay and as far east as the Great Orme."
"An abundance of potential and with several options, this property could be suitable for a residential buyer, developer, investor or for commercial use (subject to planning consent). "
"Property Ref - IW0179 See to Believe it - that what this stunning home consist of be prepared to be wowed as this home comes with many surprises. This Two / Three Bedroom Home comes with Two En Suites, newly configured to a high standards throughout and re designed to ..."
"A well-presented 2 Bedroom, Semi-Detached Cottage, located in the highly sought after rural village of Caerhun."
"£27,400 Gross rent secured for 23/24. Comprising of three floors, this large six bedroom student investment property located in a prime student area, provides an investor with great long term potential. "
Attention developers and builders alike. Williams & Goodwin are delighted to offer this parcel of land with outline consent having been granted for a block of 9 x 3 storey town houses [2 of which have an affordable housing restriction] with the convenient location on the edge of the popular M...
"Ideally located for primary and secondary schools with Ysbyty Gwynedd only a few minute’s walk away this beautifully presented, 3 Bedroom, Semi Detached Home is the perfect choice for your family."
 A mature Three/Four bedroomed semi detached house offering spacious accommodation which includes a kitchen extension and conservatory. The property has an HMO license for four people until the 6th September 2026 and is offered for sale subject to a 12month pre-let from 1st July 2023.
"44 Cilfach Crwys is located on a new and popular housing development, ideally positioned near to Ysbyty Gwynedd and the A55. A modern, spacious, 4 Bedroom, Mid Terrace family home, fitted with all the up to date fixtures and fittings you would expect."
"Spacious five bedroom HMO, located only 120 meters from the main University campus, providing a student investor with a great long term investment opportunity. £20,768.72 gross income secured for the year. "
Property - IW0179 SOLD WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN  A substantial Semi Detached House with a spacious layout and sunny interior. The property is situated in a most convenient position in a popular part of the city and has the benefit of a single ...
"A substantial 4 Storey End Terrace Period Residence situated in a prominent and accessible position on the High Street of the city of Bangor, convenient for city amenities and university. Formerly a 6 Bedroomed HMO. Double glazing, gas central heating and patio garden."
"A very well presented semi detached house situated in the desirable Belmont Avenue, ideally located for the Hospital, University and local primary and secondary schools. The property briefly comprises entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/dining room with French doors to garden, first floor landing, 3 ..."
"Act fast to secure this superbly presented 3 Bedroomed End Terrace House (in a row of 4) located within a newer residential development in the popular Penrhosgarnedd district of Bangor, ideally placed for the A55 expressway (excellent for commuting), schools, general hospital and essential amenit..."
"Modern and spacious, five bedroom HMO with current tenants in situ for the 22/23 academic year, providing a total gross rent of £26,640, as well as a 24/24 contract lined up worth £27,906.86."
Being tucked away in the Treborth district of Bangor this mid terraced single storey property occupies a highly convenient position within less than ¼ of a mile of the A55 and with its well presented accommodation provides a modern residence ready to move into.
"A splendid looking 3 Storey Mid Terrace Period Residence licenced as a 4 person HMO and therefore perfect as a ready-made investment. Modernised, well-presented with generous rooms throughout and private rear garden."
An amazing opportunity to acquire this Immaculate 3 bedroomed mews Property situated in a prime location close to Menai Bridge and a short drive to Bangor the property has been newly renovated to a high standard and would be a fantastic family home or would lend itself to be a great ...
Five bedroom Victorian era HMO with consistent occupancy since gaining HMO status back in 2007. Beaming with character and offering ample space throughout. 
"A Very Attractive & Charming Grade II Listed Semi Detached House Having Been Extended & Situated In The Very Desirable Village Of Glasinfryn On The Outskirts Of Bangor. The Two Storey House Retains Plenty Of Character Throughout With An Inglenook Fireplace, Sash Windows & Beamed Ceiling. The (cont.)"
"A licenced 9 person HMO is this substantial End Terrace Period Residence complete with Basement Annexe situated in the heart of the Upper Bangor region of the city and within walking distance of the main university building, shops, bars, restaurants and train station."
As deceptive as can be is this spacious and well-presented 3 Bedroomed Semi Detached Dormer Bungalow situated in an established residential setting within the popular district of Penrhosgarnedd in Bangor. Superb Eryri mountain views.
"A most appealing 3 Storey 5 Bedroomed End Terrace Period Residence situated in the Upper Bangor region of the city, a licensed 5 person HMO, making this a perfect investment opportunity. Features the only garden in the whole terrace!"
"A well-presented 3 Bedroom, Semi-Detached Family home located in a quiet residential area of Bangor."
"Attractive four bedroom residential property with ample space throughout, located in a sought after family area, offering great transport links in and out of the city. "
"An immaculately presented 3 bedroom family home situated on the outskirts of Bangor City Centre. Being just a short journey away from the local amenities such as schools, Ysbyty Gwynedd and the town centre, this mid-terraced house would make the ideal first time buy or family home. A virtual view..."
"A 3 bedroomed semi detached house occupying a good sized plot in this popular location which is within five minutes' walk of three schools and within 5 minutes' drive of the city centre, University and Ysbyty Gwynedd. The property requires modernisation. "
Enjoying both Mountain and Sea views is this modern first floor apartment in the desirable Y Bae development in Bangor City Centre. This well presented 3 bedroom apartment is conveniently located to all of the Cities amenities such as University High Street and leisure facilities. Contact s today...
Fully tenanted and located in Bangor’s main student hotspot. Five bedroom rental with great long term investment potential. 
"A traditional 2 Bedroomed Semi Detached Welsh Cottage situated in the desirable rural community of Waen Wen on the outskirts of Bangor, within easy reach of amenities in the city of Bangor and Snowdonia. Garden, parking & garage. Requires modernising."
"** NO CHAIN ** A modernised and beautifully presented three bedroomed semi detached house situated in a very convenient location which is within five to six minutes' walk of three schools and within five minutes' drive of the city centre, the University and Ysbyty Gwynedd"
"A spacious 3 Storey Mid-Terrace property that is licensed as a 7 person HMO, making it perfect for the student community."
"Conveniently located near the centre of Bangor, this 5 Bedroom HMO Mid Terrace investment property makes a great opportunity for any budding landlord to take advantage of the popular student rental market in Bangor."
"An opportunity to acquire a two/three-bedroom end terrace property located in this sought after area of Penrhosgarnedd on the outskirts of the University City of Bangor. Great location for all local primary and secondary schools. Further local amenities include theatre, gym and leisure faciliti..."
An extremely spacious 4/5 bedroom property suitable as an investment property. Property comes with tenants in situ until 30/06/2023
"Property Ref - IW0179 HMO LIVE LICENCE  Invest, Invest and Invest - Great Opportunity to acquire a HMO Property in the heart of the City of Bangor which generates around £220 per week with 3 bedrooms being let out on a HMO basis, wit..."
"Spacious four bedroom HMO with occupants in situ, offering a 10% GROSS yield for the subsequent 23/24 academic year. "
"An end of terrace house with views from the rear over to the Menai Bridge and Menai Strait. The property briefly comprises entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner, 2 first floor bedrooms and a bathroom, to the rear of the property is a raised decked garden and off road parking area to the side (plea..."
"A delightful Grade II listed two bedroomed stone built end terraced house of character situated in the centre of this popular hamlet, some two miles fro Bangor. The property would ideally suit a first time buyer. "
"An opportunity to purchase a four bedroom HMO student property located in the heart of Upper Bangor, a prime student location. The property comes with four spacious bedrooms with a kitchen and two living room communal areas. Property to be sold with four occupants in situ for the 22/23 academic y..."
A surprisingly spacious 3 bedroomed house of character having accommodation arranged on 4 floors. It is situated within a few minutes walk of the pier & enjoys views towards the Straits from the rear first floor lounge and attic hobbies room. It also has the benefit of an HMO License for 4 people.
An extended two bedroomed end terraced house situated in the ever popular Garth district of the city. The property occupies an elevated position with views across Hirael Bay towards the mountains and as far east as the Great Orme and has the benefit of private off road parking for 2 cars.
"**********FOR SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION.********** Starting Bid £160,000 Terms and conditions Apply. A Spacious Detached House In A Convenient Location Within The City Of Bangor Requiring Modernisation Throughout. The Property Benefits From Gas Central Heating & Double Glazing & Is Ideal (cont.)"
"A deceptively spacious 3-4 Bedroomed Mid Terrace House located just a short walk from the bustling Upper Bangor region, close to a whole host of convenient amenities, eateries, the principal university building, mainline railway station and supermarkets. Perfect investment."
"A Spacious Detached House In A Convenient Location Within The City Of Bangor Requiring Modernisation Throughout. The Property Benefits From Gas Central Heating & Double Glazing & Is Ideally Placed In A Popular Part Of Bangor & Within Easy Reach Of Local Schools,Ysbty Gwynedd Hospital ..."
"Being situated a stones-throw away from Bangor's City centre high street, this substantial 5 bedroom house would make an ideal home for the largest of family or would equally be suitable for an investment opportunity with it's adaptable accommodation and HMO licence. A viewing is highly r..."
"An extended, modernised and tastefully presented two bedroomed mid terraced cottage of character ideally suiting a first time buyer or investor. The property occupies a pleasant rural position on the outskirts of the city and enjoys views over open fields. "
"Ready made investment opportunity, currently occupied until July 2024."
"Student investment opportunity, offering a bright and spacious four bedroom HMO. Current tenants in situ until September 2023. "
"An attractive Mid Terrace with a contemporary interior and ideal for lettings situated in a prime position in Bangor, close to the University and shops. 4 Bedrooms, Attic Room, Kitchen with Terrace, Lounge and large Shower Room."
"A deceptively spacious family home located in a popular residential area of Bangor. Sat on a larger than normal corner plot, this 3 bedroom house benefits from large garden areas and in our opinion would make the perfect first time buy for any young family. Contact us today for a viewing on 01248..."
"Modernised four bedroom HMO with current occupants in situ and a proven track record of consistent monthly income, offering scope for a great long term investment. "
"A spacious four/five bedroom mid terraced property that has been recently modernised. Located within the heart of the University City of Bangor, close to all local facilities to include shops, restaurants, takeout food facilities, supermarkets, leisure facilities, railway station and bus rou..."
"HMO investment opportunity to be sold with tenants in situ, offering immediate income for an investor buyer. "
"Four bedroom HMO with scenic views of the city, fully furnished and offering an immediate investment income through occupants in situ, paying a combined rent of £11,500 for the year. "
"If you are looking for a ready-made investment opportunity in the heart of Bangor, look no further, here is an ideal 4 bedroom HMO registered property in great condition, ready for the student rental market. "
A great investment opportunity to acquire a property currently let on an assured shorthold tenancy until October 2022 at £750 per calendar month. With demand on the marina consistently high for similar long term lets the property also has potential for personal occupancy with an immediate i...
"As equally suited as a starter property as it is an investment house where demand for rented accommodation is consistently high this 3 bedroomed terraced house is offered for sale with no onward chain and benefits from a garage area to the rear. Offering a single bedroom, lounge and kitchen di..."
A mature three bedroomed mid terraced house situated in a convenient location which is within five minutes' walk of the High Street and within approximately five minutes' drive of Ysbyty Gwynedd and several schools. 
"Set within a popular residential area and conveniently located for everything Bangor has to offer, this 3 bedroom Mid Terrace house has been tastefully modernised and is ready for you to move in."
Looking for a new project and want to put your own stamp on a family home? Look no further than this 3 bedroom house situated in a popular residential area of Bangor. A viewing is highly recommended to appreciate the character and potential this end of terraced house possesses. Contact us today o...
"A 3 storey 4 bedroomed student investment property situated in a convenient location which is within 10 minutes' walk of the university campus. It is HMO Licensed until 14th November 2027 and has been let to 4 tenants from 13th Sept 2022 at a total net rent of £1,213.33 pcm. "
A well proportioned three bedroome end terraced house in a row of four occupying a cul de sac position on the outskirts of the city. 
An extended and modernised two bedroomed mid terraced house situated in the ever popular Hirael area. The property would ideally suit a first time buyer and is conveniently placed within a few minutes' walk of the High Street and the Hirael Bay waterfront. 
"A spacious 2 bedroom period terraced house on a quiet side road off Caernarfon Road in Bangor. With a large living room, spacious kitchen/dining room, 2 double bedrooms and a bathroom. A good sized patio garden to the rear. Selling with no chain. Light and airy throughout and larger than the..."
"Spacious Semi detached cottage in need of complete modernisation on three floors, with two 17ft reception rooms and separate kitchen area on ground floor, bedrooms and bathroom on first floor with stairs to further two attic rooms with a large amount of outside space to rear. There is space and p..."
"Unmodernised, spacious 4 bed semi detached cottage with large rear gardens, being Sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply. Starting Bid £130,000"
"Property Ref - IW0179 Tenure - FREEHOLD - SOLD WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN  A traditional End Terrace House conveniently located for the amenities located along Caernarfon Road, including schools and the city centre yet positioned away from the h..."
"A pleasant 2 bedroom period terraced cottage in a popular residential area of Bangor. Good sized living room, kitchen/breakfast room, shower room and 2 double bedrooms. Selling with no chain. Large varied supply of amenities in walking distance. Please click on our 360 interactive tour and book..."
An extended two/three bedroomed mid terraced house ideally suiting a first time buyer or investor. The property is situated in a very convenient central location which is within a few minutes' walk of the High Street and within easy walking distance of the university campus. 
Occupying a prominent retail position in the centre of the pedestrianised area of the university town is this VAT registered ground floor retail unit with first floor storage providing approximately 890 square foot of retail space. Interested parties may also wish to note that whilst this plannin...
"A spacious family sized 3 Bedroomed Mid Terrace House situated in an established residential setting in the university city of Bangor, convenient for local amenities and situated close to a bus route for easy access to the city centre."
A spacious and well presented two bedroomed first floor apartment forming part of this popular modern development which is situated in a very convenient central location within a minute's walk of the High Street. It also has a re-fitted kitchen and private gated under cover parking. 
"This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with the Auctioneer, iamsold. This method of auction requires both parties to complete the transaction within 56 days the draft contract for sale being re..."
**FULLY FURNISHED** Conveniently located for the hospital and primary schools this stylish and well presented one bedroom apartment comes complete with all the furnishings and is ready for you to move straight into.
Being situated in the Maesgeirchen area of the city within approximately ¾ of a mile walking distance of the city centre is this 3 bedroomed mid terraced house which offers real value for money taking into account the extent of accommodation offered.
Here is a great opportunity to purchase a desirable 1st floor apartment in a popular residential area of Bangor. Only a short walking distance from the City centre this spacious mezzanine apartment is tastefully decorated and ready for you to move straight into.
"A spacious, top floor two bedroom apartment in a highly desirable location, with scenic views of the Menai Straits. "
2 Bedroomed Apartment within a striking Chapel conversion in the centre of the city of Bangor. The accommodation comprises contemporary Bathroom and open plan Sitting Room/Breakfast Kitchen. To the rear there is ample residents parking with shared lawn to the front.
"BEING SOLD BY AUCTION This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with the Auctioneer, iamsold. This method of auction requires both parties to complete the transaction within 56 days the draft..."
"A wonderfully stylish and spacious two bedroom apartment, well suited to an owner occupier. "
"An opportunity to acquire this leasehold property situated in the old BBC building which was converted in approximately 1975 and is conveniently located for the University, schools and all general amenities, and within walking distance to the City centre of Bangor. The property briefly comprises..."
"An opportunity to purchase a TWO bedroomed ground floor retirement apartment situated within this popular purpose-built development. The property has secondary/independent access and is very conveniently placed for the railway station, public transport services, Morrisons and the city centre."
"A great 1 bedroom flat on the ground floor of a converted chapel in a central position in Bangor.
The flat has interesting features, quirky window shapes and an archway between the living room and kitchen. Offered in good condition throughout with a new central heating system, a great opportunit..."
"Property offered for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with the Auctioneer, iamsold. This method of auction requires both parties to complete the transaction within 56 days the draft contract for sale being re..."
"An unusual opportunity for a developer or investor to convert the upper floors above a retail unit in Bangor High Street to create an apartment where demand for rental accommodation is consistently high, and which currently provides over 1,500 square foot of accommodation."
Bidding opens Monday 27th March 2023 at 12:00 and closes Wednesday 29th March 2023 at 12:00.
"**TRADITIONAL MID TERRACED HOUSE** MGY are pleased to offer for sale a traditional mid terraced house which has been decorated to a lovely standard, situated within walking distance of local shops and with easy access to the City Centre. The spacious accommodation briefly comprises entrance hall,..."
"Unique property in an exclusive, much sought after location with the most stunning, far reaching views over Cardiff and the Bristol Channel from the Severn Crossing in the east to St Hilary to the west. Principle family home with accommodation including a grand central atrium, dining and living r..."
"Well Trading City Centre Bar Investment Offers in excess of £1950000.00  BUSINESS TRADING AS USUAL AND REMAINS UNAFFECTED. The premises are located on a prominent corner pitch, adjoining both Mill Lane and St Mary's Street and is arranged over four floors. The basement i..."
"** DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY ** PRIME LOCATION ** A rare opportunity to acquire this 1 acre (0.4 Ha) development site, currently a detached bungalow, situated in the prime village of Llandaff, Cardiff. With FULL PLANNING PERMISSION (subject to signing the Section 106 Agreement) for two different sc..."
"JeffreyRoss are proud to bring to the market this exclusive gated development of just 4 executive homes located on arguably one of Cardiff's finest roads. These fantastic family homes have been designed and built with sustainability and efficiency in mind, whilst still achieving the luxury you w..."
"** EXCEPTIONAL DETACHED HOME SET WITHIN 6 ACRES ** STUNNING FEATURES ** WITH TWO BEDROOM ANNEX ** Nestled within beautiful Welsh countryside with views over historic Castell Coch is this stunning five bedroom detached barn dating back 300 years, and exquisitely converted in 2002. This superb prop..."
An executive family home with four bedrooms in the highly sought after Cyncoed area of Cardiff
"Thomas H Wood are delighted to present to this spectacular Victorian residence located on one of Radyrs most desirable addresses. Set on a generous westerly plot, this magnificent six double bedroom property has been comprehensively refurbished by the current owners to create a modern family home..."
** EXCEPTIONAL SIX BEDROOM DETACHED ** LARGE FRONT & REAR GARDENS ** A beautifully presented six bedroom detached family home on sought after Drysgol Road in the heart of Radyr being positioned almost directly opposite the entry to Radyr golf club and within easy walking distance of Radyr vil...
"A well presented and generously proportioned executive detached family residence, Georgian style in appearance, set in attractive grounds of one third of an acre, tucked away in a private drive just off Mill Road, a short walk to Lisvane Primary School, village centre and all local amenities. Gr..."
A Very Attractive Individually Designed Seven Bedroom Detached Residence Built In 2010 Situated At This Most Sought After Of Areas. The Property Is Situated Within a Half Acre To Include A Large In And Out Front Forecourt And Large Garden To Rear. Excellent Sized Family Accommodation Over Three F...
"Handsome, Georgian style high specification modern executive detached family residence, built in 2010, arranged on three floors, providing generous size accommodation, with an in-and-out driveway, enjoying a magnificent 250ft sunny rear garden, set in grounds of half an acre. Portico, grand 20ft..."
"JeffreyRoss are proud to bring to the market this impressive family home set over two floors and approx 3,194 SQFT. located on one of Cardiff's most prestigious road is this 6 double bedroom detached property that briefly comprises impressive entrance hallway, open plan living Kitchen and dining ..."
"Handsome, beautifully presented double fronted detached family residence, enjoying a wide frontage with deep driveway in prestigious and favoured Llandennis Avenue, WITH PLANNING PERMISSION TO EXTEND. VIEW THE EXCITING 3D PLANS AVAILABLE. Entrance vestibule, grand reception hall, cloakroom, 25f..."
"Exceptionally spacious and well proportioned modern detached family residence with front veranda, with OVER 5000 SQ FT OF ACCOMMODATION, tucked away in a private road, just off Hollybush Road, enjoying seclusion and tranquillity, set in grounds of just over an acre (mostly woodland), being withi..."
"*Investment Opportunity* An opportunity to acquire a block of apartments on Newport Road, Cardiff, which briefly consist of 7 apartments, all of which are occupied and generating an immediate rental income. All interest via Chambers Estate Agents. "
"JeffreyRoss are proud to bring to the market this exceptional, Six bedroom detached family home located in the popular Coed Y Wenallt. This modern family home boast large entrance hallway with double doors onto the principal reception and dining room. double doors lead from the dining area onto a..."
A rare opportunity to acquire a hidden gem situated off a private drive on the cusp of Pontcanna & Llandaff. This truly executive residence was constructed in1999 and is only to be sold as the original owners seek to downsize for to a smaller garden. The house sits in circa 0.35 acres of well-sto...
"An incredible and truly unique five/six-bedroom character family home situated in a private plot, with its own lane access and gated access with easy access to great schools, the city and transport links."
"*OFFERING EXCELLENT ACCOMODATION OF JUST UNDER 3,000 sq ft* An imposing traditional Edwardian detached property, built circa 1912, offering excellent square footage with an abundance of Edwardian features, positioned on a quarter of an acre plot, set well back off Cyncoed Road, having an in-a..."
"** EXECUTIVE DETACHED HOME OF OVER 2800 SQ.FT. ** 0.5 ACRES OF STUNNING GARDENS ** IN THE HEART OF RADYR ** NO CHAIN ** An exceptional 1960's detached family residence retaining many original features located on a large plot of approx. 0.5 acres, situated on sought after Windsor Avenue, in the he..."
"A stunning detached executive modern residence positioned within a select gated close, built and designed to a very high specification by Messrs Redrow Homes. Five large bedrooms, three Villeroy & Bosch luxury bathrooms, south facing gardens, private car drive, double garage."
"**Fantastic Investment Opportunity** Urpad are delighted to bring to the market this ideal investment opportunity located on Railway Street, Splott, Cardiff. Close to the City Centre as well as many local amenities and major road links this is is a great location. There are current (cont.)"
"Thomas H Wood Estate Agents are proud to present this beautifully presented four bedroom semi-detached residence situated on Whitchurch's most sought after addresses. Ideally located on The Parade and built at the turn of the last century, this substantial family home has been maintained to a ver..."
"The Sandringham is a new style four bedroom detached from Edenstone Homes, distinctively designed for the second phase of Beaufort Park."
"**NO CHAIN* IDEAL FIRST TIME PURCHASE** An opportunity to acquire a spacious two bedroom, ground floor apartment in the popular Windsor Quay development, which is close to Cardiff Bay Retail Park and with excellent links to the A4232 and M4. Mermaid Quay is also close by offering a variety of bar..."
"A traditional period semi-detached home with a prestigious location, three bedrooms and original features. The property is situated in the heart of Whitchurch Village and is in a prime location for both Whitchurch Primary & Secondary schools, Restaurants, Shops, Cafes and public transpo..."
"Ynys Y Coed is an exclusive, quiet, tree-lined cul de sac tucked away just off Fairwater Road in the historic village of Llandaff. Behind this handsome facade is a charming family home meticulously presented throughout, offering a bright and spacious living accommodation. Built in 1997, the prope..."
"Built in 1988 by an Architect for his own occupation, a modern detached house with double garage accessed via a private driveway in this sought after position. No Chain."
"A five bedroom semi detached house located on this wide tree lined road in one of Cardiff's most sought after areas. The property has been much improved and extended in recent years and now provides a lovely family home. The spacious, well presented accommodation comprises: Entrance hall with par..."
The Oaks. An attractively designed executive five bedroom semi-detached property set back on this prestigious no through road in the heart of Llandaff. One of three architecturally designed family homes that were built in 2017 which offer spacious light accommodation and a large contemporary kitc...
"Introducing The Hatfield, one of our brand new styles for the exciting second phase of Beaufort Park. Available for off plan reservation now."
"Handsome, traditional bay fronted older style detached family residence, retaining charm and character, set on a good size plot with possibilities to extend, subject to planning, quiet and favoured avenue, within easy reach of all local amenities, excellent highway links (M4 and A48) and being wi..."
"£975,000 Investment/Development Opportunity, Former BBC Studios and School of Music, Stacey Hall, Stacey Road, Roath, Cardiff, CF24 1DR"
"Behind this handsome stone facade is a charming detached house believed to be part of the original Medieval Court House. The historic property has transformed over the years to blend period character features with modern fittings. There are striking, generous mature gardens that have been meticul..."
"A sizeable family home set in a plot of about 0.4 of an acre offering spacious, adaptable accommodation. Large lounge with open fire, family room / study, generous dining room with adjacent kitchen/breakfast room. Also utility room and ground floor shower room/WC. To the first floor master bedroo..."
"A bespoke property located on the prestigious Graig Road of Lisvane. Built in 2015 this exceptional property is fitted to the highest specification throughout incorporating luxury fixtures and fittings and a It's very own plunge pool. With electric gated access, driveway parking, open plan areas ..."
JeffreyRoss are proud to bring to the market these exceptional and unique Town houses located on phase two of Cathedral Gardens. The contemporary design and layout are what set these apart from the traditional competition that surrounds them as well as benefiting from off road parking. Register y...
"Individual, beautifully presented and spacious detached modern family residence, offering over 3,900 sq ft of versatile high specification accommodation on three comfortable levels, tucked away along a private driveway, enjoying a high degree of privacy and seclusion, being within easy reach of a..."
Introducing Talbot Row. The final release at Cathedral Gardens are these impressive four bedroom homes. Set over three floors with gated parking and south facing garden and balcony.
An opportunity to purchase a substantial warehouse occupying approximately a third of an acre in the heart of Roath and within close proximity to the city centre. All enquiries via sole selling agent Chambers Estate Agents. 
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase this beautifully presented and rarely available to the market, 4 double bedroom executive detached home located in Ty Gwyn Gardens in Penylan. This select development of around 20 detached homes was built in 2014 by Bellway Homes and is within the highly regard..."
We are delighted to present to market this spectacular detached residence which has been a beloved family home for over 50 years. This exquisite residence is set on one of the most secluded plots in Llandaff and originally built in 1963. This magnificent property offers considerable charm and set...
"A well proportioned detached family home, situated in the highly desirable area of Cyncoed, Bryn Gwyn Road. This fantastic four bedroom family home is perfectly suited for modern living and offers further potential for expansion. Located on a substantial plot and one of the largest in the road, t..."
"Ray&Brown are delighted to offer for sale this stunning 5 bedroom property in the heart of Lisvane. This is a rare opportunity to acquire a spacious and individually architected home, featuring 5 bedrooms, 2 bathrooms, double garage, and landscaped gardens. "
"This substantial property is notably well-placed along Cathedral Road in a chic Pontcanna location. An unrivaled spot for easy access to parks, international sports stadia, Cardiff City Centre, Cardiff Castle, and the shops, restaurants, cafes and bistros of Pontcanna. Offering spacious ..."
"Beautifully refurbished and presented detached residence, set on a generous size plot of just under quarter of an acre, having a deep 75ft front cobble style front garden and a 63ft professionally landscaped rear garden, convenient for all local amenities and being within Cardiff High School and ..."
"Maison are pleased to offer this prestigious and modern 4 bedroom four- storey townhouse in the gated community with private parking, rear garden and a verandah on the top floor. A perfect way of welcoming the sun in the morning and a sun set towards the end of day at the rear of the property. T..."
"Jeffrey Ross and delighted to bring to the market this unique & individually designed detached family home, set on the edge of a popular road in Penylan. Boasting fantastic modern open plan family living, mixed with closed off rooms, giving you plenty of options with layout. Offering over 3000 ft..."
An impressive apartment with panoramic water views in Cardiff Bay
"*Superb two bedroom first floor property in the heart of Whitchurch* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this excellent size property with generous living accommodation including a large lounge/ dining room, fully fitted kitchen and a good size family bathroom. "
"OFFERS AROUND £850,000 . A truly stunning and beautifully presented extended detached modern family residence, located in the highly sought after Sovereign Chase (off Cyncoed Road), enjoying open views to a recreational children’s park, within the Cardiff High School catchment, close ..."
"Beautifully presented, versatile and newly constructed detached 5 bedroom modern family home with luxury accommodation providing 2800 sq. ft. of accommodation, within Cardiff High School catchment, a short walk to Rhydypenau Primary School and the comprehensive shopping centre at Llanishen villag..."
"Hentons are delighted to bring to market this spacious and well maintained four bedroom detached property. The property is situated in a prime location of Cyncoed, within catchment area for Rhydypenau Primary and Cardiff High School."
***DETACHED THREE BEDROOM BUNGALOW*** EXCELLENT LOCATION***NO ONWARD CHAIN*** Brinsons of Caerphilly are delighted to offer to the market a rare opportunity to purchase this spacious three bedroom detached bungalow in the highly desirable area of Cyncoed and being offered to the market w...
"A traditional semi-detached family home, located in this sought after location on the cusp of Victoria Park and Llandaff. This much improved home blends traditional features with modern comforts and extensions to provide a modern living space. The spacious accommodation briefly comprises: Porch, ..."
"Superb Four Double Bedroom detached family home set in an exclusive and sought after development on Everest Walk. This large home has plenty of living space including lounge, dining room, large kitchen/family area, study and a conservatory. Set in a large landscaped garden and close to amenities. "
"A beautifully appointed traditional style double bay fronted semi-detached property in an elevated enviable position on Lake Road West with views across Roath Park Lake, the boathouse and Scott monument, just a short walk to Heath Halt train stations and in the school catchment for Rhydypenau Pri..."
A wonderful opportunity to acquire this fully refurbished 4 bedroom detached family home in Llandaff. The current owners have transformed the property into a spacious and modern family home with all elements of the house being renewed. The property has benefited from a sizeable double storey exte...
"Hidden behind the handsome stone exterior of this period bay-fronted townhouse lies a vast amount of living space, spread over three floors that offers the perfect blend of charming period features, modern stylish fittings, and a high-specification finish. This stunning family home offer..."
"** FIVE BEDROOM DETACHED HOME WITH SPACIOUS GARDENS ** FOUR RECEPTION ROOMS ** DOUBLE GARAGE ** A fantastic opportunity to acquire this five bedroom detached home situated within a large plot in the semi-rural village of Capel Llanilltern, located only 7 miles from Cardiff City Centre. This subst..."
FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME. Built circa 1929 offering 2000sq/ft of living accomodation. Located in a sought after area well positioned within short distance to all local amenites and schools. The property has retained many original features with high ceilings and feature fireplaces...
**NO ONWARD CHAIN** REDUCED FOR A QUICK SALE** A Pristine waterfront town house with outstanding views of Cardiff Bay and Penarth Marina offered to the market with NO CHAIN. These TOWN HOUSES are RARELY AVAILABLE and this one is in IMMACULATE CONDITION WITH SPECTACULAR WATER VIEWS. 
"** BEAUTIFUL FIVE DOUBLE BED DETACHED FORMER SHOW HOME ** DETACHED DOUBLE GARAGE ** CLOSE TO SCHOOLS ** An immaculately presented five double bedroom detached family home being the prestigious 'Highgate 5' Redrow built former show home, located in a desirable location being a short distance from ..."
"* IDEAL LARGE FAMILY HOME * An exceptional five bedroom property in the sought after area of Rhiwbina within in walking distance to Rhiwbina village with a range of shops, cafes and amenities. This stunning home is tucked away on a quiet cul de sac of only 6 houses offering ample privacy, yet all..."
"A very attractive, double bayed semi-detached home in a prominent position within walking distance to Roath Park Lake and highly regarded Cardiff High Catchment. This period property offers bespoke traditional features throughout with four bedrooms, three receptions, two bathrooms and modern kitc..."
 This extremely well designed and spacious four bedroom townhouse enjoys uninterrupted south facing views over the marina and river. It is situated in a highly desirable development and an internal viewing is highly recommended. The well appointed accommodation includes many added extras inc...
"A large and imposing Gable fronted six bedroom residence of character, Edwardian in style, built circa 1910, and fronting the charming Roath Park Flower Gardens with the scenic Lake within a short walking distance. The capacious living space provides 2444 square feet, with three bathrooms."
"*Spacious four bedroom semi detached family home in Rhiwbina with substantial plot* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this large four bedroom property in the sought after location of Rhiwbina. This property boasts generous living accommodation including three reception rooms, four ..."
"****OPEN HOUSE 25th March 2023**** Rare to the market substantial, four bedroom detached family home with huge potential. A must view to take it all in"
'Hidden in Plain Sight' is this distinctive detached residence built circa 1916 and retaining many features of the period. Prominently positioned in an elevated position close to Llandaff Fields with a leafy green canopy of mature trees that provide privacy from passers-by. Accessed only from th...
FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION: The auction will take place online on 14th February 2023 at 04:24 PM with registration through our website.
Brook Cottage just off Cefn mably road in Lisvane has been beautifully improved by the current owners and sits in approximately 1/3 of an acre.
"Brook Cottage just off Cefn mably road in Lisvane has been beautifully improved by the current owners and sits in approximately 1/3 of an acre. This detached residence is set over approx 1,254 SQFT and briefly comprises, entrance porch, hallway, principal living room and separate lounge which are..."
"*IMMACULATELY PRESENTED AND RARELY AVAILABLE, FIVE BEDROOM, SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* MGY are delighted to bring to market this traditional, semi-detached house located at the head of a cul-de-sac near Llandaff Village and within walking distance to all amenities. The accommodation briefly comprises e..."
"A very smart and stylish ground floor 1 bed flat located in the heart of Pontcanna, close to the many attractions of the area, including artisan shops, excellent restaurants and pavement Cafes, public houses and beautiful parkland. The flat has it's own entrance and comprises immaculately decorat..."
" ** IDYLLIC LOCATION WITH SUPERB VIEWS ** BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED GARDENS ** SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION ** A fantastic opportunity to acquire this executive five bedroom detached home situated in an idyllic location in Clos Cefyn Bychan, Pentyrch. The accommodation briefly comprises: entrance, hallway,..."
"If you love Pontcanna then you will love this stunning, extended bay fronted home, which blends the modern and contemporary with period features. It is spacious inside with rooms over four floors and would be ideal for a family who want to be in the heart of Pontcanna. The teak windows..."
"This immaculate four bedroom, executive detached family home is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac on the much sought after Parc Radyr development in the semi rural village of Radyr. The property is tucked away in an elevated position and is placed close to local amenities include a parade of shops, ..."
"An immaculately presented and well proportioned detached property, situated in the popular area of the Heath. This fantastic family bungalow has been extended and refurbished throughout, making it perfectly suited for modern living. Architecturally designed, this spacious home has been thought wi..."
"** DETACHED EXECUTIVE 'REDROW' FAMILY HOME IN RADYR ** WITH INTEGRAL DOUBLE GARAGE ** SOUTH WEST FACING REAR GARDEN ** A beautifully presented detached family home set in the sought after village of Radyr. Built to a very high specification, the spacious accommodation comprises; an open porch, la..."
"** BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FIVE DOUBLE BED DETACHED HOME ** DETACHED DOUBLE GARAGE ** An exceptionally well presented five double bedroom detached family home being the prestigious 'Highgate 5' Redrow built family home, located in a desirable location being a short distance from local amenities. En..."
Maes Yr Haf is a small no-through road just off Ardwyn in Pantmawr situated close to Whitchurch Golf Club. Pantmawr is to the northwest of Cardiff and conveniently located between the popular Whitchurch and Rhiwbina villages and has excellent A470 and M4 access. The property has been completely t...
"A rare opportunity to purchase a luxury apartment, finished to the highest of standards in the heart of Cyncoed Village. No Chain."
"A deceptively spacious and superbly presented double bay fronted mid-terrace house perfectly positioned directly opposite Palace Road between Llandaff and Pontcanna. The property is light and spacious, offering a versatile accommodation split over three floors. This elegant residence has kept man..."
"Beautifully balanced design means that despite its substantial, five bedroom size, Those who desire a home built for 21st century living yet still have an appreciation for traditional aesthetics are sure to fall in love with The Hampstead. As part of our esteemed Heritage Collection, the frontage..."
" A Beautiful freehold property with Uniek Residential.An excellent opportunity to purchase this stunning, eco-friendly, detached property situated in a very prominent position within close proximity to the popular village of Rhiwbina, whilst also a short distance to Whitchurch to the West. The p..."
A period bay-fronted semi-detached family home located on one of Whitchurch's most sought after residential locations in the heart of the village. 
"*RARELY AVAILABLE AND REFURBISHED TO AN EXTREMELY HIGH STANDARD* MGY are pleased to present this superb mid-terraced, three bedroom house in the highly sought after area of Pontcanna. Situated within walking distance to Llandaff Fields and the City Centre, and near a variety of cafes, restaurant..."
"Calling all investors! What an opportunity in this block of six flats located in popular Fairwater they are all currently tenanted with a management company looking after all the units. Each apartment has its own front door, there is parking and a communal garden."
"An ideal investment property set in an excellent location of Roath within easy access to Cardiff City Centre and the A48/M4 access corridor. This property would suite an investor as it is split into six flats. There are currently 3x one bedroom flats, 2x two bedroom flats and 1x three bedroom flat."
The ideal family home. Located on a quiet no through road in Cyncoed this four bedroom detached house boasts plenty of space for all the family inside and out. The peaceful and private garden as well as double garage are all fantastic benefits to this much loved home
FOUR DOUBLE-BEDROOM DETACHED home with a huge OPEN PLAN LIVING AREA stretching width of property as well as a SEPARATE LOUNGE. The first floor includes TWO EN-SUITE BEDROOMS.
The Beeches is one of three family homes created from this beautifully restored 19th century property on The Orchards development in 2017. This charming 4/5 bedroom home combines the very best aspects of a traditional looking facade and modern living to create the perfect home. The accommodation ...
"Beech View is striking in design and is an undeniably impressive five bedroom, semi-detached family home. Set over three floors it is a generously proportioned home of real quality and character. Beech View is one of three family homes beautifully restored from the original property on The Orch..."
"***PONTCANNA LIVING***BEAUTIFULLY REFURBISHED*** This outstanding mid-terraced, three bedroom house is the ever popular neighbourhood of Pontcanna. It has been completely refurbished and made ready for a new owner to move straight in to. The property is close to a number of cafes, restau..."
"An impressive, traditional five bedroom, semi detached period residence, situated on one of the most desirable roads in Whitchurch. Built at the turn of the last century, circa 1915, this substantial family home has the benefit of marvellous original features including, detailed tiled flooring, w..."
"Sold With No Chain - Generous Four Bedroom Detached Family Home With Garage and Driveway Parking. This exceptional home offers three reception rooms, kitchen, cloakroom, four bedrooms, family bathroom and en suite to the master bedroom. Huge protentional for further development subject to planning."
"A modern and extended Four Double Bedroom family home positioned on a quiet Cul-de-sac in Lisvane. This property boasts 4 bedrooms, 3 reception rooms and open plan kitchen/family area. Set in a generous plot the property is close to local amenities and local rail links to Cardiff Centre. "
"A super, bay-fronted, chain-free house in a oh-so-trendy corner of Pontcanna. This handsome home has an entrance hall, through living-dining room, and a traditional-style kitchen that completes the ground floor accommodation. Upstairs is a split-level landing with pitch pine exposed floorboards, ..."
"A most elegant and imposing five bedroom double fronted hall to hall end terrace residence of character, Edwardian in age and occupying a prime position fronting Morlais Street, a cul de sac just a few minutes walk to Roath Park Flower Gardens. Stunning gardens, larger than average."
"Substantial four bedroom detached family home sat in a fantastic plot, ideal for further development into something quite special"
"A beautifully extended five bedroom detached Georgian style house in a quiet and private residential road, with a stunning open plan 25 FT x 19 FT Sigma 3 open plan kitchen, dining room and family room overlooking south facing rear gardens. Three bathrooms, home office 7 lounge."
"No Chain - A unique investment opportunity, purpose built block of four occupied flats consisting of two, two bedrooms and two one bedrooms over two floors with an income of £2990."
"*Edwards & Co are delighted to offer this fantastic five bedroom semi detached family home in Rhiwbina* This property boasts generous living accommodation with traditional features throughout in the highly sought after area in Rhiwbina. It has five excellent size bedrooms, two well presented ..."
"A modern detached property positioned towards the end of a cul-de-sac, located within easy walking distance of Roath Park Lake and being only a stone’s throw from Lakeside Primary School, as well as being in the school catchment for Cardiff High School. The nearest train station (Heath Halt..."
"A beautifully presented, extended, four bedroom semi-detached house on the sought after Cyncoed Road."
"COMING SOON! A fantastic opportunity to secure a detached home in this sought-after residential area available with no onward chain. Renovated and refurbished to a high standard this property would be a perfect family home, a short distance to amenities, schools and public transport link..."
" A deceptively large, four double bedroom detached house in an enviable position with outstanding panoramic views over the river, parkland and the City from the rear, in this quiet close of similar high quality homes. Highfields is a quiet residential street with the well regarded Welsh P (cont.)"
An exceptional opportunity to create four contemporary detached dwellings benefitting from excellent access to Cardiff City but also a range of local amenities and attractions including Castell Coch.
"Exclusive new-build development of 2 detached dwellings in a sought after residential location and within close proximity to local amenities, public transport links, the Taff Trail and access roads for the A470 & M4 Motorway. Completion due for December 2022. "
"A large and impressive four double bedroom family home, tucked away at the top of a small select and quiet close, with very private gardens, ample private parking, and well designed living space including four reception rooms and two bathrooms. Executive style with a stunning location."
"REDUCED PRICE FOR LIMITED PERIOD ONLY!!! Mathews Estate Agents are delighted to offer this impressive executive modern four bedroom detached property set back from the road in a select cul-de-sac location in the very popular area of St.Fagans, Cardiff. The property has beautiful, landscaped..."
"MGY are pleased to offer this superb residential development opportunity comprising four building plots situated on the outskirts of Cardiff on Mill Road, Tongwynlais, The proposed development is offered with FULL PLANNING PERMISSION (subject to signing the S106) (planning no. 21/01258/MNR) for f..."
"Beautifully presented and spacious Victorian style bay fronted ‘eye catching’ detached residence, retaining charm and character, situated in a highly sought after location, a short distance from Llanishen ‘Park & Ride’ railway station, Llanishen village shopping centre..."
"FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOME with INTEGRAL DOUBLE GARAGE, extensive FAMILY/KITCHEN/DINING ROOM and SEPARATE LOUNGE. Includes EN-SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM, DOWNSTAIRS CLOAKS and SEPARATE UTILITY."
"New, stylish and rare exciting development of 9 stunning luxury apartments in a secure gated development with under croft parking, a few minutes walk to Roath Park Lake, all local amenities, University Hospital of Wales, with excellent highway links to M4, A48 and A470 being within Cardiff High &..."
"A stylish and completely modernised family home, proudly positioned on Kings Road, this excellent home is nestled in between Pontcanna and Canton which offer an abundance of coffee houses, eateries and boutique independent shops all within a short stroll. Behind the handsome Victorian b..."
"An exceptional property that has been updated to an immaculate standard throughout and is perfectly suited for modern living. This generously proportioned bungalow is located in the popular area of Lisvane and occupying a prime cul-du-sac position with a generous, private plot. This wonderful pro..."
"Rarely available, we are delighted to offer for sale this stunning four bedroom detached property, ideally located in a quiet cul-de-sac in the highly sought after area of Lisvane. The property is a short walk from the local train station with regular services into the city centre, and local amen..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this charming 4 bedroom detached family home ideally located on Thornhill Road. The current owners have transformed the property by creating a mezzanine floor extension that is currently used as a utility room, storage area, office and garage. This wonderful space h..."
"A modern, extended large style detached property positioned at the end of a cul-de-sac off a private driveway just off Lisvane Road and just a short walk to Lisvane village and Llanishen train station as well as bus routes to the city centre and in the school catchment for Lisvane Primary School...."
FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME!!
"This detached four bedroom dormer bungalow is located in the highly sought after area of Cyncoed. Within minutes walk of amenities, Roath park and Nant Fawr woods nearby as well as public transport links, and heath high level train station. The property is conveniently sited for Rhydypenau Primar..."
NO ONWARD CHAIN! A semi detached FOUR BEDROOM townhouse situated in the popular location of ST MELLONS within easy access to the A48/M4 access corridor. The property further benefits enclosed rear garden and separate garage. Internal viewing highly recommended!
"A wonderful semi detached family home located in the sought after 'Saints' area of Heath, close to local amenities and transport links as well as the University Hospital of Wales only a short walk away. Links to the A48 and M4 are easily accessible, perfect for commuting and with Heath Park nearb..."
"*Detached three bed bungalow in Whitchurch* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this generous bungalow with extensive plot. The property boasts spacious accommodation, detached garage and picturesque gardens. OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN. MUST BE VIEWED"
*Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this fantastic four bedroom semi-detached house in Rhiwbina* *Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this fantastic four bedroom semi-detached house in Rhiwbina* This wonderful family home in a highly sought after location offers genero...
"**FANTASTIC WATER VIEWS* DUPLEX PENTHOUSE APARTMENT* NO CHAIN** A superb three bedroom, seventh floor duplex apartment in the popular waterfront Bayscape development, within Cardiff Marina. The spacious accommodation over two floors, comprises of entrance hall, open plan lounge/kitchen/diner and ..."
"A three bedroom detached bungalow offering versatile living with potential to adapt and extend to the side and rear or create another floor (Planning has been approved). Set back on a wide plot with ample parking, open aspect and with a large private rear garden."
"*Detached four bedroom family home in Rhiwbina* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this incredibly spacious and beautifully presented four bedroom property with generous accommodation, picturesque gardens and off road driveway parking. MUST BE VIEWED"
"A spacious five bedroom house providing 2050 square feet, extensive private parking, three spaciouis living rooms, two bathrooms, available with no onward chain. See Inside."
"MGY are delighted to offer for sale this four bedroom detached property in the sought after area of Penylan. The property briefly comprises of hallway, lounge, dining room, cloakroom, kitchen, utility room, storage room, second reception room, four bedroom, two en-suites and family bathroom. An ..."
"**ATTENTION INVESTORS** A beautifully appointed investment opportunity consisting of three flats, 2 one bedroom ground floor flats and a 2 bedroom first floor flat. Newly renovated and finished to a high specification throughout this would make an ideal investment. Situated on this sou..."
"A super size extended five bedroom double fronted detached family home fronting a select close, and benefiting a deep private drive, a very private enclosed south facing rear garden, and a detached double garage. Stunning modern 2017 21'6 FT open plan kitchen & breakfast room."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this modern detached family home situated in a quiet cul-de-sac development known as Nant-y-Fedw. The accommodation briefly comprises entrance hall, cloakroom/WC, living room, open plan kitchen/diner, utility room, four bedrooms, two en-suites an..."
Residential development opportunity in a prominent location in the heart of Llanishen occupying a quarter of an acre plot with planning permission granted for 2 detached dwellings. 
"A large, detached modern property positioned on a corner within a select cul-de-sac off Lisvane Road, just a short walk to Llanishen train station, bus links to the city centre as well as Llanishen village shops. Entrance hallway, cloakroom/WC, large lounge, dining room, 23ft kitchen/breakfast ro..."
"JeffreyRoss are proud to bring to market this impressive 3 double bedroom terrace property in the heart of Penylan. The is immaculately presented and still boasts many original features. The property briefly comprises impressive entrance hallway, bay front living room, open plan. Kitchen, dining..."
"**DETACHED FAMILY HOME** A generous size property in need of modernisation but offering bright and spacious rooms comprising entrance hall, cloakroom, lounge, separate dining room, kitchen/diner, utility room, master bedroom with en-suite, three further bedrooms, family bathroom and a good size f..."
**LAUNCH DAY - SATURDAY 18TH MARCH - BY APPOINTMENT ONLY** This stunning three storey Victorian home is located within a short stroll of the City Centre and the heart of Pontcanna. The house has a variety of original period features which are blended with a modern contemporary look to the ki...
"Rarely available we have an outstanding example of an incredible apartment, in the heart of Cyncoed, perfectly suited for modern living. This stunning property is located in a secure and private gated development Denstone Court. There are so many features to make this an essential property to vie..."
"This superb four bedroom detached property is located in the sought after area of Thornhill, close to amenities and within walking distance of both primary and high schools this would make a fantastic family home. The stylish and spacious accommodation briefly comprises an entrance hall, cloakroo..."
"A large kitchen dining area and separate study, the Manford 4 bedroom home has plenty of space for the family."
"** RECENTLY REFURBISHED ** SPACIOUS DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH LARGE DETACHED GARDEN ROOM ** A delightful, recently refurbished three bedroom detached bungalow in the sought after area of Radyr, being a short distance from Radyr Golf Club, other local amenities and transport links. The property comp..."
"Perfect for a budding Pontcana owner-operator or an investment opportunity, This incredibly well-presented property comprises ground floor shop premises of approx. 47 sq m currently let on a 'pop-up' basis for an initial three-month period for £1250 pm, beautifully complemented by a stun..."
A beautifully presented four-bedroom semi-detached property. Can be lived in as a three-bedroom property with an annex or four-bedroom family home. Located in a highly sought-after area of the 'Saints' in Heath. Offering good access to local amenities and transport links as well as the University...
"A large and impressive detached four bedroom family house, tucked away in a select close with lovely outlooks across a tree lined park. Capacious living space including four reception rooms, four double sized bedrooms and three bathrooms! Detached double garage, must be seen!"
Beautifully finished three bedroom new build house with bespoke finishing located in the highly desirable Pontcanna area.This stunning terrace property is located less than a mile from the city centre and comes with a share of the freehold and parking space.
Beautifully finished three bedroom new build house with bespoke finishing located in the highly desirable Pontcanna area.
"*** Guide Price £580,000 - £590,000 *** An extended and uniquely designed family home, located in this quiet Street in Cyncoed. This property has an open plan contemporary feel throughout, with an open entrance way, a through lounge diner, leading to an open kitchen diner, with high spec fitted ..."
THREE BEDROOM DETACHED home with SPACIOUS OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/FAMILY AREA and a LARGE SEPARATE LOUNGE. An EN-SUITE to EVERY BEDROOM and a walk-in wardrobe to the master.
"Perfectly positioned - in the hub of the incredibly sought after area Pontcanna, this four bedroom property is nestled between an abundance of coffee houses, eateries and boutique independent shops and Pontcanna fields, Bute park and the city centre of Cardiff are all within reach easily on foot...."
Are you looking for a family home in Old St Mellons? This fantastic 4 bedroom detached property has everything to offer. Call us on to schedule a viewing!
**LAUNCH DAY - SATURDAY 25TH MARCH - BY APPOINTMENT ONLY** This bay fronted home is located adjacent to Thompsons Park and would be ideal for someone who likes period features. With four bedrooms it would be perfect for a family or someone who may need to work from home. The acco...
Must Be Viewed! At A Private Cul De Sac Off Western Avenue And Located Close To The Facilities Of Llandaff Village Together With A Selection Of Schools Can Be Found This Very Well Presented Improved And Extended Light And Airy Traditional Built Bay Fronted Semi Detached House Making An Ideal Fami...
An immaculate extended four double bedroom semi-detached family home located in Llandaff. The bi-folding doors connect the generous rear garden from the open plan kitchen/diner/living space with plenty of natural light from the large glass doors. This stylish yet homely property has bee...
"Sitting on a slightly elevated position with a sweeping driveway is this spacious, modern and very well presented, three double bedroom detached house. Pennant Crescent is a quiet position and within the Catchment area for Cardiff High School. No Chain."
"A deceptively large, four double bedroom detached house set on a good size corner plot at the end of this quiet close of similar high quality homes. Highfields is a particularly sought after residential street with a well regarded Welsh Primary School at one end and only a short walk to Llan (cont.)"
"**BEAUTIFUL FIVE BEDROOM HOME** Martin & Co are extremely pleased to offer this elegant sizeable family home. Situated on the popular road of Albany Road, with great transport links and local amenities. Proudly boasting five reception rooms with some original features, a separate modern fitte..."
"*Semi detached four bed family home in Pantmawr* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this incredibly spacious and beautifully presented four bed property with generous accommodation, large gardens and off road driveway parking. MUST BE VIEWED"
"An opportunity to acquire this delightful three bedroom property with garage converted to private dwelling with en-suite ideal for generational living or Airbnb. The property briefly comprises of hallway, lounge, dining room, kitchen, utility room, wc, three bedrooms and bathroom. The converted g..."
"A substantial, well-maintained, and extended house well situated in a quiet tree-lined cul de sac. This excellent family home benefits from an enviable position, tucked away in Turberville Place, a hidden gem of Pontcanna, that enjoys a favorable location within easy walking distance for all of ..."
"A perfect investment opportunity situated within a highly desirable location, offering an immediate income of £36,120 pa. (With a review bringing the income in excess of £40,000) Located within easy reach of the City Centre, university campuses and local amenities, including Roath Park, ..."
"A large and impressive four double bedroom semi-detached Tucker built 1930's family home, fronting delightful Waterloo Road, a quiet and tree lined wide and private residential road. Impressive living space with an 18'0 x 18'0 master bedroom complete with stylish ensuite shower room."
"A truly stunning capacious four bedroom greatly extended semi-detached family house with beautiful landscaped gardens and a superb luxury summer house/home office. Magnificent bespoke 27 Ft x 15 FT kitchen & dining room, 17 Ft lounge, two utility rooms, outstanding loft conversion with ensuite."
"**GUIDE PRICE - £565,000-£590,000** Occupying this substantial plot is this imposing four bedroom semi detached home. The accommodation comprises: a sizeable entrance hall, bay fronted living room, sitting room, kitchen, utility room and wc on the ground floor and to the first fl..."
"Stunning 4 bedroom family home in the heart of Whitchurch. The property has been fully renovated to an extremely high standard, providing spacious modern living. Fantastic open plan kitchen diner leading to gardens. Off road parking with garage. Quiet road in highly desirable location."
Beautifully finished three bedroom new build house with bespoke finishing located in the highly desirable Pontcanna area.The stunning property is located less than a mile from the city centre and comes with a share of the freehold.
"Set on a new development just 15 minutes' from CARDIFF CITY CENTRE, the Oak features a detached GARAGE, generous living room, OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining area with UTILITY and BREAKFAST BAR, a dedicated STUDY, and an EN-SUITE to bedroom 1."
"PLOT 583 THE SHAFTESBURY is our HOME OF THE WEEK and includes as STANDARD fitted wardrobes to the main bedroom, an upgraded kitchen and quartz worktop together with turf to the rear garden. This FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED home with its SPACIOUS INTERIOR including LARGE SEPARATE LOUNGE and OPEN PLAN..."
One Bedroom first flat retirement flat in the heart of Llanishen village. This popular retirement home offers communal areas for residence to enjoy with very well kept communal gardens also. Sold With No Chain.
THREE BEDROOM HOME with and EN-SUITE TO EACH along with a WALK-IN DRESSING ROOM to the master. Ground floor boasts an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM along with SEPARATE UTILITY and CLOAKS ROOM as well as a SEPARATE LOUNGE and INTEGRAL GARAGE.
"A beautifully presented, modern, four bedroom detached house in this elevated position overlooking woods adjoining Cardiff Golf Club. Within catchment area for Cardiff High School."
"An immaculate family home in a sought after location. This home is located on the St Lythans Estate in the Vale of Glamorgan, built 6 years ago to an extremely high standard, you are sure to be impressed."
"Situated within walking distance of Cyncoed village a sizeable quality three double bedroom ground floor garden apartment set within a block of two with separate entrances and a good size rear garden, solely for the use of the ground floor, off road parking, a long lease and no ongoing chain."
"A beautifully presented 4 bedroom detached family home ideally situated in the popular cul de sac, Cambourne Avenue. The current owners have transformed the property to create a superb family home that offer spacious accommodation throughout and benefits from a renewed kitchen, bathroom, Worceste..."
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to bring to the market this spacious 5 bedroom detached family home in a sought after location in Llanishen. In brief the property comprises entrance hallway. kitchen dining, family room. living room, utility room and ground floor WC. To the first floor master bedroom with..."
A beautifully presented four bedroom detached bungalow situated on Yorath Road in Whitchurch. The current owners have enjoyed this wonderful home for nearly 30 years and have taken great pride in maintaining the property to a very high standard. The property benefits from a sizeable rear extensio...
"A spacious, freehold, extended, detached bungalow situated in this popular position within walking distance of the village. No Chain. Early possession available."
"BACK ONTO THE MARKET is this Stylish and beautifully presented double fronted and extended semi-detached family residence. Set over approximately 1,517 SQFT makes this considerable larger than most in the area with options still to extend further. The property was built around 1990 on a prominen..."
Are you looking for something unique? A home that’ll be a cut above the rest? Marquess Court is a stunning development of nine self-contained luxury apartments occupying one of Cardiff's most desirable locations
"A well-proportioned modern detached property in a select popular cul-de-sac location, just a stone’s throw from Lisvane/Thornhill train station as well as being a short drive to Sainsbury’s Thornhill supermarket and within the school catchment for Lisvane Primary School. Generous cent..."
Three Apartments Left To Purchase! Are you looking for something unique? A home that’ll be a cut above the rest? Marquess Court is a stunning development of nine self-contained luxury apartments occupying one of Cardiff's most desirable locations.
"A rare opportunity to acquire a traditional, substantial detached family home with no onward chain, situated within a stone's throw of Thompsons Park. This is a wonderful location for families and couples who would like to be part of a friendly community & be within easy walking distance to a var..."
"**Great Investment Opportunity** We are delighted to offer this great investment opportunity in the ever popular Roath, Cardiff. These two semi-detached houses on the same plot of land are currently tenanted achieving £1100pcm each with the current tenants. The mirror image of (cont.)"
"New, stylish and rare exciting development of 9 stunning luxury apartments in a secure gated development with under croft parking, a few minutes walk to Roath Park Lake, all local amenities, University Hospital of Wales, with excellent highway links to M4, A48 and A470 being within Cardiff High S..."
"* GUIDE PRICE £550,000 - £600,000 * DETACHED FAMILY HOME * FOUR BEDROOMS * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * KITCHEN/DINER * TWO EN-SUITES * FAMILY BATHROOM * SUBSTANTIAL GARDEN * EXTENSIVE DRIVEWAY * GARAGE"
"We are delighted to present to market this well proportioned four bedroom detached family home, ideally situated on a quiet road in this desirable development in Lisvane, within close proximity to amenities and transport links, as well as the train station with fast service into Cardiff City cent..."
"** RARELY AVAILABLE DETACHED AND EXTENDED REDROW HOME ** MGY are delighted to offer this four bedroom detached Redrow home on the development of Awel Y Garth, Pentyrch with beautiful views over the Garth mountain and only a short walk to the village. The accommodation briefly comprises entrance h..."
"This superior top floor two bedroom luxury apartment is located in the prestigious Park View apartments above the Park Plaza Hotel, convenient to all that Cardiff City centre has to offer. The apartment has two large South facing terrace's with far reaching views overlooking the city centre and ..."
"A perfect investment opportunity situated within a highly desirable location, offering an immediate income of £34,500. Fully let giving a current annual return of 6.2%
Located within easy reach of the City Centre, university campuses and local amenities, including Roat..."
"A super sized three bedroom fully extended traditional bay fronted family home, with a large open plan 27 FT kitchen and dining room as well as three further reception rooms and two stylish modem bathrooms. Lovely location in a quiet road with beautiful landscaped gardens. Must be seen!"
"Northwood are proud to introduce this handsome four-bedroom, detached family home on the quaint and leafy Fairbrook Close in Rhiwbina. The setting is truly elegant with the property located at the end of a quiet cul-de-sac with a beautiful stream running past at the rear. The walk to Rhiwbina ..."
"A beautiful, much loved three bedroom bay fronted semi detached home (originally a four bedroom house, fourth bedroom currently a dressing room). The accommodation comprises: entrance hall with original tiled floor, open plan living/dining room with parquet flooring, sitting room, shower room and..."
PLOT 87 - A TWO DOUBLE BED END OF TERRACE HOME LOCATED ON THE POPULAR ASPEN GROVE DEVELOPMENT. DESIGNED WITH ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGER POINT AND LOW CARBON TECHNOLOGY HELPING YOU SAVE MONEY ON YOUR UTILITY BILLS
"A large four bedroom detached house with modern decor throughout and a plot of land to the front in the quiet residential area of Hastings Crescent, close to St Johns college."
"A bay fronted 4 bedroom Victorian terraced house located on this sought after road in the heart of Pontcanna, adjacent to both Llandaff fields and Bute Park as well as the independent shops, public houses and excellent street cafes and restaurants of the area. The accommodation briefly comprises ..."
"A substantial detached five bedroom family house, tucked away in a small select close, away from passing traffic, and available with no chain. Well designed with three living rooms and two bathrooms. 1700 square feet. Surrounding secluded sizeable corner plot garden, See Inside."
"An absolutely sublime bay-fronted house ideally situated just off Llandaff fields in uber-cool Pontcanna. This light bright and airy property has been completely transformed by the current owners to an exceptional standard. Reconfigured accommodation includes a beautiful bay-fronted living room, ..."
"Situated in the heart of Rhiwbina village this freehold 3 double bedroom, 3 reception room detached house with southerly/westerly facing gardens was constructed approximately 25 years ago in the style of, and using materials, to conform to the conservation area status of Rhiwbina Garden Village. "
"**LUXURY AND RARE FIVE BEDROOM HOME** Martin & Co are delighted to offer this modern and generous detached home. Situated in the new village of St Edeyrns, this property was newly built in June 2022 and must be viewed to be appreciated. Boasting fantastic scenic views and located in a quiet c..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 6 MONTHS^*** Set on a new development just 15 minutes' from CARDIFF CITY CENTRE, the Ash is a beautiful family home featuring a detached GARAGE, DUAL-ASPECT living room, OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining area with UTILITY, a dedicated STUDY."
" ** RENOVATION OPPORTUNITY - POTENTIAL TO CONVERT TO A DETACHED FAMILY HOME ** CURRENTLY TWO MAISONETTES ** DRIVEWAY & DOUBLE GARAGE ** Located in the desirable village of Pentyrch, an opportunity to acquire a detached dwelling which is currently two spacious maisonettes being both ground and..."
FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED home with a SPACIOUS INTERIOR including LARGE SEPARATE LOUNGE and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM. First floor boasts 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS with an EN-SUITE to the master.
"A large six bedroom detached family home providing versatile living space, ideal for a growing family, and suitable for two generation living. With exceptional living space including four reception rooms and two bathrooms, this is very much a forever home. Must be seen!"
"Impressive penthouse apartment in Cardiff City Centre with two brilliant terraces & panoramic city views. This fabulous property offers superb modern living with a generous open plan living room/kitchen, two excellent size bedrooms each with an ensuite, a guest room, cloakroom & underground parking."
** SPACIOUS DETACHED BUNGALOW ** IMMACULATELY PRESENTED ** SOUTH-WESTERLY FACING GARDEN ** Fully furnished to a high standard with quality fixtures and fittings. Situated in the popular residential area of Radyr close to all local amenities and good road links to the A470 and M4 motorway. This st...
"* GUIDE PRICE £530,000 - £540,000 * A beautifully presented & spacious period property for sale, located In Roath Park. This impressive home has fantastic accommodation over three floors, with a bright entrance hall, lounge diner, open plan kitchen diner breakfast room, utility room and WC to..."
"**IMMACULATE CITY CENTRE PENTHOUSE APARTMENT* NO CHAIN** MGY are pleased to present for sale an impressive city centre penthouse apartment, in the highly sought after development, Park View. Located in the heart of the city centre. The modern property offers spacious living accommodation with two..."
"A beautifully presented, bay fronted Edwardian terrace home. The accommodation comprises a perfect blend of original features and modern living. To the ground floor is an entrance hall with original Terrazzo floor, bay fronted living room with exposed floorboards and a fireplace, sitting room wit..."
"Behind this handsome Victorian façade is this immaculately designed three double-bedroom house in the heart of Pontcanna. Fairleigh Road is a quiet street, set back from Cathedral Road and is a stone's throw from Pontcanna Playing Fields and the beautiful Taff Trail. The area known for vogue coff..."
Tastefully renovated and extended semi-detached 4-bedroom family home in the heart of Whitchurch village.
"*Immaculately presented and incredibly spacious four bed detached family home in Pentyrch* Edwards and Co are delighted to offer for sale this enviably located, detached home. Boasting large plot, garage and off road driveway parking. MUST BE VIEWED"
"A beautiful four double bedroom semi detached family home. The spacious accommodation comprises: entrance porch opening to entrance hall, wc, two sitting rooms, living room, dining room and modern fitted kitchen with integrated appliances on the ground floor and there are four double bedrooms wit..."
"A spacious modern double fronted four bedroom extended house, with large and lovely private corner gardens fronting a quiet tree lined road, away from busy passing traffic. Lovely location with good access to Llanishen Village and Schools. 25 FT lounge & dining room plus a PVC conservatory."
"A beautifully improved spacious four bedroom detached family home with four reception rooms, a stylish new kitchen and breakfast room, two stunning new bathrooms and a good family sized level rear garden."
beautifully presented three bedroom detached family home
"Located in a quiet cul-de-sac adjacent to the lovely Thompson's Park, this rare link-detached house built in the early 1980's comprises accommodation of Hallway, cloakroom/W.C, large living room, dining room, sun room with space for family living area, fitted kitchen. To the first floor are 4 bed..."
"** DETACHED MODERN FAMILY HOME IN PENTYRCH ** VILLAGE LOCATION ** WITH SUPERB VIEWS ** MGY are delighted to offer this immaculately presented four bedroom detached Redrow home on the development of Awel y Garth, Pentyrch with beautiful views over the Garth mountain. The accommodation briefly comp..."
"Guide Price £525,000 - £550,000. Superb detached dormer bungalow which has been completely refurbished and extended by the present owners, and situated in a much sought after location. The substantial accommodation comprises entrance hall, sitting room, impressive lounge/ kitchen/ diner..."
"An excellent investment opportunity to acquire a recently converted block of apartments located close to Cardiff City Centre, attracting both young professionals and students. Currently let with an income in excess of £35,000 giving a healthy return of 6.5%!"
"The Sales Station are pleased to bring to the market this much loved semi-detached family home, which has been extended to the side to provide spacious accommodation over two floors. The property is located in a sought-after area and is conveniently situated within the catchment area for Lakeside..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this substantial 3 bedroom semi-detached family home located on St Margarets Place in Whitchurch. Offered for sale for the first time in over 42 years, this larger than average property has superb potential to create a modern and spacious family home. The property b..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £525,000 - £550,000 ** We are pleased to offer for sale this charming period home, located just off Ninian rd in Roath Park. This spacious 4 bedroom, 3 rec room home, has a host of original features, and still offers so much potential to expose more. The accommodation woul..."
"*Extended five bed semi detached family home in Rhiwbina* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this incredibly spacious and very well presented five bed property with generous living accommodation, a modern open plan fully fitted kitchen/family room, well presented gardens and off roa..."
"Attractive, generously proportioned double fronted extended detached bungalow, within the catchment area of Cardiff High School and Rhydypenau Primary, a few minutes’ walk to all local amenities including Rhydypenau shopping centre, Heath Halt High and Low Level railway stations, bus routes..."
"A beautifully presented five bedroom, bay fronted semi-detached property situated in a popular area within a short distance of the amenities in Rhiwbina and Whitchurch villages. With easy access to both the University Hospital Of Wales and City Centre, A470 and M4 along with primary and secondary..."
"A truly impressive larger design executive style four bedroom family house, providing extensive and versatile living space and occupying a delightful position tucked away in a quiet and select private residential cul de sac, away from passing traffic, and benefiting a large and landscaped garden."
"* NEWLY FITTED SOLAR PANELS & BATTERY * FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM DETACHED ** LARGE PLOT ** DETACHED GARAGE * A well presented four double bedroom detached family home situated on a large plot in the popular area of Danescourt being a short distance from many local amenities such as shops, doctors,..."
A five bedroom detached family home occupying a quiet position on the popular Bassetts Field development in Thornhill. This modern and well-appointed home was first built in 2003 by Barratt Homes and has been very well maintained by the current owner. This spacious property briefly comprises of a...
The Midford is a popular 4 bedroom home that is suited to growing families or professional couples.
"A stunning three bedroom larger style house of character, occupying a tranquil position at the far end of quiet and select tree lined Westville Road. Beautiful fittings with generous living space. Contemporary Log burner in a super sized lounge, fully tanked basement cellar, so many features."
Four/Five bedroom detached Dorma bungalow
We are pleased to offer for sale this superb detached family home. It has many adaptable rooms over 2 floors including an optional 5 bedrooms. There are views across to Castell Coch and a lovely landscaped garden to the rear. The property is situated in a popular but quiet location within easy st...
"**PONTCANNAS HIDDEN GEM WITH OFF ROAD PARKING!** MGY are delighted to bring to market this beautiful, recently renovated cottage style home within the heart of Pontcanna. The property offers contemporary living with a modern twist and has retained beautiful original features. From the two log bur..."
"The Perfect Family Home, A Double Bay Fronted Period Style House With A Wealth Of Accommodation Over Three Floors! We are delighted to offer for sale this attractive terraced house, in a highly sought after location next to Cardiff City Centre."
"Tucked away in the corner of this quirt cul de sac in Danescourt this this imposing four bedroom detached house placed on a fantastic size plot with a double garage. Tastefully presented throughout and finished to a high standard, this really would make the perfect family home. The light..."
"An opportunity to acquire a detached two storey house currently designed as two self contained two bedroom flats, with large and level surrounding gardens, a private entrance drive and a detached double garage. With alterations this property could be converted into a family home."
"An outstanding opportunity to secure a chain-free house in the center of Pontcanna boasting a lovely garden and garage. This substantial family home is well placed between Llandaff Fields and the plentiful shops, coffee shops, and boutiques of fashionable Pontcanna. Accommodation is ready to tran..."
PRIME LOCATION IN PENYLAN. Ideal family home with generous rooms. Prime location in Penylan. Walking distance to amenities including Waterloo Gardens. Period features throughout with the benefits of modern comforts. Three Reception Rooms. Marlborough Primary and Cardiff High Catchment. ...
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** Substantial investment HMO. This large and spacious, eight let house (eight double rooms), offers excellent potential for investor. Currently eight rooms rented out and the property is well maintained. The accommodation comprises; entrance hall, b..."
**GREAT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** MGY are delighted to bring to market this corner property situated close to Thompson Park and local facilities. This property is currently converted into 5 self contained apartments which are a combination of studio's and one bedrooms. The majority of the apartmen...
"*Modern and spacious four bed detached bungalow in Rhiwbina* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this spacious and beautifully presented property in the sought after area of Rhiwbina. This property boasts generous living accommodation, four good size bedrooms, a modern open plan kitc..."
FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED home with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING FAMILY area and a SEPARATE LOUNGE and an EN-SUITE MASTER BEDROOM.
"Impressively large Four Bedroom semi-detached home. This property comprises of 2 large reception rooms, large kitchen, 4 bedrooms and lovely gardens with rear access. Wooden parquet flooring, gas central heating and UPVC double and triple glazing. Stylish and modern with easy access to City Centre."
"** A DETACHED EXTENDED FIVE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME ** An exceptional five bedroom detached residence situated in a quiet cul-de-sac in Maes Y Fioled, Morganstown which sits in a prominent position with elevated views over beautiful parkland. The accommodation briefly comprises hallway, lounge, dini..."
"A much-loved family home ready for its next exciting chapter. This prominent semi-detached residence is perfectly situated within a highly desirable pocket of Cyncoed, firmly set within the Cardiff High School catchment, subject to admissions. You'll enjoy spacious living, with a fantast..."
"** FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED COTTAGE WITH HUGE POTENTIAL ** SITS WITHIN 0.67 ACRES ** PRIVATE DRIVEWAY ** A fantastic opportunity to acquire this unique 4 bedroom detached cottage which sits within 0.67 acres of gardens and only 5 miles from Cardiff City Centre, surrounded by beautiful countryside in..."
"Located in a quiet street adjacent to Pontcanna Fields, and close to the many attractions of the area, including artisan shops, excellent restaurants, coffee shops and public houses, farmers and street food markets. Cardiff City Centre is within walking distance via Sophia gardens and for cyclis..."
"**BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED 5 BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE** Martin & Co are delighted to offer this stylish and spacious property, located in the popular St Edeyrns.
This newly built ´The Strand´ style property benefits from a NHBC guarantee and contemporary designed living space perfect for..."
"JeffreyRoss are proud to bring to the market this exceptional Duplex, Penthouse apartment located in the popular Century Wharf development in Cardiff Bay. This stylish apartment briefly comprises Entrance hallway, Large double bedroom with access to the first balcony, modern fitted bathroom, open..."
"We are delighted to offer a spacious family home situated on a quiet residential street, close to Victoria Park. The property consists of a spacious entrance hallway with parquet woodblock flooring which continues throughout the living room. A open plan lounge/dining room leading onto the garden..."
FABULOUS FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME!
"A modern style detached property in need of modernisation, positioned on a wider-than-average plot, perfect for extending (subject to Planning Consent and Building Regulations), located on a quiet road, just a short walk to Roath Park Lake and Lakeside shops as well as being in the school catchm..."
"INVESTOR HEAVEN! This substantial and well presented three storey HMO property is within close proximity to Cardiff City Centre. An ideal purchase for any shrewd buyer looking to expand their portfolio in this sought after location, producing circa 7.6% gross yield when fully occupied."
Beautifully finished two bedroom new build apartment with bespoke finishing located in the highly desirable Pontcanna area.
** STUNNING FIVE BEDROOM HOME WITH THREE RECEPTION ROOMS ** THREE BATHROOMS ** SOUTH FACING GARDEN ** A truly immaculate five bedroom detached family home with three reception rooms and South facing garden situated in the popular area of St. Fagans. This property is beautifully presented througho...
"**BEAUTIFUL FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM HOME** Martin & Co are delighted to offer this semi-detached family home. Situated in Llanishen, this beautiful property offers a versatile way of living. A stones throw to Llanishen Village, with great local amenities. Offering a generous reception room, moder..."
"Glenbeigh is a spacious double fronted four bedroom family house set back with a wide drive drive, and occupying a delightful position fronting a select close just off Tyr Winch Road, Old St Mellons. Beautifully appointed 22 FT 2019 stylish fitted kitchen, stunning conservatory."
"This generous sized three bedroom, mid terraced, bay fronted period property has undergone significant improvements by the current owners. It is situated on a pretty tree-lined road in this highly sought-after district to the east of Cardiff city centre. The property, which retains many orig..."
"Rarely available is this stunning example of a well proportioned family home, perfectly suited for modern living. This four bedroom detached property is located in a favourable, cul du sac position while benefitting from a generous corner plot. Full of potential and extended significantly, this p..."
"A bright and modern four bedroom detached house, with good sized level enclosed gardens, a double drive, a larger style garage and a PVC double glazed conservatory. With a 24 FT open plan kitchen and dining room, a 14 Ft lounge and two bathrooms, this impressive home must be seen!"
"A well presented detached property, situated in the popular area of Cyncoed and perfectly suited for modern living. This spacious and well presented home offers three to four bedrooms and has a private plot in a cul-du-sac position. There are a number of features and benefits including an open pl..."
"Stunning Detached Two Bedroom Bungalow with a large open plan living and dining area. Set along a quiet road in Whitchurch this property benefits from Two Double bedrooms, bathroom, large open plan living, separate WC utility room and large garage. Gas central heating and double glazed windows."
"This well presented dormer bungalow is located in the sought after area of Rhiwbina, positioned within a quiet cul-de-sac and within easy reach of the amenities and schools of Rhiwbina and Whitchurch villages. Extended and greatly improved by the current owners this property offers versa..."
"**CALL FOR INCENTIVES** Cathedral Gardens offer a superb selection of 1, 2 and 3 bedroom apartments and three magnificent 4 bed townhouses. The 33 apartments are found across three distinctive buildings where the area's iconic Victorian Villas are both refurbished and reimagined into..."
"Our last ground floor apartment in Ty Cornel at Cathedral Gardens. A spacious, three bedroom with an independent entrance. Contact us to discuss the personalised incentives available."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 6 MONTHS^*** The Redwood benefits from a SINGLE GARAGE, OPEN-PLAN kitchen/breakfast area, a dedicated dining room, plus an EN-SUITE to bedroom 1. Ideally located just 15 minutes' drive from CARDIFF CITY CENTRE and 20 minutes from NEWPORT."
"MGY are delighted to offer for sale this rare opportunity to acquire a 3/4 bed detached property with exceptional gardens, in the sought after area of Birchgrove. The accommodation comprises entrance porch, sitting room, lounge / dining area, bedroom/ reception 3, spacious kitchen, bathroom and u..."
"AWARD WINNING DEVELOPMENT - 2022 - WINNER OF BEST TRANSFORMATION IN CARDIFF... Visit our magnificent collection of luxury apartments and townhouses to experience for yourself how location, design, and material can combine for the ultimate lifestyle. St James offers an impressive and rema..."
"Fantastic Investment opportunity! Traditional red brick freehold property converted into 4 flats of varying sizes including a 3-bedroom ground floor flat, 1 bedroom first floor and top floor flats and a studio flat on the ground floor Located in Cathays, Cardiff close to the many and varied local..."
"** EXTENDED FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED ** CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION ** A well presented four bedroom detached property in a sought after location. Accomodation briefly comprises entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen/breakfast/family room, utility room, cloakroom, sitting room/play room. To the first floor mast..."
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to bring to the market this sizeable and extended family home in the popular area of Heath, located on King George V Drive and opposite the university Hospital of Wales. The property offers plenty of potential as it is set in over 1,695 SQFT and has been rented to professi..."
A beautifully presented detached four bedroom family home situated in this popular location within easy access to the A48/M4 access corridor and close to both Cardiff and Newport City Centre. This four bedroom home has been updated throughout by the current owners and deserves internal inspection.
"This traditional, grade II listed, three bedroom semi-detached property is located in Rhiwbina village, perfect for those who want convenient amenities and transport links on their doorstep. Accommodation comprises entrance hall, dining room, living room, kitchen and a utility room to the ground ..."
"YOPA is proud to present this modern & stylish four-bedroom detached property in the sought-after country village of Pentyrch. Situated in an elevated position in a quiet cul-de-sac, please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Cardiff market. All offers & interest are invited."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this deceptively spacious 3 double bedroom detached bungalow in the popular location of St Margaret's Place in Whitchurch. The current owners resided at the property for over 25 years, the owners took great pride in maintaining the property and gardens. Recent impro..."
"A larger style 4-bed detached property positioned in a sought-after area of Pontprennau in a quiet cul-de-sac with a 5-minute walk to bus links to the city centre, short drives to an array of supermarkets as well easy access to the M4 junction 30 Cardiff Gate and within the school catchment for P..."
"*Superbly located and spacious detached bungalow in Whitchurch* Edwards and Co are delighted to offer for sale this generous and desirably located property with versatile single-storey accommodation, extensive gardens, detached garage and driveway parking. MUST BE VIEWED"
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - In the heart of Cathays, a commercial property comprising of six occupied rooms generating an income of £32,400 p/a. Offered with no onward chain. "
"An immaculate and beautifully presented three bedroom detached bungalow situated on Heol Gabriel in Whitchurch. The current owners have maintained the property to a very high standard with recent improvements that include a new roof, modern kitchen, bathrooms and renewed garage roof. This decept..."
"Extended and improved traditional bay-fronted semi-detached family home in a popular residential location within close proximity to all amenities, public transport links and local schools at primary and secondary levels. Internal viewing advised. "
"A very well presented, extended three bedroom semi-detached family home, situated in a sought after peaceful cul-de-sac position, offered to the market for the first time since its construction in 1926. This extended and lovingly maintained three bedroom semi-detached family home is offered th..."
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to bring to the market this exceptional four double bedroom, detached family residence with detached garage and driveway parking in the popular Mulberry Grove development by Charles Church in St Fagans. The property briefly comprises entrance hallway, Downstairs WC, good s..."
"This property is a newly renovated period family home and is a must see! The house comprises briefly of four bedrooms, two reception rooms, bathroom and a large kitchen/diner and large garden with rear access for possible off-road parking. Located in Penylan with beautiful period homes,..."
Here we have a brilliant investment opportunity on Pentyrch street in the Cathays area of Cardiff. This 7 bedroom property is situated a stones through from the New university building and currently rented for the academic year 2022 / 2023 at a monthly rental of £2695.00 equating to an ...
"***INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY***RARE TO MARKET***PRIME LOCATION*** This 7 bed HMO is currently rented for £2400pcm, situated right next door to the Cardiff University making this a very sought after location for students and prime piece of property to own! We recommend coming to vie..."
A stunning four-bedroom detached property situated within a highly desirable area of Morganstown.
"A superior double fronted beautifully extended semi-detached family residence, of generous proportions, situated in a popular and quiet avenue, within walking distance of Bro Edern Secondary School, local shops at Carisbrooke Way, bus routes, all local amenities with ease of access to A48/M4. Cen..."
"A large four bedroom detached property offering a spacious living area, four good size bedrooms, ensuite of master bedroom, family bathroom, double garage and conservatory. The property is further benefiting from a short drive to local amenities and superb transports links to the A4232, M4 and A48."
Isla-Alexander Property Experts are delighted to bring to the market this extended and improved four double-bedroom family home with garage situated in the popular Cardiff suburb of Pontprennau.
"Newly renovated, upgraded and extended - Four bedroom detached bungalow with off road parking and a detached garage. The home sits within a quiet residential area and offers two reception rooms, two bathrooms, modern kitchen/breakfast room, four spacious bedrooms and utility room/WC."
"Pine Tree Close is an impressive detached house nestled at the end of a small cul de sac and set back away from the street with a generous front driveway. Radyr is situated to the northwest of Cardiff offering reputable schools, a main village high street, a golf course and a train station along ..."
"Newly renovated from head to toe, this handsome property now stands the envy of its neighbours, eagerly awaiting a new family to call it home. Sympathetically modernised, the property retains many original features which have been lovingly restored, adding charm and character to this contempor..."
JeffreyRoss are proud to bring to the market this impressively sized 2 bedroom family home on the popular Llanfair Road in Pontcanna. This section of Llanfair road is renowned for benefiting from some of the largest gardens in the area that further benefit facing South. These large plots offer gr...
"**FANTASTIC CITY CENTRE DUPLEX APARTMENT* NO CHAIN** MGY are pleased to present for sale, a top floor duplex apartment with superb views over the City Centre. Accessed via lift or stairs the accommodation comprises; entrance hallway, spacious living/ dining room with access to large decked terrac..."
"A superb example of a semi-detached family home, located within the Lakeside and Cardiff High Catchment areas, and just a short stroll to the delightful gardens of Roath Park and Lake. This property offers generous accommodation which can only by appreciated by an internal viewing!"
"£460,000, Investment Property, Detached House Comprising Five Flats on Neville Street, Riverside, Cardiff, CF11 6LR"
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to bring onto the market this four bedroom, detached family home in the sought after location of Pontprennau. This spacious home briefly comprises storm entrance porch, entrance hallway, living room, family room, dining room, kitchen/breakfast room, sun room, utility room ..."
This unique detached property is a stones throw from the City Centre and Pontcanna. This is an ideal investment for anyone wanting a property in the heart of Cardiff
"A four bedroom detached double fronted bungalow, set back with a large block paved private in and out entrance drive, two separate living rooms, a kitchen and breakfast room, two bathrooms and a large and level enclosed sunny rear garden. Available with no Chain!"
"£450,000, Investment Opportunity, Three Recently Refurbished Self-Contained Flats in Ninian Park Road, Riverside, Cardiff, CF11 6JE"
"**Cardiff High School Catchment** A fantastic family home, offering a perfect opportunity to extend and improve, set within a highly desirable pocket of Penylan, nestled just a short walk to Roath Park and its picturesque lakeside walk... "
"Rarely available! A unique three double bedroom linked detached house located on this quiet crescent within walking distance of Victoria Park. With light and spacious living and generous size rooms, this property has been well presented throughout. The accommodation briefly comprises: E..."
"*Semi detached three bed family home in Heath* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this incredibly spacious property with generous plot in a highly sought after location. The property boasts detached garage and outbuildings, off road driveway parking and enclosed rear garden. MUST BE..."
"Tucked away in the corner of this quiet no through road in Llandaff North, just a few minutes walk from Hailey Park and the Taff trail is this modern former four bedroom detached home. This modern light and spacious family home is entered in to a good size hallway with stairs leading to ..."
A Blank Canvas!
"*RARELY AVAILABLE WITH A GARDEN SIZE YOU WILL NOT FIND IN PONTCANNA!* MGY are delighted to present this three bedroom, mid-terraced house in the highly sought after area of Pontcanna. Situated within walking distance to Llandaff Fields and the City Centre, and near a variety of cafes, restaurants..."
"Exceptional presentation on this generously proportioned family home with a host of upgrades. Situated on one of the larger plots on the estate also being in the enviable position of looking out onto protected greenery. To the ground floor an open plan kitchen and living area, a great size sunny ..."
"A rarely available four bedroom detached home in Camelia Court, with stunning and extensive wrap around gardens, well present throughout with spacious living accommodation including separate reception rooms and en-suite shower room and detached garage."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this beautiful four bedroom family home in Llanishen. Conveniently located within walking distance to Llanishen village with its range of amenities, transport links as well as primary and high schools this is a brilliant spot. Accommodation comprises an entranc..."
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to bring to the market this stunning one bedroom ground floor retirement apartment with outside patio area overlooking the communal gardens. The apartment briefly comprises entrance hallway, store room, bathroom, large double bedroom with fitted wardrobes, large living and..."
"YOPA is proud to present this Nearly new four-bedroom detached property in St Mellons. David Wilson built, with a semi-detached garage, drive and high spec open plan kitchen diner, please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Cardiff market. All Offers & Interest are Invited."
"A spacious and extended semi-detached family home, conveniently located just a short walk to local shops, Roath Park Lake and within the school catchment for Lakeside Primary and Cardiff High School. Entrance hallway, lounge with feature fireplace, opening to a 17ft kitchen/dining room with integ..."
"**NEW INSTRUCTION** Cardiff Estates and Lettings are pleased to present this spacious 1890's property, bursting with character. The property has been beautifully modernised throughout whilst remaining to boast its original features! The property benefits from being within walking distance to city..."
"Wonderful four-bedroom traditional family home of generous proportions, within close proximity of the picturesque Roath Mill Gardens and Waterloo Gardens. An easy walk to Wellfield Road with its many shops and eateries. Close to the A498 providing easy access to the City Centre and the M4 links.<..."
"Investment opportunity new to the market this four bedroom property offers so much potential currently being used as two separate flats. To the both floors there are two bedrooms lounge diner, kitchen and bathroom. This property is located in a popular location close to local amenities and transpor"
"A superb bay-fronted house, enviably located in a popular Pontcanna side street. This sumptuous property has benefited from extensive upgrades, far beyond the superficial. Located close to all the shops, eateries and parks of Pontcanna, this pad is a jewel in the Crown of Pontcanna. Two Bedrooms,..."
"A fantastic period semi detached house in a highly sought after area of Heath. Well presented and ample accommodation comprises a porch, entrance hall with feature stained glass and wood parquet flooring, living room with bay window, period fireplace and feature exposed brick wall, spacious dinin..."
"A sizeable well-maintained 3-bedroom semi-detached family home occupying a generous plot situated in the popular residential location of Heath which is a short walk from the University Hospital of Wales, Heath Park and local amenities."
Family Home Fit For All!
"A well presented, centrally heated, semi-detached house in this very popular position with a South West facing garden. No Chain."
This charming three double bedroom semi-detached cottage boasts a wealth of character and is filled with interesting period features. Set in rural surroundings with superb views that won't be beaten in the idyllic picturesque village of Pentyrch. This impressive home simply must be viewed!
Large penthouse apartment in Cardiff Bay with river and countryside views.
"*Incredibly spacious three double bedroom semi detached family home in Rhiwbina* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this beautiful property that boasts generous living accommodation, a modern open plan kitchen/ dining and living area, three good size bedrooms, with a large well main..."
"A chic and stylish apartment set in an idyllic outlook overlooking Roath Park Lake. This light bright and airy pad offers open-plan living in keeping with this period of fantastically cool architecture. Boasting vaulted ceilings, large bedrooms, an en-suite, and boasting a wonderful balcony with ..."
"This beautifully presented traditional bay fronted terrace house is located in a popular quiet road between Victoria and Thompson's Parks. The immaculately presented accommodation comprises of porch, hallway with wood flooring which continues throughout the ground floor, light and airy lounge/din..."
"7 Bedroom HMO Student house located in a very central location for easy access to the University, City Centre and amenities of Cathays. Fully let for 2022/2023 and 2023/2024 with a rental income of £2940 PCM (No bills included)"
"Situated on one of Rhiwbina’s most desirable streets is this gorgeous three-bedroom semi-detached property, boasting a wide range of ‘box ticking’ features and possessing an overall welcoming ambiance. This handsome property is positioned towards the top of the leafy and quai..."
"Hern and Crabtree are please to present this fantastic modern four bedroom family home in Pontprennau. Well placed for Peppermint Park children's play area, schools and a short distance to local amenities this is a great location. There are great links to the A48 and M4 nearby too. The stylish ac..."
"*Detached four bed family home in Pantmawr* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this spacious and well presented four bed property with generous accommodation, extensive gardens to front, side and rear, and off road driveway parking. MUST BE VIEWED. "
"PLOT 109 - 'THE OAK' AT ASPEN GROVE A 5 bed executive detached home over three floors with a light and airy open plan kitchen/dining and a separate living room, With 'future proof technology' this home is located on a great location on the development. With a garage and EV point!"
"An Exceptional And Highly Unique Detached Bungalow, Set On A Most Desirable Street In The Heart Of Whitchurch Village. We are delighted to offer for sale this tastefully presented residence, full of original style character and charm, with bespoke extensions."
A magnificent fully improved and tastefully modernised spacious detached two bedroom 1930's bungalow with two new stunning bathrooms and beautifully manicured south facing landscaped gardens with a large new raised decked sun terrace overlooking tree lined parkland. Simply outstanding.
"If you are looking for a home with a view then look at this stunning apartment on the exclusive Watermark development, with uninterrupted views of Cardiff Bay and the Bristol Channel. The views are breath taking and waterside apartments like this are rare to find. The iconic design of ..."
"A recently built deceptively spacious modern three double bedroom town home situated in the popular semi-rural location of Capel Llaniltern, excellent transport links to the M4, Radyr and Cardiff City Centre. Must be viewed to be fully appreciated."
"A beautifully presented, detached three bedroom family home occupying this substantial plot with potential to extend, build in the garden and add another driveway to the front of the property (all subject to planning permission). Located in the sought after location of Penylan, the property compr..."
Are you looking for something unique? A home that’ll be a cut above the rest? Marquess Court is a stunning development of nine self-contained luxury apartments occupying one of Cardiff's most desirable locations.
"A select quality development of unique apartments built by David Herbert Builders situated in a quiet cul-de-sac close to Llanishen village sits this extremely spacious three bedroom first floor residence with its own private entrance door, garage and driveway. There is no ongoing chain."
"This spacious and substantial home is located on the sought after Wyndham Crescent, which is a popular road close to the heart of Pontcanna. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, living room, dining room, sitting room, kitchen and utility room/wc on the ground floor and there are..."
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to bring to the market this outstanding extended 3 bedroom traditional bay fronted semi detached family home set on a desirable address in Heath. Over an impressive 1,172sq ft and presented to an good standard and offering spacious living accommodation throughout in brief ..."
"The Mayfair is a detached four-bedroom home that offers an open-plan kitchen/breakfast/family room alongside separate living and dining rooms. Upstairs, the master bedroom enjoys an en suite and there’s a bright family bathroom for the other three bedrooms. Bedroom four could be used as an office."
"Rarely available! No Chain! A delightful double bay fronted detached bungalow placed within a stone's throw to Victoria Park. This spacious bungalow briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Lounge, Conservatory, Three Bedrooms, Kitchen/Breakfast Room and Bathroom. There is a generous driveway and single..."
"A modern, larger style detached family residence, positioned in a select and favoured location, prominent corner plot, fronting Peppermint Park children’s play area, being a short walk to Corpus Christi High School, a short drive to local supermarkets and amenities with excellent highway li..."
Extended open plan four bedroom detached property located at the end of a private Cul De Sac in the desirable area of Pontprennau in Cardiff. This stunning family home is also being sold with the added bonus of NO CHAIN! Call for more information!
"A well proportioned modern detached family home, within a short walk to Aldi supermarket and local amenities, with good access to the A48 and M4 link. Entrance hall, cloakroom, lounge, dining room, sitting room/playroom, modern fitted kitchen, utility room, 4 bedrooms, principal with en-suite sho..."
"A well presented, detached property, situated in the popular area of Pontprennau. This fantastic four bedroom family home offers a number of features and bedrooms including an open plan kitchen/dining room and a separate utility room. Perfectly suited for modern living , this spacious home has al..."
"Being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN. This four-bedroom detached family property is nicely tucked away at the end of a cul-de-sac off a cul-de-sac. Enjoying no through traffic and offers ample off-road parking. The property briefly comprises an entrance hall, WC, lounge, open plan lounge/kitchen/..."
"Tucked away on the quiet Borage Close in Pontprennau, Cardiff is this charming four-bedroom detached property with an abundance of living space, natural light and overall attraction. This has been a happy family home for many years, with many more to come. With large, open-plan living areas, c..."
"MGY are delighted to offer for sale this detached property in the sought after area of Heath. Situated close to Heath park, University Hospital of Wales and within walking distance to a train station which is a 5 minute journey to the city centre. The property briefly comprises of hallway, lounge..."
"A large and impressive four bedroom end of terrace town house, tucked away in the corner of a select close with charming landscaped gardens and a private entrance drive with ample parking. Larger style living space with a 17 ft kitchen/diner, a 17 ft lounge and three bathrooms."
David's Homes & Commercial are delighted to offer this Freehold Semi-Commercial property situated on this well-regarded and much sought-after shopping parade at the heart of Pontcanna. Comprising a ground floor commercial unit with a separate one bedroom apartment above. Vacant possession...
"Ready to move into! Apartment 8 in Llys Sofia is an exceptional duplex, formed from the upper floors of the iconic Pontcanna Victorian homes."
Five Bedroom HMO Licenced property. Currently fully let to students with a monthly income of £2250 PCM no bills included
"A superbly presented, four bedroom detached property ideally located on this quiet cul de sac in Morganstown. This beautiful home has had the benefit of a two storey rear extension that has created a spacious kitchen/diner and a superb family bathroom and master bedroom ensuite. Furthermore, the ..."
"**FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN DESIRABLE LOCATION** Building began in 2015 on this desirable Bellway built estate located super conveniently for ease of access to Culverhouse Cross, Cardiff, the M4 Link Road and all other routes. The site boasts a central leisure area which is beautifull..."
"Showhome standard! An immaculate and tastefully presented four bedroom home located on this on this popular development in St Lythans Park. With an open plan Kitchen/Diner taking centre stage, this property will certainly prove to be popular. Well proportioned throughout, with light and ..."
Maison are delighted to market this stylish two double bedroom terraced house situated on the sought-after street of Severn Grove in the heart of Pontcanna. This attractive home has an open and airy living space with kitchen / dining room to the rear and French doors leading on to a garden with...
*Picturesque detached two bed bungalow in Rhiwbina* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this beautiful property with generous plot and wrap around gardens. The property is offered for sale with no onward chain and huge potential to improve and extend (STPP). MUST BE VIEWED
"**GUIDE PRICE £430,000-£440,000**
We are delighted to present to market this beautiful detached four bedroom family home, ideally located in this quiet residential road in the desirable area of Thornhill, within close proximity to local amenities including a Sainsbury Super Store, Post Office, ..."
"A charming family sized detached cottage of character, nestled between fields and woodland and including extra pockets of land adjacent. Originally built in the 17th century this three/four bedroom property benefits a large private entrance drive, a a garage and private gardens."
"Fantastic family home set on a corner plot in Pontprennau. This home has been extended to provide a third reception room, features a high quality kitchen with utility room, and four bedrooms. Great road links to the M4 and A48 and local shops"
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to present for sale this four bedroom, detached family home in the sought after location of Pontprennau. This spacious home briefly comprises entrance hall, living room, dining room sun room, kitchen/breakfast room to the ground floor. To the first floor ;- master bedroom ..."
"A stunning pad in the heart of Pontcanna, set behind a handsome Victorian brick and bath stone façade. Proudly positioned on Kings Road, this excellent home is nestled in between Pontcanna and Canton which offer an abundance of coffee houses, eateries and boutique independent shops all within a s..."
"**BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED MODERN DETACHED HOME ** An immaculately presented detached 'Ogmore' style Redrow built property, in a popular location being a short distance from transport links and local amenities. A beautifully presented detached three bedroom property, the property briefly comprises h..."
"A bright and well-proportioned semi-detached family home, just a short walk to Lady Mary shops, Roath Park Lake and Flower Gardens, with a short walk to bus links to the City Centre, and within the school catchments for Lakeside Primary and Cardiff High School. Entrance porch, entrance hallway, ..."
Located within walking distance to the university this six bedroom end of terrace property is fully let for the 2022/2023 academic year
"We are delighted to present to market this three bedroom family home located on the highly sought after St. Benedict Crescent in The Heath, within a few minutes walk of Heath Park and UHW, and with easy access to the city centre, as well as the A470/A48/M4 arteries. This lovely home is well pres..."
"*FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN THE SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION OF HEATH* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this extensive and well presented family home in excellent location. This property boasts generous living accommodation with two large reception rooms, a beautiful sun room with rear ..."
"A capacious three double bedroom semi-detached bungalow, providing generous and well designed versatile living space, located in a small and select private residential close, away from busy passing traffic, and available with no chain. Must be seen!"
"*Three bedroom dormer bungalow in Rhiwbina* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this well presented property with a newly built dormer bedroom with ensuite and walk in wardrobe. This property has a beautiful open plan kitchen, living and dining area with rear garden views, good size ..."
"**RARELY AVAILABLE IN THE HEART OF LLANDAFF** MGY are proud to bring to market this absolutely charming, deceptively spacious, period cottage tucked away in a quiet backwater off Heol y Pavin, right in the heart of the 'village' only a hundred yards or so from the Cathedral Green. The cottage has..."
"A beautifully presented and much improved traditional terraced property located in this very sought after quiet cul-de-sac adjacent to Victoria Park. The accommodation comprises Entrance porch, hallway with beautiful original tiled floor, lounge with polished floorboards, and feature fireplace, d..."
"Northwood are proud to introduce this impressive three bedroom semi-detached property situated in the desirable suburb of Llanishen. The property boasts spacious living areas, an abundance of storage spaces, a downstairs W/C and utility space and a mix of modern and traditional features. Local..."
"This immaculate four bedroom, detached family home is perfectly situated in a quiet cul-de-sac. Close to amenities, within catchment of both English and Welsh schools and easy transport links to Cardiff city centre and Caerphilly this is a great property. Accommodation briefly comprises of an ent..."
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase this spacious three bedroom family home situated on this popular and quiet tree-lined street. Ideally located on Axminster Road and within the highly sought after Cardiff High School catchment area. Whilst in need of some modernisation, the current owners have ..."
"A wonderful opportunity to acquire a beautiful, traditional bay-fronted home situated in a cul-de-sac in this fashionable and sought-after location, surrounded by the many popular parks, eateries, coffee shops, schools, and amenities, all within easy walking distance. This lovely three b..."
"A charming two bedroom period property tastefully upgraded & extended by the current owner with a superb open plan modern kitchen & diner with Bi folding door into a charming garden; the accommodation also benefits a sitting room, two double bedroom & a beautiful bathroom."
"Freehold 4-bedroom 2-storey family home with rear ground floor extension, 1st floor side extension over car port, single car garage, front and rear gardens. The house is situated in a highly regarded residential road being within walking distance of Heol Llanishen Fach primary school and local shop."
"Hidden away in-between Ryder Street and Pitman Street, Pitman Lane is a unique trio of modern townhouses built in 2000. The property offers a flexible accommodation spaced over three floors. There are two garages, one large double detached and the other a single integral off the entrance hall. Th..."
"A superb opportunity to acquire this spacious three double bedroom first floor maisonette. The property briefly comprises hall, lounge opening onto balcony, dining room and kitchen. Three double bedrooms, en-suite to master along with family bathroom. Communal gardens, garage and allocated parkin..."
"A hugely attractive, well presented and extended four bedroom detached residence, situated in the small hamlet within Heol Collen, offering excellent local amenity close at hand within walking distance to Culverhouse Cross and it's wide variety of shops and restaurants. The accommodation, found i..."
SPEAK TO US ABOUT INCENTIVES AVAILABLE FOR MARCH RESERVATIONS A STUNNING 2 BED NEW HOME ON THE PRESTIGIOUS ASPEN GROVE DEVELOPMENT - CALL US NOW TO ARRANGE TO VISIT US ON SITE!
"*DETACHED THREE BEDROOM HOUSE WITH OFF ROAD PARKING* MGY are delighted to bring to market this three bedroom detached house situated on the much favoured Staines Street, Canton The accommodation briefly comprises lounge, dining room, kitchen/utility room, three bedrooms and family shower-room. Th..."
"YOPA is proud to present this executive-style four-bedroom detached property located in a quiet cul de sac. Available to market with no chain, a detached garage, and driveway for two cars, please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Cardiff market. All Offers & Interest are Invited."
"A modern, detached property in a favourable position off a small hidden cul-de-sac within Pontprennau, just a short walk to a local supermarkets, bus links to the city centre and vehicular links to the A48/M4, as well as and within the school catchment for Pontprennau Primary School. Entrance por..."
"DETACHED BUNGALOW. A well presented 3 bedroom detached bungalow, located in a cul-de-sac with only a handful of similar properties for company. This property boasts a spacious living room and dining area, as well as a sizable fitted kitchen and a superb orangery to the rear. All positioned on a ..."
An opportunity to purchase this rarely available 3-bedroom detached family home in the heart of Llandaff North which is set on a large plot and backs onto the open green space of Hailey Park. 
"** FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE ** SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION ** A spacious, bay fronted modern detached family house in the sought after area of Morganstown. Entrance hall, bay fronted lounge with feature fireplace, dining room, spacious garden room, modern fitted kitchen, archway to the utilit..."
"** DETACHED FAMILY HOME ** NO CHAIN ** A delightful detached three bedroom family home in a sough after and choice location. Entrance, hallway, shower room/cloakroom, large lounge, kitchen, utility room. To the first floor there are three good sized bedrooms and a family bathroom. Attractive rea..."
"A modern, unique farmhouse style detached dormer house, positioned on a popular road within Pontprennau and within the catchment for the Pontprennau Primary School and a very short drive to Asda, Aldi and Waitrose supermarkets as well as the A48. Entrance hall, cloakroom/WC, lounge with French do..."
Immaculately presented throughout is this beautiful four bedroom detached home. One of only a handful of properties in this development benefiting from a double garage. This contemporary home has been stylishly decorated and upgraded by the current owners. The accommodation comprises: light and a...
"An immaculately presented, bay-fronted 4-bedroom semi-detached family home situated in the popular residential location of Heath and is within close proximity to local amenities, public transport links, M4 and The University Hospital of Wales."
** NO CHAIN** An immaculate and well presented four bedroom detached property in a quiet area of Pontprennau. Enclosed private rear garden and off road parking at the front. Call Darlows on for further details!
"**BEAUTIFUL DETACHED FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME** Martin & Co are extremely pleased to offer this spacious family home. Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac, this house proudly boasts a living room, spacious dining room with bi-fold doors to the fantastic rear garden, a separate modern kitchen and do..."
"*Three bedroom semi detached family home in Heath* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented three bedroom property situated in Heath. This property boasts generous living accommodation with excellent size reception rooms, a stylish kitchen with a well presented ..."
"6 bedroom HMO licensed house, fully let for 2022/2023 & 2023/2024. Excellent location. The properties are deceptively spacious with all bedrooms being doubles. First class location for students wanting to be close to University and City Centre"
Don't miss out on this opportunity to purchase one of only three duplex style apartments in Sovereign Quay overlooking Mermaid Quay. Set over two floors with a magnificent Bay view from both the master bedroom and the lounge area. It also has a modern kitchen with dining room and balcony access ...
"Cardiff Bay living at its finest... Here we have an immaculate duplex apartment in the heart of Cardiff Bay. If you are looking for picturesque views, walks along the barrage across to Penarth, fantastic restaurants and access to all of the local amenities you may need, then look no fur..."
"PLOT 491 THE OGMORE includes AS STANDARD fitted wardrobes to the main bedroom as well as CARPET and FLOORING throughout, an INTEGRATED DISHWASHER, DOWNLIGHTS TO ALL WET AREAS and TURF TO THE REAR GARDEN."
"*BRAND NEW BUILD* The four-bedroom Redwood offers a standard of living you simply wouldn't expect at the price, offering quality without compromise is an ideal home for the larger family."
"The Knightsbridge is a detached four-bedroom home with an open-plan kitchen/breakfast/family room as well as separate living and dining rooms and a downstairs WC. Upstairs, bedroom one has its own en suite, the other three bedrooms share the family bathroom and there’s a fitted storage cupboard."
"Agreed are delighted to offer for sale this substantial four bedroom detached house situated in the delightful city of Cardiff. The property is within walking distance of local schools and amenities. Offering one reception room and three bathrooms, the property benefits from having gas central he..."
"Beautifully presented Executive four bedroom detached property located in the highly desirable Clos Tyla Bach area of St Mellons. The property is in show home condition and within a stones throw away from the picturesque 'Hendre Lake'
Call Darlows for more information on !"
"The Chedworth ticks all the boxes. The open-plan kitchen/family room is perfect for family time. There’s a living room, dining room, downstairs cloakroom and a utility room with outside access. Upstairs there are four bedrooms - bedroom one has an en suite - a family bathroom and a storage cupboard."
"Immaculately presented three bedroom semi detached property in Old St. Mellons. Located within a desirable area of Cardiff, the property offers easy access to a wide range of local amenities including popular shops and supermarkets. As well as offering excellent local transport and road links, t..."
"** SPACIOUS FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE ** LARGE OPEN PLAN LIVING WITH MODERN KITCHEN ** A well presented, spacious four bedroom detached family house (adjoining the neighbours garage), located in a convenient location close to local shops and transport links. Entrance hallway, cloakroom, ..."
"*Edwards & Co are delighted to offer this three bed dormer bungalow in the sought after area of Rhiwbina* This property boasts generous living accommodation, a well presented enclosed rear garden with a large driveway and garage. MUST BE VIEWED. NO CHAIN."
"£400,000, Investment Opportunity, Three Self-Contained Flats in Windsor Court, Holmesdale Street, Cardiff, CF11 7HH"
"This superbly presented, four double bedroom, family home is situated in the popular residential area of St Mellons, Cardiff. The property further benefits from double glazing throughout, gas heating to radiators and a detached double garage"
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to bring to the market this beautifully presented and appointed extended three bedroom detached family home in Old St Mellons. Offering picturesque views over St Johns College directly opposite, in brief the property consists of entrance porch, fitted kitchen, living room,..."
Planning Permission for 5 Flats – 22/00513/MNR. For Sale by Modern Auction – T & C’s apply. Great investment opportunity! Garden and Large Workshop with rear Access. Currently 2 bedroom apartment downstairs with separate 8 bedroom apartment to the upper floors. Freehold. NO ...
STUNNING FINISH throughout this GORGEOUS terrace home in PONTCANNA. You will be in awe making your way round this enviable property. Boasting TWO RECEPTION ROOMS and fully integrated KITCHEN / DINER downstairs as well as TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS and LARGE BATHROOM suite with additional SHOWER CUBICLE!!!
"Traditional three double bedroom end of terrace home in the heart of Llandaff North with a garage and driveway parking. This stunning home offers a number of period original features from high ceilings, beautiful fireplace and stunning traditional slate flooring. Call today before it's gone. "
"Are you looking for a fantastic bay fronted three bedroom semi-detached house in Traditional Rumney? Then look no further. This property comes with a garage, driveway, a generous garden and has an open plan kitchen diner. If you're interested in viewing this property please call us on !"
"A beautifully presented four bedroom detached home. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, wc, living/dining room, kitchen/breakfast room, utility room and the property benefits from a garage conversion which is now a double bedroom and en suite on the ground floor. To the first floor is the..."
"This stunning traditional semi-detached Victorian house, originally built by the village Blacksmith one of very few of this style in this location. The property is situated within catchment of well regarded local schools, in the sought-after location of Pentyrch, this bay-fronted semi offers spacio"
**SPACIOUS DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY**FOUR BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM & DINING ROOM**KITCHEN & BREAKFAST ROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**DRIVEWAY & GARAGE**PEACEFUL SCENIC LOCATION**Pinkmove are pleased to present this four bedroom detached property situated on Valarian Close in St Me
"Uniquely designed, three bedroom detached house in an excellent location close to the Taff Trail and Llandaff North Village and a short drive to Whitchurch Village with it's array of local amenities. Benefiting further from rear garden and off road parking, viewings by appointment only."
"This beautifully-presented three-bedroom terraced house is located on a popular residential road, around the corner from the leafy Victoria Park. The house is a perfect blend of old and new. Contemporary additions blend with original architectural features to create a wonderful family home."
"**FANTASTIC FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY**FAMILY BATHROOM, EN-SUITE AND DOWNSTAIRS WC/CLOAKS**STUNNING GARDEN WITH FEATURE PATIO** SUN ROOM**UTILITY ROOM**THREE RECEPTIONS**OFF-ROAD PARKING** We are delighted to present to market this fabulous four bedroom detached family home, ideally located..."
This large and spacious house is just waiting for a family to enjoy the space and comfort that it can offer. With schools and amenities close by the property has so much to offer. You have to see it to really appreciate it. Book a viewing on .
Three bedroom semi detached bungalow
"This bay fronted home is located on the sought-after Severn Grove, which is a tree lined road in the heart of Pontcanna. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, open plan living/dining room and kitchen on the ground floor and there are two double bedrooms and a good sized bathroom ..."
"A modern family home is located within the heart of Pontprennau in a quiet cul-de-sac close to Pontprennau Primary School, the facilities on offer at Cardiff Gate Retail Park, a short drive to the M4. A perfect home for the daily commuters and the growing family!"
"**EXQUISITE DUPLEX PENTHOUSE APARTMENT* NO CHAIN** MGY are pleased to present for sale a superb two bedroom penthouse apartment, in the popular development of Century Wharf, with breath taking views over Cardiff Bays sky-line and as far reached as the Bristol Channel. The immaculate apartment is ..."
"A gorgeous three bedroom, semi detached family home in the highly sough after location, Heath. This home has plenty of space for off road parking, a garage and a beautiful garden which blossoms with greenery come the spring & summer months adding to the privacy of this home."
"This well presented semi-detached bungalow is offered to the market with no onward chain, located at the head of a desirable Cul-de-sac in Rhiwbina, close to the amenities of Rhiwbina village and public transport links. The property has been lovingly renovated by the current vendors and consists ..."
"Beautiful extended four bedroom detached family home in the very desirable Minsmere Close area of St Mellons over parkland and woods. This is a MUST VIEW property, call Darlows on to view!!"
Lovely three bedroom detached bungalow with massive scope to develop
***EWS1 FORM APPROVED***£950 PCM POTENTIAL RENT***FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY*** This studio is located in Meridian Plaza which is placed is the heart of Cardiff's city centre close to all amenities and transport links we feel this could be the perfect investment as it can achieve u...
"YOPA is proud to present this substantial, modern and extended three-bedroom detached property in the sought-after locality of Morganstown. in a cul de sac, with a beautiful open plan kitchen diner in the rear extension, please enquire early to avoid disappointment. All Offers & Interest Invited."
"Agreed are delighted to offer for sale this substantial three bedroom semi-detached house situated in the delightful city of Cardiff. The property is within walking distance of local schools and amenities. Offering two reception rooms and one bathroom, the property benefits from having gas heatin..."
"The Juniper is spread across THREE FLOORS, comprising a generous lounge with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden, dedicated STUDY and a generous TOP FLOOR MASTER BEDROOM with EN-SUITE. Ideally located just 15 minutes' drive from CARDIFF CITY CENTRE. "
"A traditional mid-terrace dwelling, which has been extended and improved by the current owners to provide spacious accommodation in the heart of Whitchurch village. "
"*Brand new and chain free home*. The Cedar is a 3 bedroom home that offers stylish family living spread over three floors. Featuring an open-plan kitchen and dining area, a front-facing living room, a stylish family bathroom, and an extensive bedroom suite to the second floor with en suite. "
Modern townhouse situated close to Cyncoed and Lisvane and easy access to the A48 further leading to the M4 corridor.
"The layout of the Loughor epitomises the modern townhouse lifestyle. A spacious ground floor is ideal for entertaining with an open plan kitchen diner, family room, cloak room and laundry room to the ground floor. To the first floor there is a separate lounge, perfect for relaxing, a bathroom an..."
"** LARGE FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED COTTAGE WITH SPACIOUS GARDEN ** A large and versatile semi-detached family house with three reception rooms, spacious garden and outbuilding/studio situated in the heart of Pentyrch village. The accommodation briefly comprises; entrance porch, sitting room, clo..."
"Visit our magnificent collection of luxury apartments and townhouses to experience for yourself how location, design, and material can combine for the ultimate lifestyle. St James offers an impressive and remarkable collection of generously proportioned luxurious bedrooms for sleeping and dressin..."
"The Hamilton's is a prestigious development on the iconic Cathedral Road in Pontcanna and is a collection of stylish, refurbished apartments in a grade 2 listed building. This ground floor apartment is unique, as it has its own private entrance, through the original front door and is p..."
"JeffreyRoss are proud to bring to the market this exceptional first floor bay fronted apartment in the heart of Pontcanna. The property briefly comprises entrance hallway, 2 double bedrooms with the master bedroom benefiting an ensuite and fitted wardrobes as well as main bathroom that benefits a..."
"An extended 3 bedroom detached property located on Ashgrove in Whitchurch. Offered for sale for the first time in over 50 years, this spacious property offers superb potential to create a modern family home. Occupying a sizeable plot and delightful rear garden with views across Caedelyn Fields. T..."
"An extended 4 bedroom semi detached family home situated on Velindre Place in Whitchurch. The property offers spacious accommodation throughout and is ideally located for Whitchurch Village, the excellent public transport links and highly regarded primary and secondary schools. The property brief..."
"An excellent four bedroom property, full of potential, situated in one of the most popular areas of Cyncoed. This fantastic family property has been significantly extended and is positioned on a substantial plot offering further room for expansion. - subject to planning. Although in need of moder..."
Great investment purchase offering 3 flats for sale with sitting tenants. Positioned in the heart of Roath offering great local amenities and great public transport links. These properties have been totally refurbished and are modernised and upgraded throughout. To be sold with no onwards chain.
"Detached 4 bedroom family home in the sought after location of Pontprennau. Requiring some upgrading but priced accordingly. Spacious home comprising living room, dining room, kitchen/breakfast room and cloakroom to ground floor. Master bedroom with en suite shower room, three further bedrooms a..."
"Jeffrey Ross are pleased to welcome this 2 Bedroom Duplex in the Cathedral Gardens Development. Cathedral Gardens Cathedral Gardens offers a superb selection of 1, 2 and 3 bedroom apartments alongside just three magnificent 4 bed townhouses. The 33 apartments are found ..."
"A fantastic dormer bungalow, situated on the desirable Hollybush Road, located in the popular area of Cyncoed. This wonderful two to three bedroom bungalow is full of potential and offers excellent living space and a private plot. There are a number of features and benefits including conservatory..."
"Ready to move into! Apartment 10 in Llys Sofia is a charming duplex, formed from the upper floors of iconic Pontcanna Victorian homes with double height living, balcony and parking."
"The layout of the Loughor epitomises the modern townhouse lifestyle.  A spacious ground floor is ideal for entertaining, whilst a separate lounge of the first floor is perfect for relaxing.  An ensuite to the master bedroom and three additional bedrooms create a space for everyone to ca..."
The Berkley - Four bedroom semi-detached townhouse with an integrated single garage and south-facing garden. Part of the popular Dol Werdd development at Plasdwr.
"** NEW 4 BEDROOM HOME IN PRIME LOCATION ** ONLY 4 MILES OF CARDIFF CITY CENTRE ** GARAGE ** MGY are pleased to offer this four bedroom, semi-detached 'Berkley' style home built by the highly regarded Lewis Homes as part of the Dol Werdd development, which is ready for occupation in Spring 2023. T..."
The Berkley - Four bedroom semi-detached townhouse with a south-facing garden. Estimated completion for Spring 2023.
"A spacious three bedroom semi detached family home situated within walking distance of Heol Llanishen Fach, Schools and Public Transport. The property benefits from a kitchen, downstairs W.C, two reception rooms, a good size rear garden, garage and off road parking. Guide Price £390,000 to £395,000"
Thia property offers a traditional yet modern family home. With light and neutral decor throughout offering the perfect space for a growing family. Call today before it's gone!
Five bedroom HMO licenced house located in the heart of Cathays. Fully let to students for the 2022/2023 academic year achieving £1900 PCM rental income
"Northwood are proud to introduce this traditional bay-fronted 3 bedroomed semi-detached property to the market. Located in the popular Rhiwbina area within walking distance to the vibrant village where a number of amenities, parks, local cafes and businesses can be found. It also benefits from..."
"A THREE BEDROOM double bay fronted mid terraced home, in need of extensive modernisation throughout, set in this sought after location of PENYLAN, Cardiff. The property is within walking distance of local shops, schools and bus routes. Viewing's Recommended!"
"The Ebbw is a solid, self-assured semi-detached family home that has everything you need for the ebb and flow of family living. Full of light and life from the double width patio doors, the kitchen/dining room will be the hub of your home from breakfast to supper. And while the large l..."
"**FANTASTIC WATER VIEWS* DUPLEX APARTMENT* NO CHAIN** MGY are pleased to present for sale, a superb two bedroom, seventh floor duplex apartment in the popular waterfront Bayscape development, within Cardiff Marina. The spacious accommodation over two floors, comprises of entrance hall, open plan ..."
"If you are looking for a bay fronted home near to the historic Victoria Park, then take a look at this four bedroom end of terraced house on Clive Road. There is modern look to the inside which is blended with some traditional features and the accommodation comprises: entrance hall, li..."
"INCENTIVE OFFER FOR LIMITED TIME ONLY - LAND TRANSACTION TAX PAID! ENERGY EFFICIENT APARTMENT. With the cost of living constantly on the rise, more and more purchasers are looking to New build developments for energy and efficiency savings. The purpose built Lozelles development is one of the fe..."
"**TRADITIONAL MID TERRACED HOUSE** MGY are pleased to offer for sale a traditional mid terraced house, situated within walking distance of local shops, Victoria Park and with easy access to the City Centre. The spacious accommodation briefly comprises of entrance hall, living and dining room, lar..."
"A traditional, bay fronted Three bedroom, semi detached corner plot. The perfect family home with two reception room and conservatory. Complete with off road parking and rear garden. Viewings by appointment only."
"An Exceptional Top Floor Apartment Within This Much Desired Retirement Complex, Offering A Wealth Of Internal Accommodation And Access To A Host Of Communal Facilities Including On-Site Bistro, Al Fresco Dining Area And Landscaped Gardens."
"Final apartment remaining at this chic Victorian villa re-development in Pontcanna. Contact us to make your move now, ready to occupy."
"A large five bedroom gable fronted three stroey period home, occupying a sought after location equidistant to both Pontcanna, Canton and Victoria Park. Gas heating, PVC double glazing, many period features, three reception rooms, walled gardens, see inside!"
"A beautifully presented extended four bedroom home. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, living room dining room, kitchen and conservatory on the ground floor. The self contained garage conversion consists of a bedroom, living area, wc, shower room and a kitchen. To the first floor is a ma..."
"Northwood are delighted to introduce this traditional style three-bedroom semi-detached property located on a sizeable plot on the quiet Westfield Avenue in Whitchurch, within close proximity to Rhiwbina, Whitchurch and Birchgrove villages. The property is rich with original features and posse..."
"GUIDE PRICE £400,000-£425,000 PARKING**PONTCANNA**TWO BED**APARTMENT**NEW**DUPLEX**HIGH-SPEC Last elegant & flexible renovated apartment remaining in a Grade II listed building, set within the heart of Cardiff. A two bedroom duplex apartment located on the top floor of this Vict..."
"A well presented three bedroom detached family home in the heart of Pontprennau, Cardiff. This well proportioned property offers ample living accommodation for a growing family with three reception rooms, kitchen, utility room and garden room complete with Jacuzzi hot tub which is to remain, plus..."
"A handsome, double fronted first floor apartment, being a former three storey semi-detached Edwardian residence, now converted to form three apartments, choice position overlooking Roath Park Recreational Fields, a short walk to Wellfield Road shops and all local amenities. Communal hall with ac..."
"Superb City living apartment with panoramic views over the Bristol channel & the Welsh hills from an outstanding roof terrace with a separate office, ideal for working from home. This attractive apartment also offers open plan living room, two double bedrooms & two bathrooms. CALL NOW TO VIEW!"
"*Three bed semi detached family home situated in a quiet cul de sac in Pantmawr* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this three bed semi detached family home in excellent location. This property boasts generous living accommodation consisting of a large principle reception room, a ki..."
" ** DETACHED FAMILY HOME ** PLANNING PERMISSION FOR LARGE CONTEMPORARY DETACHED HOUSE ** A delightful detached three bedroom family home situated in the sought after area of Radyr, in cul-de-sac location. The accommodation briefly comprises; entrance porch, hallway, lounge, dining room, kitchen, ..."
"*Picturesque detached two bed bungalow in Rhiwbina* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this chain free spacious property, offering generous ground floor living and potential to extend. The property boasts large reception spaces, off road parking and good size gardens to front and re..."
"In The Heart Of Canton And Of Interest To Landlord Investors Can Be Found This Large Traditional Built Bay Fronted Residence That Has Been Converted Into Two Self Contained Apartments Offering Good Investment Return. Ground Floor Apartment Comprises Of Entrance Hall, Open Plan Lounge Kitchen With..."
"*RECENTLY REFURBISHED, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM, MID-TERRACED HOUSE IN THE HEART OF PONTCANNA* MGY are delighted to bring to market this two double bedroom, mid-terraced house situated in the highly sought after area of Pontcanna. The accommodation briefly comprises open plan living/dining room, kitche..."
"A spacious and well presented semi detached bungalow, situated in the popular area, of Rhiwbina. This is a three bedroom bungalow which has a generous loft conversion and en suite, perfectly suited for modern living. There are a number of features and benefits including good sized living room, se..."
JeffreyRoss are delighted to bring to the market this unique opportunity to purchase with no on going chain at the superb McCarthy & Stone Retirement and Living development in Llanishen. ‘Llys Isan’ is a development of executive apartments designed for an independent lifestyle post-retirement. Th...
"Semi-Commercial Freehold Investment & Development Opportunity situated within the well-regarded Rumney locale. The property briefly comprises a Ground Floor Commercial Unit, a Spacious First Floor Apartment, a Large Rear Garden and two Double Garages. Potential for development, subject to consents."
"An opportunity to purchase a two/three bedroom bay fronted semi-detached bungalow with traditional features situated in a large private rear garden in a small cul-de-sac, garage, parking and no chain. There is excellent potential to extend to the rear or into the loft space subject to planning."
"Beautifully presented Executive Five bedroom detached property located in the highly desirable Water Avens Close area of St Mellons. The property is in show home condition and within a stones throw away from the picturesque 'Hendre Lake'
Call Darlows for more information on !"
"Ref:16948226 Sales & Lettings Angels are pleased to present this 4 Bedroom detached dormer bungalow in the sought after location of Rumney, this property offers an abundance of benefits over two floors such as an attached double-height workspace/garage, utility room, 4 piece bathroom sui..."
"A handsome double bay fronted three bedroom mid-terrace house located a stone's throw away from the centre of Whitchurch Village. This well presented period property is spacious throughout and briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Shower Room, Living Room, Sitting Room and a Kitchen/Diner to the grou..."
Impressive extended 3 bedroom semi detached family home set on desirable Thornhill address
A traditional 3 bedroom semi detached house located on this very popular road close to the popular Insole Court and gardens with its vibrant events and activities programme and monthly farmers market etc. Waun-gron Park railway station and local schools are within walking distance. The property c...
"This stylish and modern three bedroom apartment is more than just a home, it's a lifestyle. One of the many benefits is the great location right on the Marina, and within walking distance to all the local amenities such as The Sports Village, pedestrian bridge to Penarth and Cogan Train Station"
"Peter Alan Rumney are pleased to offer new to the market this four bedroom, detached property situated on this highly sought after development in St.Mellons. Overlooking the beautiful Hendre lake park this property is located close to local amenities and transport links. Call the sales team today"
"**NO CHAIN**DETACHED**FOUR BEDROOMS**KITCHEN DINER**LARGE RECEPTION ROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM**OFF ROAD AND GARAGE PARKING**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**EASY ACCESS TO A WIDE RANGE OF FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00017480**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this immaculately well presented, four bedroom detached"
"This charming semi-detached home is situated in the popular and picturesque village of Tongwynlais. With its wealth of local amenities inclusing primary school, proximity to Castell Coch and the Taff Trail along with links to the A470 and M4 motorway this is a great location. Accommodati..."
"**CORNER PLOT** A modernised, extended and much improved semi-detached family home, in a desirable position and occupying a large corner plot with further potential to extend/develop (subject to obtaining the necessary planning consent), in the popular area of Penylan, with easy access to the A48..."
"A unique opportunity to aquire a modern two bedroom mid terrace positioned in this private gated development. The accommodation comprises of entrance hallway, lounge/diner, kitchen, utility room and cloakroom WC to the ground floor. To the first floor are two generously sized double bedrooms and ..."
"Semi-commercial Freehold investment including A3 Takeaway and two bedroom apartment situated in an outstanding trading position within this very busy shopping parade in Rumney, Cardiff. Sold with tenant in situ, circa £30,000.00 per annum on a ten year, fully repairing and insuring lease."
"Located on Fitzroy Street, in the popular area of Cathays, this deceptive six bedroom HMO licensed house is currently let and producing an income of £2000 per calendar month, as well as tenants secured for the 23/24 academic year with an increased rental income of £2460 per calendar month. <..."
An opportunity to purchase this traditional bay-fronted 2-bedroom semi-detached bungalow which has been extended and is situated in the heart of Whitchurch village. 
"An extended and improved five bedroom semi-detached family home situated within walking distance of shops, schools and public transport with good off road parking for up to three cars, solar panels, carport and garage. Internal viewing is highly recommended."
"Isla-Alexander Property are proud to present to market this superbly located show home in Radyr. Situated just a stones throw from popular parks, shops, cafes and restaurants this beautiful home is a must view. The property benefits from a series of added extras being the site's show home."
"A FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED family home, set in the popular location of PENTWYN, within walking distance of local amenities and easy access to local schools, bus routes and shops. Cardiff City centre is easily accessible and the A48/M4 access corridor is just a short drive away. Viewing's Recommended!"
"An Exceptional Period Style Semi-Detached House In One Of Whitchurch's Most Desirable Streets! We are delighted to present this rare opportunity to acquire a highly individual, characterful house near to Whitchurch Common."
"
**BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED REDROW 3 BED SEMI**
**MANY UPGRADED FEATURES** This immaculate, spacious, very popular ‘Redrow Ludlow’ design at Cae St Fagans has had many upgrades to set it aside from the standard properties on offer. Tiled bathrooms, high quality carpets and LVT throughout; spot ligh..."
"No expense has been spared in transforming this beautiful, detached home in a very sought after area of St Mellons, Cardiff East. The property features an open plan lounge/dining room/kitchen area, 3 double bedrooms, with an en-suite to the master and a luxury family bathroom. Other features include"
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** Look no further than this superb four bedroom end of terrace family home. The property has been extensively renovated and benefits from excellent accommodation incorporating an inviting entrance hall, two reception rooms, 19' 7"" kitchen/dining room, together with four double b..."
" **GUIDE PRICE - £374,999 - £385,000** A well proportioned four bedroom detached property. This well presented family home offers a number of features and benefits including utility area, downstairs wc, en suite and driveway. This property is perfectly suited for modern livi..."
"Must Be Viewed! This Very Nicely Presented And Much Improved 'Redrow; Built Detached House Situated At This Most Sought After Of Residential Developments Being In Close Proximity To The Nearby Ysgol Tregganon Welsh School, The Soon To Be Completed Fitzalan High School, The Various Facilities Of C..."
"You will not want to miss out on this fabulous opportunity to purchase a four bedroom detached house in the heart of popular St. Mellon's close to local amenities, schools, and with excellent links to the M4 and the University Hospital of Wales. This lovely property features a glazed entrance ..."
A greatly extended four bedroom family home that really needs to be seen to be believed. This beautiful family home is within walking distance of the famous St Johns College and has great transport links to both the M4 and A48. Call Darlows on !
"This exceptional three-bedroom home is configured across three voluminous floors, the expansive interiors subjected to a ground-floor extension, converted loft-space and full-refurbishment throughout. The house unfolds over 1200 sq ft with a garden office, which sits within the private rear garden."
"Move straight into this fabulous four bedroom detached house located in the popular area of FFordd Daniel Lewis, Regents Gate, St Mellons which is offered to market in show home condition throughout. With schools, bus stops and shops within easy reach this would be perfect for a growing family."
"DETACHED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME - Situarted at the end of a quiet CUL-DE-SAC and boasting a delightful REAR GARDEN. The property is met with a DRIVEWAY for multiple vehicles and a GARAGE. Lots of living space with TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, UTILITY and CLOAKROOM. Call today to book your appointment."
"Most attractive and spacious 2/3 bedroomed ground floor maisonette, 1 of only 4 in a select courtyard position, quiet avenue location, a short distance from Cyncoed village centre, convenient bus routes on Cyncoed Road and with easy access to the M4 and A470. Independent entrance, large central h..."
"** SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION ** THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME ** NO CHAIN ** A delightful, extended, three bedroom semi detached family home located on the sought after area in Radyr known as ´The Green´. Entrance porch, spacious hallway, cloakroom, lounge enjoying a superb view o..."
"**The Last Remaining Two-Bedroom Apartment** Suffolk House is the latest development from Quin & Co, sitting in the heart of the Conway Road Conservation Area between Thompson's Park and Llandaff Fields. Whilst the two parks provide open space for leisure, play and fitness, Pontc..."
"Set on a generous size plot is this traditional attractive, red brick fronted three bedroom family home situated on a popular road close to Whitchurch Village. Well maintained throughout and offers excellent potential for the next occupier to put their own stamp on the spacious accommoda..."
*Extended detached two bed bungalow in Whitchurch* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this incredibly spacious bungalow in a highly sought after location. The property offers generous accommodation and plot as well as a detached garage and off road driveway parking. MUST BE VIEWED
"Stunning three bedroom duplex apartment in Llandaff which offers the perfect balance between contemporary and classic design. This impressive property benefits from LVT wood effect flooring, a luxury fitted kitchen and two stunning bathrooms and access to court yard garden."
"*NEW PRICE NOW Guide Price £365,000 to £375,000**IMMACULATELY WELL PRESENTED**SEMI DETACHED**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**HIGH END KITCHEN DINER**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**FAMILY BATHROOM**GENEROUS ENCLOSED GARDEN**OFF-ROAD PARKING**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A WIDE RANGE OF FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#0"
"** THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED ** INTEGRAL DOUBLE GARAGE ** An exceptionally spacious three storey, three double bedroom semi detached family house in the popular area of Radyr. To the ground floor is the entrance hallway, laundry room, spacious store room plus integral double garage with ..."
"**LOVELY 3 BEDROOM TOWNHOUSE IN A SUPER CONVENIENT LOCATION** This period property with modern fixtures and fittings is located alongside the hub of Llandaff, with its cathedral & shops around the corner and top rated schools in close proximity, it is perfectly positioned . The property has been..."
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase this delightful 3 bedroom detached bungalow on Park Avenue in Whitchurch. The property has recently benefited from a loft conversion to create a master bedroom and bathroom, along with ample storage and the potential to create an additional bedroom in the futur..."
This studio is located in Meridian Plaza which is placed is the heart of Cardiff's city centre close to all amenities and transport links. This property would make the perfect investment buy
"THE CAMOMILE PLOT 125 ASPEN GROVE A superb four bed detached home located on the Aspen Grove development.. The accommodation comprises of dual aspect lounge, kitchen/diner, four bedrooms, bathroom, cloaks and en-suite. The property offers, parking, garden and located on an award winning si..."
"***NEWLY REFURBISHED***CITY CENTRE LOCATION***A MUST VIEW*** Key Executive Sales are proud to bring to the market this stunning newly refurbished end-terrace house just off Newport Road, with a short walk into Cardiff City Centre. The property comprises of a fully integrated ki..."
"A beautifully presented and deceptively spacious, three double bedroom mid terraced property located on The Philog in Whitchurch. The current owners have maintained the property to a very high standard throughout their 25 year ownership with recent improvements that include a new external period ..."
"Thomas H Wood Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this extended and beautifully presented family home situated in the heart of Whitchurch close to all amenities, schools and commuter links. The property has been very well maintained and modernised by the current owners and recent improv..."
"Location, Location, Location! The Perfect Family Home, An Exceptional Period Style Semi-Detached House In A Coveted Street, With Convenient Access To A Wealth Of Local Amenities, Schools And Transport Links Including Coryton Railway Station At The End Of The Road!"
"Offered to the market is this car garage with first floor office space, as well as a separate 2 bedroom duplex maisonette in the heart of vibrant Roath. Potential for development, subject to the relevant planning permissions being obtained. "
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £385.0000 DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY SUBJECT TO PLANNING APPROVAL. Situated On The Corner Of Atlas Road & Thurston Street Can Be Found This Very Sizeable Three Storey End Of Terrace House Boasting Five Bedrooms & 23' Coach House To Rear. Accommodation Further Comprises Of Ent..."
"***PRIME LOCATION*** A spacious, two bedroom 2nd floor luxury apartment currently tenanted for £1500pcm until next August. The Cathedral Parc development offers this stunning two bedroom duplex apartment which is light and spacious, all finished to the highest standard, this is ..."
"** FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME ** MODERNISED THROUGHOUT ** NO CHAIN ** A delightful detached four bedroom family home in a convenient location and backing onto woodland. Entrance hallway, cloakroom, spacious lounge with wood burning stove, modern in fitted kitchen and dining room. To the fi..."
"*** Guide Price: £360,000 *** NO CHAIN!!! A VERY MODERN & IMMACULATE 4-BED DETACHED FAMILY HOME - YOU CAN SIMPLY MOVE STRAIGHT IN - SOUTH-WEST FACING LARGE & ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN BACKING ONTO FORESTRY/WOODLAND - SOLID OAK DOORS to GROUND FLOOR - CLOAKROOM - LOUNGE with LOG-BURNER - OPEN..."
A traditional three bedroom semi-detached family home providing an ideal opportunity for improvement and extension (subject to planning permissions) situated in a quiet cul-de-sac within walking distance of Llanishen and Rhiwbina village.
"We present this fantastic three bedroom home situated in the very popular Adventures Quay. The house benefits from off road parking, A garage as well as being within walking distance both the Red dragon centre and Mermaid Quay, Call now to book a viewing!!"
"*Semi detached three bedroom family home in Thornhill* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this spacious and well situated property, boasting generous living accommodation, integral garage, and off road driveway parking. MUST BE VIEWED"
"This modern detached four double-bedroom property is situated in the heart of Rumney. Within walking distance to a vast amount of amenities and is being sold with no onward chain. The property briefly comprises an entrance hallway, ground floor WC, lounge and kitchen/dining room and utility r..."
"As you walk up to this property you know you are in for a treat and you won't be disappointed. An immaculate and well presented four double bedroom, three storey townhouse. The property has been improved to a high standard by the current owners and benefits from many positive alterations"
"Located in the popular area of Nesta Road, Victoria Park and offering 3 double bedrooms and a converted loft room is this charming family home. The property benefits from having a large 19' kitchen and a garage. There are two reception rooms and a private rear garden with access to the garage."
For sale with immediate occupation and no on-going chain is this stunning 4 bedroom town house. Situated within a select and small development perfectly located for the town of Penarth & links into Cardiff City Center. Great improved throughout by the present owners to include a spectacular kitch...
"An Exceptional Period Style End Of Terrace House, Set In A Popular Avenue Near To A Host Of Amenties And Transport Links. We are delighted to offer for sale this spacious and attractive property, with a wealth of accommodation and rear garden with vehicular access."
"OAC presents this very high specification 2 double bedroom maisonette in the beautiful Cyncoed, just a stones throw away from Roath Park. There are two entrances, one from flat ground and one from the steps. This property is offered with no chain. "
"This property is ideal for someone who is looking for an investment opportunity, or somebody who still want to live with family but wants to have their own space. This property is very space full throughout and all of the rooms are a really good size"
"**DETACHED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME** Martin & Co are extremely pleased to offer this generous detached home. Situated in the popular new development of St Edeyrns, boasting fantastic transport links this house must be viewed to be appreciated. The ground floor offers a spacious living room,..."
"Large extended Four Double Bedroom family home conveniently situated in the heart of Llanishen, close to local amenities and schools. Set over three floors this property boasts large bedrooms and plenty of living space. Off-street parking and large rear garden. "
"Contemporary in design, stylish and impressive coach house style mews end residence, one of only three, in a select, tranquil and prestigious courtyard with landscape gardens, short walk to Llanishen Village shops. Beautifully presented throughout, being of open plan design living with quality fi..."
"A two bedroom end of link home occupying a delightful position in a quiet cul-de-sac just off Lisvane Road. Good access to both Llanishen and Lisvane Village, walking distance to a Train Station and Bus Stop, modern contemporary fittings, allocated parking space and no ongoing chain."
"AN END OF TERRACED 'WILLOW' - WITH VERSATILE ACCOMMODATION ALONG WITH FANTASTIC TECHNOLOGY THAT WILL HELP YOU SAVE ON YOUR UTILITY BILLS INCLUDING SOLAR PANELS, BATTERY STORAGE, GROUND SOURCE HEAT PUMPS & ELECTRIC CAR CHARGER POINT. SUPERB VIEWS"
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase this delightful three bedroom mid terrace family home in the heart of Llandaff North. The current owners have transformed the property that boasts new UPVC windows, electrical rewire, Baxi combination boiler, modern kitchen, bathroom and décor throughout. ..."
"Located in the popular development of Westfield Park in St Fagans, a four bedroom detached home located at the end of a quiet cul de sac away from passing traffic yet only minutes away from local amenities."
"A modern link detached property positioned in a popular cul-de-sac within Pontprennau, within walking distance to Corpus Christi High School, bus links to the City Centre and Aldi supermarket, and a short drive to other major supermarkets and access to the M4. The property falls within the schoo..."
"A glorious family home, offering spacious and stylish living arranged over three floors, within quick and easy reach of Cardiff City Centre..."
"A beautiful two double bedroom waterside penthouse apartment in the popular Prospect Place development in Cardiff Bay. Located on the 18th floor and commands far reaching views overlooking Cardiff Bay, Penarth Marina, Penarth Head, the Bristol Channel & the Somerset coastline."
"An outstanding opportunity to secure a chain-free house in the centre of Pontcanna boasting a lovely garden and garage. This substantial family home is well placed between Llandaff Fields and the plentiful shops, coffee shops, and boutiques of fashionable Pontcanna. Accommodation is ready to tran..."
"*Traditional and spacious mid- terrace house in prime Rhiwbina location* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this house which holds traditional characteristics throughout, requires modernisation in excellent location. This property is accompanied with three good size bedrooms, two re..."
A beautifully presented two bedroom detached bungalow situated in the popular Birchwood Gardens development in Whitchurch. The current owners have maintained the property to a very high standard and is offered for sale for the first time since being constructed by Barratt Homes in the mid 1990's....
"A generously proportioned, three bedroom detached property, situated in the popular area of Cyncoed. This excellent family home is situated in a private, cul du sac position, while benefitting from an elevated aspect. There are a number of features and benefits including detached garage, driveway..."
"Cathedral House is situated on the very prestigious Cathedral Road in the upmarket are of Pontcanna. A short distance to Cardiff City Centre. Pontcanna offers fine dining restaurants, boutiques and bars. A contemporary and well sought after development so early viewings are recommended...."
"JeffreyRoss are proud to bring to to the market this picturesque cottage in the heart of Llandaff and within walking distance to all local amenities. This mock Tudor style property briefly comprises entrance foyer, open plan living and dining area, modern fitted kitchen and downstairs WC. To the ..."
"Situated in a sought after location of St Fagans, a four bedroom town house which is modern throughout and spacious living, open plan kitchen diner, four bedrooms, downstairs cloakroom, ensuite of master bedroom, family bathroom and an enclose private rear garden."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN! An ideal investment property set in an excellent location of CATHAYS within easy access to Cardiff City Centre and the A48/M4 access corridor. The property further benefits from gas central heating, front forecourt and enclosed rear garden. Viewings Highly Recommended!"
"Being sold with no onward chain is this beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached home. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, spacious living room with parquet floor, bay fronted sitting room with parquet floor and kitchen/dining room on the ground floor and to the first floor are t..."
"A traditional bay fronted terraced house, a stones throw from Victoria Park and only minutes from local amenities. Benefiting from an extended ground floor, three good size bedrooms, loft room and enclosed rear garden with a garage and workshop."
"***Guide Price 350,000-360,000*** This fantastic family home is situated on a lovely street in St Mellons and close to all local amenities, shops, schools and transport links. Internal viewing is essential to appreciate this delightful home fully! Call today to secure your viewing!!"
"*CHAIN FREE* Peter Alan are proud to announce this spacious 3 bedroom house located on Eton Place, with a small amount of work this property is the perfect family home."
"Darlows are proud to be selling this 3-bedroom property located on the desirable College Road, this property benefits hugely in style location and size, but will go fast so get in touch right away!"
"A deceptively large and well presented period home, offered for sale in Roath. This impressive house offers a lot of space and options with layout, but currently comprises: entrance hall, lounge, sitting room, shower room & extended kitchen diner to ground floor. Upstairs there is a bathroom, and..."
"Freehold property which has been split into two, two bedroom self contained properties.
An ideal option for investors looking for a great return in a popular central location"
"A beautifully presented two bedrooms, bay fronted semi detached bungalow conveniently located in close proximity to a variety of amenities and major road links. The accommodation comprises entrance porch, hallway, bay fronted master bedroom, bedroom two, bathroom, modern kitchen, spacious lounge ..."
"A traditional end terrace family home located in Heath, Cardiff. Comprising of entrance hallway, lounge, diner,Utility, kitchen to ground floor, and family bathroom, three bedrooms and loft room to the first floor"
"Harris & Birt are pleased to offer to market this newly developed three bedroom detached property in the desirable area of Old St. Mellons. The property briefly comprises; entrance porch, entrance hall, WC and an open plan kitchen/living dining room to the ground floor. With master bedroom, en su..."
A traditional bay fronted semi-detached home situated within walking distance of the University Hospital of Wales. The property comprises two separate reception rooms and a downstairs cloakroom. There is a modern bathroom and kitchen. A private rear garden with lane access and no ongoing chain.
Located on an end of terrace corner plot in Splott this property has been converted into two sizable self contained flats. The property is freehold and benefits from outside space and off road parking to the ground floor
" Get Sold UK are delighted to offer this extended & very well presented 3/4 bedroom detached property situated in Cardiff. The property has accommodation as follows: Entrance hall, lounge, dining room, cloakroom, kitchen, large store cupboard, conservatory/bedroom & shower room. To the firs..."
"A lovely three bedroom semi detached family home in the sought after area of Thornhill. Close to amenities and public transport links as well as a short walk to Thornhill primary school this is a great location. Accommodation briefly comprises entrance porch, hallway, lounge, dining room, conserv..."
"**FANTASTIC WATER VIEWS* IMMACULATELY PRESENTED* NO CHAIN** MGY are pleased to present for sale, a superb two bedroom, sixth floor apartment in the popular waterfront Bayscape development, within Cardiff Marina. The spacious accommodation comprises of entrance hall, open plan lounge/diner, high s..."
"£350,000, Development Opportunity, Large Single Storey Commercial Property with Freehold Development Plot in South Park Road, Cardiff, CF24 2LU"
Simply stunning! The bi-folding doors connect the open plan kitchen/diner/living are with the rear garden with plenty of natural light. This extended four bedroom end of terrace house has been completely transformed from top to bottom by the current owners and really is the perfect family home. <...
"The Clayton Corner features an open-plan kitchen diner and impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden, a utility room, WC and storage cupboard. Upstairs you'll find three bedrooms, including a large en suite bedroom one, a family-sized bathroom and handy storage cupboard."
"**THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME OFFERED WITH NO CHAIN** Martin & Co Cardiff are delighted to market this beautifully presented three bedroom home. Located in a quiet cul-de-sac of Thornhill. This property proudly boasts a beautiful kitchen diner, a secure garage with access to the house, very la..."
"**SEMI DETACHED HOUSE*NO CHAIN** An opportunity to acquire a spacious three bedroom semi detached house, situated in this sought after location close to local amenities at Canton, Leckwith and City Centre. The spacious accommodation comprises of entrance hall, living/dining room, newly fitted kit..."
"Situated At This Most Popular Residential Development Can Be Found This Very Well Presented Modern Built Four Bedroom Semi Detached Town House With Spacious Accommodation Over Three Storeys. Briefly Comprising Of Entrance Hall, Cloakroom W.C. Sitting Room, Fitted Kitchen Breakfast Room With Integ..."
"*** Guide Price: £349,950 to £359,950 *** NO CHAIN!!! EXTENDED & MODERN DETACHED FAMILY HOME - YOU CAN SIMPLY MOVE STRAIGHT IN - CONTEMPORARY DECOR THROUGHOUT - OPEN-PLAN LIVING - LOUNGE with BI-FOLD DOORS TO EXTENDED SUN ROOM & DINING ROOM OPEN-PLAN TO THE QUALITY RE-FITTED KITCH..."
"This bay fronted home is located in the sought-after tree lined Rawden Place and is most convenient for the City Centre. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, living room, dining room, sitting room and kitchen on the ground floor and there are three bedrooms, shower room and fam..."
"**SPACIOUS DETACHED THREE BEDROOM HOME** Martin & Co are pleased to offer this detached family home. Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac, within the very popular St Edeyrns. The ground floor is accessed through a porch, to a generous living room. Boasting a modern fitted kitchen/diner with access ..."
"Fully loaded with charm and tradition is this fantastic three bedroom, bay fronted semi detached home. This is a perfect family home that has to be viewed to be appreciated. Call Darlows on "
"Stunning family home much improved by the current owners to a high specification throughout. Contemporary four bedroom detached family home with stylish open plan kitchen/diner with utility room, separate living room with bi fold doors opening onto the private rear garden, and cloakroom/w.c to t..."
"INTERNAL INSPECTION IS A MUST to appreciate the size of accomm offered with this 4 BED Bay Fronted Mid Tce with 2 sep reception rooms, 16' kit/breakfast room, study/5th bedroom, 2 bathrooms.  PARKING & GARAGE.  WOULD SUIT LARGE FAMILY. NO CHAIN."
"An ideal opportunity to purchase a large extended family semi-detached home or suitable for two families sharing. Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac in immaculate order throughout. Walking distance to shops, schools and public transport with no ongoing chain. Internal viewing is highly recommended."
THE WILLOW OFFERING VERSATILE ACCOMMODATION ALONG WITH FANTASTIC TECHNOLOGY THAT WILL HELP YOU SAVE ON YOUR UTILITY BILLS. SOLAR PANELS & BATTERY STORAGE GROUND SOURCE HEAT PUMPS & ELECTRIC CAR CHARGER POINT FITTED. INCENTIVES ON MARCH RESERVATIONS
"Stunning 18th floor apartment consisting of an impressive spacious open plan living room with island kitchen, superb city skyline and sea views, 3 generous bedrooms, 2 secure parking spaces, ensuite to master bedroom, large bathroom and on site concierge facilities. Call now to view!"
"Enjoy the best of modern living in this popular three-bedroom home which benefits from a stylish open-plan kitchen/diner with French doors leading into the garden. The Hatfield's bright front aspect living room, separate utility room, handy storage cupboard and downstairs WC make this a great home."
"An immaculate and extended, three double bedroom family home situated in a highly desirable part of Whitchurch. This delightful home has benefited from a double storey extension to create a wonderful kitchen, a study and additional bedroom. The current owners have maintained the property to a hig..."
"A spacious four bedroom mid terrace family home in Machen Place, Riverside. With spacious living and a private easy maintainable rear garden. With in walking distance to local amenities and minutes away from local transport links to and from Cardiff City Centre."
"A spacious four bedroom mid terrace family home in Llandetty Road, Fairwater. Benefiting from entrance hall, spacious lounge, kitchen dining room, large utility room, store room, four good size bedrooms, family bathroom, en suite shower room and rear garden with lane access."
"NO CHAIN. GREAT LOCATION CLOSE TO ROATH LAKE. FAMILY HOUSE. GENEROUS GARDEN. PARKING. A fantastic opportunity to purchase this wonderful family home situated in a fantastic location! The accommodation comprises, entrance hall, open plan sitting /dining room, kitchen and conservatory. T..."
"This stunning 4-bedroom property is situated in Danescourt. It is Semi-Detached and equip with an electrical car charging port and a separate garage, it also benefits from space to park two cars and a large rear garden"
MODERN AND STYLISH THREE BED SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN WHITCHURCH. *Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this modern and beautifully presented three bedroom family home in the sought after location of Whitchurch. This property has generous living accommodation including a decorativ...
"Stunning semi detached property in the popular Llanishen area. The accommodation briefly comprises of porch, entrance hall, open lounge and dining room, kitchen, downstairs cloakroom, three bedrooms and bathroom. Good size rear garden and off road parking to the front of the property with access ..."
*New Price* OAC offer a beautifully presented 3 bedroom detached family house set on a corner plot in Tongwynlais
Immaculately presented Two Double Bedroom Semi-detached bungalow in a quiet location in Whitchurch. This home is modern throughout and has been extended to the rear to add a dining area and increase the kitchen size. 
"We are pleased to offer to the market this lovely traditional yet modern three bedroom semi detached property, situated on the popular New Road offering fantastic transport links to and from Cardiff City Centre. The property has a modern feel whilst keeping its traditional charm with features such a"
"This lovely family home is ideal for a growing family , ideally situated in a quiet little corner of this desirable development. The property offers spacious accommodation in a quiet setting."
"Situated between Victoria Park and Thompsons Park, this three bed end terrace propety benefits from an entrance porch, spacious living room. lounge, dining room, kitchen, utility room, three good size bedrooms, family bathroom and a good size private rear garden."
"A four bedroom semi detached home occupying a unique plot with wrap around gardens. Further benefiting from off road parking, a detached single garage, two reception rooms and four good size bedrooms."
"** GUIDE PRICE £340,000 - £350,000** Located on a quiet, yet convenient street in Cyncoed, is this very well presented, semi-detached dormer bungalow FOR SALE. This extended home is set on a good size plot, and offers a mature larger than average rear garden. The Accommodation Briefly Comprises ..."
Immaculate four bedroom detached family home situated at the end of a cul-de-sac with the nearby local amenities of Culverhouse Cross with easy access to the M4 and public transport links to the City Centre.
"No onwad Chain! Very well presented four bedroom end terraced townhouse benefitting from excellent transport links to Cardiff Gate Retail & Business Park, M4, A48 and Cardiff City Centre. Spire Cardiff Hospital is also within close proximity, as are a number of local amenities includin..."
"A spacious, well-proportioned and extended semi-detached family home, positioned within popular Wyncliffe Gardens development, close to local supermarkets and just a short drive to Cardiff Gate amenities and M4 motorway, with good bus links to the City Centre. 37ft modern open plan living space c..."
"We are delighted to present to market this spacious and unique three bedroom family home, ideally situated in a desirable road in the popular village of Rumney. The property is close to local amenities, schools and public transport and is convenient for the city centre and the UHW. The property..."
"*Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom end terrace house in Whitchurch* This spacious family home situated in Whitchurch offers excellent living/ dining accommodation, three good sized bedrooms, second floor bathroom, and a well maintained garden in a excellent locat..."
"£340,000, Three Bedroom Double Bay Fronted Mid Terrace House with Large Enclosed Garden and Garage in Hafod Street, Grangetown, Cardiff, CF11 6RB"
"A charming, white-washed cottage set just off the picturesque Cathedral Green. This romantic home is beautiful, both inside and out, and enjoys a prime location within easy walking distance to Llandaff’s coffee shops, boutiques, and restaurants. Cardiff Castle and the City Centre are only a 2.5 m..."
"** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** SPACIOUS SHOP AND THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME ** A unique opportunity to purchase a spacious, three double bedroom family home with garden, garage and a shop located to the front which is currently leased as a Barbers. WITH PREVIOUS PLANNING PERMISSION F..."
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to bring to the market this FIRST FLOOR apartment offering very spacious accommodation, open plan living, kitchen and dining area that benefit Juliet balcony, Bay fronted double bedroom and single bedroom, bathroom and storage in the hallway. Recently redecorated throughou..."
"*** Guide Price: £339,950 *** NO CHAIN!!! INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - CLOSE TO VICTORIA PARK - 4 ROOMS PREVIOUSLY LET OUT - 3x DOUBLE BEDROOMS - 3x RECEPTIONS - DOWNSTAIRS SHOWER ROOM - UPSTAIRS BATHROOM with W.C - A THIRD SEPARATE W.C - ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN & GARAGE with REAR LANE ACCESS - MR..."
"A further release of our popular detached 'BRIAR' style home FOR 2023!. Offering low carbon technology and an excellent specification. Call to arrange to visit our Briar show home. Offering off road parking and a lovely rear garden,"
This stunning link detached home is located on the popular City Gardens development and would be ideal for a family. There is modern look throughout the house with a feature grey high gloss kitchen and contrasting white quartz worktop. The decoration throughout is neutral and this woul...
"We are are delighted to present to the market this fantastic bay-fronted, 3-bedroom end-terrace family home in the heart of sought after Whitchurch, within a few minutes walk of the abundance of amenities that this lovely village has to offer, including excellent public transport to the city cent..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £185,000 - £195,000 ** Located in a quiet Cul de Sac, just off Goldcrest Drive, is this generously sized First floor Maisonette for sale. This purpose built TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM property benefits from its own entrance, bathroom, and great size living area with open plan kitchen...."
***TOWNHOUSE***CENTURY WHARF*** A superbly proportioned townhouse is now available to be purchased in the Century Wharf area of Cardiff Bay. This larger style property sits within this popular gated development with a 24 hour concierge service and is just a short walk from all the amenit...
"At This Most Popular Area Towards North Cardiff Can Be Found This Traditional Built Bay Fronted Mid Terrace House, The Property Is Located With A Variety Of Facilities To Hand To Include Schools, Shops And Public Transport. Accommodation Briefly Comprises Of Entrance Hall, Lounge, 17' Open Plan F..."
"***LARGE PLOT WITH EVEN MORE POTENTIAL TO EXPAND AND BUILD*** This family home is situated on a larger than average corner plot in Llanishen offering no forward chain. The home currently is used as a 5 bedroom house with two bedrooms being on the bottom floor, this can be easily..."
"This lovely three bedroom family home is well situated off Carisbrooke way, in the sought after are of Penylan. Within walking distance to amenities and Roath Recreation ground, Cardiff Metropolitan University and with great links to the A48 and M4 this is a fantastic location. Accommodation brie..."
"Well presented three bedroom detached home in a sought after location. It's the perfect family home or the ideal first-time purchase. There is potential to extend to the side and rear of the property, subject to the relevant planning permissions"
"A very large extended three double bedroom extended family home that needs to be viewed to be fully appreciated. Plenty of off road parking, a private rear garden and no chain, situated within walking distance of Llanishen village. GUIDE PRICE £330,000 TO £340,000."
Located upon the second floor of this exclusive waterfront complex and boasting uninterrupted water views of the lake towards Cardiff Bay & Penarth. For sale with no ongoing chain and found in exceptional order. Lacuna benefits from electric gates on entry for secure parking - 2 spaces allocated ...
"In a central Canton location and within walking distance of Cowbridge Road is this neatly presented three bedroom mid-terrace property. The property offers great space.. Internally the property offers three downstairs reception rooms with bay-fronted lounge with feature fireplace, a second, middl..."
"New properties designed for modern living at Aspen Grove. The new homes allow people moving in to benefit from lower emissions and greener living, Nearly 50 plots reserved and occupations have begun since launching eralier this year. Sales office and shoew homes open daily 10am - 5pm."
"This four bedroom, detached property situated in the popular area of St Mellons simply must be seen. Benefitting from plenty of living space and well proportioned bedrooms, this is a perfect family home! Call Darlows "
"A modern built, 3/4 bedroom, three storey end-link town house, tastefully presented throughout with front driveway, side carport and fully enclosed, landscaped rear garden with additional parking space and visitor parking accessible. Favourably located with excellent transport links close by all..."
RARE DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY | A rare opportunity within a highly sought after area of Cardiff. The land is currently occupied by a garage but applications have been submitted with a view of demolishing the existing building and the erection of a new development to form an A3 commercial unit to t...
"This sizeable three double bedroom, bay fronted, end of terraced house. This well presented abode offers: entrance hall, bay fronted living room - 13' 9'' x 11' 10'', sitting room - 12' 10'' x 11' 10''', dining room - 11' 10'' x 11' 2'', kitchen - 12' 6'' x 7' 3'', utility area and wc on the gro..."
"A lovely extended two-bedroom semi-detached bungalow, in a quiet and sought-after cul-de-sac in Whitchurch, conveniently positioned within a few minutes walk of Whitchurch village with an abundance of amenities, Coryton Railway station, and within short driving distance of the M4 and A470 arterie..."
"*** Guide Price: £330,000 to £340,000 *** A 3 STOREY - DOUBLE BAY FRONTED & DORMER EXTENDED - 4-BED SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME - OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINER - LOUNGE with SOLID OAK FLOORING - UTILITY with ROOM OFF TO ADD A DOWNSTAIRS SHOWER & W.C) - EXTENDED MASTER BEDROOM with EN-SUITE - G..."
"This spacious THREE bedroom bay fronted end of terrace home, comes with the benefit of a 4 Bed HMO License. Set in this sought after location of ROATH, within walking distance of local amenities and close to the City Centre with easy access to the A48/M4 access corridor. Viewings Recommended!"
"Beautiful two-bedroom Penthouse apartment with study, just a short walk to The Cathedral Green and Llandaff high street with its many amenities. This impressive property benefits from LVT wood effect flooring, a luxury fitted kitchen, a stunning bathroom and access to a private balcony."
"5 Bedroom HMO currently let until June 2023 providing an annual income of £21,562. Planning permission granted for a loft conversion creating a sixth bedroom. Please contact us for full details and plans. The property was renovated recently and boasts stunning open plan kit (cont.)"
"** MODERN THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME ** NO CHAIN **
A modern semi detached family home in the sought after development being a short distance from transport links and park. Entrance hallway, cloakroom, spacious lounge, modern kitchen and dining room with integrated appliances. To the..."
*SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION* *SEMI-DETACHED* *4 BEDROOMS* 
"An extended four bedroom semi-detached property situated in a cul-de-sac within close proximity to schools, shops and public transport. The property benefits from a downstairs cloakroom, a large kitchen/breakfast room overlooking the garden, an en-suite."
"A recently refurbished 3 bedroom home in Llandaff North. The property has been fully renovated, providing convenient & modern living. Whitchurch High & Glan Taf school catchments, Highly desirable location."
"This stunning contemporary two double bedroom first floor apartment with views of Sophia Walk. This lovely size property has a secure private hallway with lift access, a light & airy open plan lounge/kitchen area with French doors leading to a private balcony, an ensuite and family bathroom."
"Set in this central location of Roath, this well presented bay fronted home is offered to the market with three double bedrooms, three reception rooms and ground floor w.c with first floor bathroom. A lovely home which must be viewed internally!"
INTERNAL VIEWING IS A MUST! This 4 bedroom home situated minutes walk from park and close to City Centre has been extended and updated! There is an integrated garage with driveway.
An end of terrace property situated in the sought after location comprising 2 x self contained one bedroom flats and a further 3 bedrooms with loft room. The property althought split into flats is on one deed.
A lovely and modern three bedroom property located in an attractive location in St Fagans with great transport links and easy access to Cardiff. This property has recently been upgraded with a newly fitted kitchen and a landscaped garden.
"Attractive, modern, and well-presented, this spacious property boasts four double bedrooms arranged over three floors providing perfect family living in a highly desirable location..."
REF: 19124914 5 BEDROOM HMO – 2 FULL BATHROOMS - £395 PER PERSON PER MONTH – LET FOR ACHIDEMIC YEAR 23/24 – BILLS EXCLUDED - FULLY FURNISHED - 7.3% RETURN.
"An Exceptional Semi-Detached Bungalow, With A High Standard Of Finish Throughout And Prime Position Within This Sought After Cul-De-Sac. We are delighted to offer for sale this tastefully presented property, with spacious rooms, low maintenance rear garden and generous garage of approx 25"" length."
***BEING SOLD NO CHAIN*** A lovely three bedroom family home situated in the popular area of St. Mellons. offering ample of living space the property has alot to offer offering so much potential and viewing is essential.
"An Exceptional Semi-Detached Bungalow, With Large Southerly Facing Garden, Period Style Features And Off Street Parking."
"EXECUTIVE FOUR BEDROOM TOWNHOUSE. POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA. DRIVEWAY, GARDEN AND GARAGE. IMMACULATLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT. NO CHAIN. FREEHOLD. An immaculately presented, executive four-bedroom townhouse in a popular and central location. Windsor Village, just off Rover Way, is about te..."
"A well presented THREE BEDROOM detached family home situated in the popular location of ST MELLONS within easy access to the A48/M4 access corridor. The property further benefits front and rear gardens, off street parking and detached garage. Internal Viewing's Highly Recommended!"
"We are delighted to present to market this four bedroom townhouse with generous proportions, laid out over three floors. The property is ideally situated in the popular area of Birchgrove, close to the University Hospital of Wales and an abundance of local amenities, as well as being within easy ..."
"A FOUR BEDROOM mid terraced townhouse, set in the popular location of WINDSOR VILLAGE, within walking distance of local amenities and easy access to bus routes and shops. Cardiff City centre is easily accessible and the A48/M4 access corridor is just a short drive away."
"This bay fronted Victorian terraced house would benefit from updating but provides a great opportunity to create a lovely family home in a very popular location close to the many and varied amenities which Canton has to offer. The property comprises accommodation of: Entrance hall, two recep..."
"Brilliant size three bedroom detached home located in Danescourt, within close proximity to reputable schools, amenities & transport links to all areas of Cardiff. This property benefits from off-street parking, a good size garage & a lovely rear garden with views of the Taff trail."
Terrific Extended Three Bedroom Semi Detached House
"NO CHAIN - Three bedroom semi detached in Llandaff North with off road parking and garage and boasting large rear garden. Walking distance to local amenities to include restaurants and pubs, shops, cafes and of course the train station and Hailey Park. Viewings by appointment only."
"£325,000, Investment Opportunity, Mixed Use Property, Established Ground Floor Hairdressing Salon and Barber Shop, and Fully Refurbished Two Bedroom 1st Floor Flat with Terrace, Wentloog Road, Rumney, Cardiff, CF3 3HD"
"Very well presented three bedroom semi detached property in the sought after area of Whitchurch close to the village with a range of shops, cafes, bars, restaurants and amenities. The home offers three reception rooms, three bedrooms plus loft room, utility room, cloakroom, lean to and detached g..."
"**INCREDIBLE OPPORTUNITY IN THE HEART OF LLANDAFF** MGY are delighted to bring to market this end of link house in the sought after area of Llandaff. 'Clarke's Yard' has been redeveloped into modern day living within walking distance to well regarded schools, Llandaff Village, the Cathedral and L..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain this lovely three bedroom, bay fronted terraced home is ideally placed for access to the wealth of amenities of Whitchurch road and for access to the University Hospital of Wales. Access to the A48, A470 and M4 are all within a short distance, perfect fo..."
"Plot 480 The Afon Teifi is clever in design and is a three bedroom home quite unlike any of its terraced rivals with open plan kitchen/dining room, a spacious modern lounge and an useful downstairs cloakroom. The main bedroom has an en-suite and fitted wardrobes as standard. This plot overlooks..."
An amazing opportunity to purchase a 3 bedroom semi-detached property on the desired Elgar Crescent. Please call us on to arrange a viewing
No Chain! Lincoln Street is a no-through road placed just off Cowbridge Road East towards the west end of Canton and close to Victoria Park. This charming single-bay fronted mid-terrace house has been reinvented with a neutral palette with a nod to modern industrial-style decor. The pro...
"***SIMPLY SUPERB*** Rarely does such a sizeable and well presented home like this come to market in Canton. This excellent home is within close proximity to Chapter Arts, Thompson and Victoria Parks along with the benefit of Canton's shops, eateries and amenities, This unique end terrace house ha..."
Rarely available two bedroom double detached bungalow set on a large plot and in a popular cul de sac of St Mellons. Offered for sale in excellent order throughout and within walking distance of local amenities. Viewing is highly recommended.
"Being sold with no chain located in a popular location close to local amenities and transport links to the city With churches, parks, local sports centre, the Splott and Clifton amenities at hand, plus large national outlets lining Newport road"
***COMING SOON *** This three bedroom property is coming soon to the market located close to local shops and transport links offering open plan living and a larger than average garden with off street parking for more than two cars and a garage call today to arrange your viewing
"Superb new build duplex with bespoke finishing's located in the highly desirable Pontcanna area. The property is located less than a mile from the city centre, comes with a share of the freehold and has an optional parking space."
"Matthews Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this unique, modern and deceptively spacious three bedroom link detached dorma bungalow set in a cul-de-sac location in Old St Mellons. The property is conveniently positioned with excellent transport links to Cardiff City Centre, Newpor..."
"*** Guide Price: £320,000 to £330,000 *** NO CHAIN!!! - A SPACIOUS & DETACHED 4/5 BEDROOM MODERN FAMILY HOME - QUIET CUL-DE-SAC - PRIVATE DEVELOPMENT - 3/4 RECEPTION ROOMS/ CONSERVATORY - CLOAKROOM - UTILITY ROOM - MASTER BEDROOM with EN-SUITE - PRIVATE DRIVEWAY - ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN..."
*4 bedroom semi-detached house on a corner plot with garage and parking to the rear*
"**THREE STOREY SEMI DETACHED HOUSE** A well presented three storey semi detached house situated in the popular village of Radyr close to all local amenities. Views over the Green and park area. The accommodation comprises hallway, lounge, kitchen/breakfast room and cloakroom. To the first floor t..."
"** TRADITIONAL THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME ** A bright and spacious three bedroom semi detached family home in a convenient location, being a short distance from transport links and local amenities. Entrance hallway, cloakroom, bay fronted lounge, spacious sitting/dining room and sepa..."
If you are looking to live near to the River Taff then take a look at this four bed bay fronted house on Coedcae Street in Grangetown. It is located near to Taff Embankment and is a really popular area with people who want to be near the City Centre
"A traditional, extended three bedroom semi-detached house placed on St Fagans Road in Fairwater located a stones throw away from Waungron Park and Train Station. With generous, light and spacious living and offering excellent potential throughout, the accommodation briefly comprises: En..."
"Simply stunning! A completely transformed three bedroom semi-detached located on this popular development in Whitchurch. Modernised to a high standard throughout by the current owners with an open plan kitchen taking centre stage, the accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Cloakroom, Lou..."
"** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT ** Situated in the popular residential area of Roath within walking distance of all local shopping facilities and amenities. This traditional mid terraced property offers hallway, lounge open to dining room, kitchen and sun room. To the first floor there are ..."
"A beautifully presented mid terraced, 3 bedroom bay fronted Victorian property located on Wauntreoda in Whitchurch. This ideally located family home offers spacious accommodation throughout and benefits from a renewed kitchen and bathroom, modern Vaillant combination boiler, UPVC windows and loft..."
"MGY are delighted to offer for sale this *CHAIN FREE* semi detached property in a lovely position within walking distance to The Taff Trail / Hailey park and the shops at Station Road. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, lounge/ dining room, kitchen, 3 bedrooms and a bathroom. Gardens to f..."
"We are delighted to present to market this well presented three bedroom semi-detached family home, ideally situated in a quiet close in the popular area of Pontprennau, within local school catchment and close proximity to all local amenities, public transport for city centre, as well as being sho..."
"GUIDE £310,000 - £315,000. NEXA Cardiff are delighted to be selling this large semi - detached town house in Pontprennau. "
"** WONDERFUL WATER VIEWS ** Gary Hancock and RE/MAX are delighted to present this immaculate larger than average two bedroom raised ground floor apartment. Situated in the sought after Century Wharf development of Cardiff Bay which offers secure gated access, 24 hour concierge service and pool ..."
"Beautifully presented and much improved five double bedroom property conveniently located close to many and varied local amenities including the local Doctors surgery and Rumney Primary School. This lovely family home briefly comprises a spacious lobby, leading into the hallway. Living room overl..."
"No Onward Chain. Hern & Crabtree are pleased to present this mid terrace three-bedroom property located in close proximity to local amenities, University Hospital, Heath park and transport links into the City Centre. The house comprises lounge, dining room leading on to a large kitchen complete w..."
"Maison are proud to present a Ground Floor Apartment, situated in the heart of Pontcanna. Pontcanna is a vibrant area with the opportunity to visit local coffee-shops, bars, boutiques, restaurants and parklands all within a short walking distance. This beautiful and spacious apartment offers a f..."
"A three bedroom detached home with a large rear garden, located at the end of a quiet cul de sac and only minutes from local amenities and transport links along Culverhouse Cross. The property is within walking distance to local primary and secondary Schools."
"*** SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE - SITTING ROOM - STUNNING KITCHEN BREAKFAST ROOM - FIVE BEDROOMS - 4 PIECE SUITE BATHROOM - TWO TIER SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN - OFF STREET PARKING - FREEHOLD - IMMACULATE CONDITION THROUGHOUT *** MR Homes are proud to present to the open market this impressive, extended..."
"*Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom mid terrace house in Canton* This spacious family home situated in Canton offers excellent living accommodation, three very good sized bedrooms, second floor bathroom and separate WC, and patio garden. NO CHAIN. MUST BE VIEWED. "
"*** Offers Over £165,000 *** Jeffery Ross are please to offer for sale this beautifully presented One bedroom property comprising of entrance hall, kitchen, lounge, conservatory, landing with large storage cupboard, one bedroom and first floor bathroom. Outside there is an enclosed rear garden w..."
"Situated within the Century Wharf development and therefore enjoying the use of communal gardens, concierge and leisure suite. The property is a larger style apartment situated on the ground floor and benefitting from direct water views and a large wrap around terrace affording excellent and usef..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £310,000 - £320,000*** Located in the popular street of Elgar Crescent this extremely well presented three bedroom semi detached house would make a perfect property for the growing family. With modern decor throughout and a 25' kitchen/diner/family room."
A traditional 3 bedroom mid terrace situated on Heol Y Forlan in Whitchurch Village. The property offers exceptional potential to create a wonderful family home. Recent improvements include new carpets and the property benefits from a modern combination boiler and UPVC windows. The property brief...
**RECENTLY REFURBISHED TO HIGH STANDARD**THREE BEDROOMS**LARGE GARDEN**DRIVEWAY & GARAGE**MODERN LIVING**GREAT FAMILY HOME**DESIRABLE LOCATION**Leanne Kent Property are pleased to bring to the market this recently refurbished three-bedroom semi-detached property in Rumney.
"A fantastic opportunity to put your own stamp on a lovely three bedroom traditional family home in Rumney. Conveniently located close to various amenities and well placed for access to the city centre, University hospital of wales and access to the A48 and M4 makes this location great for commute..."
"The Perfect Family Home, An Exceptional Semi-Detached Residence With Generous Corner Plot And Garage! We are delighted to offer for sale this tastefully presented property with ample living space and enviable grounds."
If you love Grangetown then you are going to love this bay fronted home on Clare Road. It would be ideal for a family or friends looking to share as there are three bedrooms and three reception rooms
"A spacious four bedroom family home in Beauchamp Street, Cardiff. Benefiting from spacious living accommodation including a separate lounge, dining and kitchen, two shower rooms, four good size bedrooms and an enclosed rear garden."
Call today and secure your viewing on this stunning four bedroom semi-detached property situated in the sought after area of St Mellons. Benefiting from plenty of living space and an impressive rear garden this would make an ideal family home!
"A four bedroom HMO property. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, bay fronted communal living room, bedroom/reception room with original fireplace and modern kitchen with utility room on the ground floor and to the first floor are three further bedrooms, bathroom and shower room. To the out..."
"A stylish, modernised semi detached family home offered for sale with no onward chain. The property is situated in the highly sought after area of Riverside in Cardiff and offers easy access to a plethora of eateries, shops and amenities - including Chapter Arts Centre, excellent bus lin..."
This 3 bedroom townhouse is located in Pontprennau and is currently tenanted as a 4 bedroom HMO. 
"The perfect AirBnB Investment Property! Located within minutes of Cardiff city centre & Cardiff Bay area is this recently renovated building, offering in excess of 1200 SqFt of accommodation, spread over three floors. Potential yield in excess of 10%!"
"A deceptively spacious three bedroom end of terrace family home situated within walking distance of Llanishen Village, Schools and Public Transport. The property benefits from a kitchen, two reception rooms, a good size rear garden and spacious four parking space to the front."
"No onwards chain. This traditional bay fronted semi-detached house on the popular Bwlch Road , Fairwater is ideal for a family looking to make the property their forever home"
A rare opportunity to purchase a two bedroom first floor retirement apartment situated at the end of the development with the use of a 'walk out' balcony overlooking landscaped communal gardens situated within a few hundred yards of Llanishen village and public transport with no ongoing chain.
"A three bedroom detached home located in a desirable location on the edge of Cyncoed. The property comprises an entrance hallway, a lounge, a fitted kitchen, dining room and a conservatory. To the first floor there are three bedrooms and a family bathroom. Externally there is a driveway providing..."
"David's Homes present an attractive development opportunity within close proximity of Cardiff City Centre. This freehold property, with a prominent corner position, consists of a generous ground floor shop unit circa 1500sqft, a spacious two bedroom apartment and a rear outbuilding that has..."
"No Chain. Nicholson Webb Close is a small no-through road in Danescourt, a suburb approximately 4 miles north west of Cardiff. This well-cared-for semi-detached house offers excellent scope to improve and extend if desired. The property that retains much of the original build design offers large ..."
"This bay-fronted mid-terraced home is in a highly popular area of Paget Street, Grangetown. Well-situated for near-by Grange Pavilion at Grange Gardens, local Primary Schools and within walking distance to the City Centre and Cardiff Bay"
"Deceptively larger than average three bedroom detached family home located in a private Cul De Sac in St Mellons, Cardiff East. Featuring the added bonus of a converted garage, conservatory and loft room. Call Darlows on !"
"**LOVELY FAMILY HOME**SOLAR PANELS**WELL PRESENTED**LOTS OF SCOPE**
We are delighted to present to market this well-presented three bedroom family home, ideally situated in a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular area of Rumney village. The property is within short walking distance of the village amen..."
"Being Sold by YOPA Online Auction. Starting Bids from £300,000. Buy it now option available
Please call or visit YOPA Online Auctions for more information
Being Sold by Online Auction
Buy-it-Now option available
Buyer’s fees apply"
ARE YOU LOOKING FOR A FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE IN ST MELLONS? Then look no further. This four bedroom detached house is located on a quiet cul-de-sac and has a good condition throughout the property. 
"*WELL PRESENTED THEE BED FAMILY HOME IN THORNHILL* Edwards and Co are delighted to offer for sale another fabulous property in this desirable Thornhill location. The property offers spacious living accommodation, parking and gardens. MUST BE VIEWED."
"This three bedroom home is being offered to the the market with no onwards chain Located in the popular area of Roath, set back from Albany Road and within access of the university sites and great transport links to the city"
"*** Guide Price: £300,000 to £310,000 *** NO CHAIN!!! - DETACHED BUNGALOW - 2-BEDROOMS - BAY FRONTED - 18ft SPACIOUS LOUNGE - KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM - MODERN BATHROOM SUITE - REAR LANE ACCESS - GARAGE - ENCLOSED FRONT GARDEN & A SOUTH FACING ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN - CLOSE TO SHOPS / AME..."
"Stunning two bedroom apartment located in a great position on Cathedral Road in Pontcanna, within walking distance to Cardiff City Centre and within close proximity to Pontcanna fields. This must see property benefits from an open plan kitchen/living room and allocated parking."
"A very well presented traditional THREE BEDROOM semi detached bay fronted family home set in the popular location of RUMNEY within walking distance of local amenities and easy access to local schools, bus routes and shops. An ideal family home with internal viewing recommended!"
"Two Bedroom Apartment, Stunning Water Views Across Cardiff Bay and Beyond, 17th floor, Open plan living/kitchen with Wraparound Windows, Immaculately Presented Throughout, Two Allocated Underground Parking Spaces."
A character extended three bedroom cottage style semi-detached property situated within walking distance of Llanishen village in need of modernisation but offering plenty of potential. There is good off road parking and no ongoing chain.
"Occupying a tranquil location, set within a rarely available cul-de-sac, with views from the rear overlooking the Plymouth Great Wood, is this wonderful three-bedroom house with landscaped rear garden & off road parking for several vehicles."
***LARGE FAMILY HOME***This four bedroom semi detached house located in a popular street in Llanrumney is perfect for a large family as it offers excellent living space throughout and needs to be seen to be fully appreciated.
"*** GUIDE PRICE: £300,000 to £310,000 *** 3-BED SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME - TWO RECEPTION ROOMS - STUNNING KITCHEN BREAKFAST ROOM - EASY TO MAINTAIN REAR GARDEN - OFF STREET PARKING FOR 3 CARS - FREEHOLD. MR Homes are delighted to Offer FOR SALE this excellent family home that h..."
"A spacious three bedroom semi-detached 1940's house in a delightful rural setting with green fields to the front and countryside to the rear. Exceptional living space with private parking and large rear gardens, available with early possession, see inside."
"A unique opportunity to acquire this one/two bedroom ground floor & basement flat. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, living room/bedroom 1, bedroom 2,, shower room and open plan kitchen/dining/living area with wood floor on the ground floor and to the basement is a large shower room..."
Are you looking for a turn key type new home? Then look no further than this stunning three bedroom home!
A three bedroom end-terrace house set up as a HMO with individual kitchens and bathrooms. The property would ideally suit an investment buyer looking to continue use as a HMO.
"A much loved, extended, three bedroom semi detached home occupying this substantial plot. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, bathroom, living/dining room and modern kitchen on the ground floor and to the first floor are three bedrooms. To the outside is a driveway leading to a garage fro..."
"A Spacious Detached Bungalow Set In A Prime Location, Near The Heart Of Whitchurch Village. We're delighted to offer for sale this unique property, benefiting from a wealth of internal accommodation and pleasant gardens"
"A great investment opportunity to acquire this five person HMO property located just off Crwys Road, close to the Universities and a short walk into the City Centre. Currently, let until June 2024 with an income of £22,137 giving a healthy return in excess of 7%"
"A rare chance to purchase a detached home in Canton. This bay-fronted home has lots to love, including two bedrooms, an upstairs bathroom, two reception rooms, kitchen, utility, and cloakroom. The house is complemented by a lovely garden that is at a slight angle to the street, affording more pri..."
"An opportunity to acquire a recently improved 3 bedroom semi detached house in a quiet close which benefits from nearby amenities, such as local shops, restaurants and bars and also picturesque parkland including Waterloo Gardens and Roath Park. This small family home briefly comprises entrance p..."
"A larger style three bedroom end of terrace house located on this quiet no through road close to Waungron Park and Tran Station in Fairwater. Tastefully presented throughout by the current owners, the accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Room, Modern Fitted Kitchen and C..."
"This handsome bay-fronted residence is located on the highly-desirable Brook Street, situated within seconds of the banks of the River Taff, Canton bridge and the City Centre. This wonderful home offers accommodation spread over 1100 SqFt and sold with no chain."
"Watts & Morgan are delighted to market this beautifully presented, spectacular third floor two bedroom apartment located in the highly desirable Bayscape. Situated in the heart of Cardiff Bay with spectacular views over Cardiff and the Marina. Conveniently located to Cardiff City Centre and t..."
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to present this impressively sized 3 bedroom semi detached family home on this popular road in Llanishen. The property briefly comprises entrance hallway, principle reception room open plan modern fitted kitchen and breakfast/dining area. To the first floor are three great..."
"*** Offers In Excess of; £299,950 *** A DETACHED 3/4 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME - POSSIBLE DEVELOPMENT POTENTIAL* Subject to Planning Consent - FREEHOLD - MR HOMES are pleased to Offer FOR SALE this 3/4 Bedroom Detached Family Home comprising in brief; Ground Floor - Entrance Hallway, Cloakroom/Do..."
"£299,000, Four Bedroom Mid Terrace House with Enclosed Garden in Corporation Road, Grangetown, Cardiff, CF11 7AU"
"Modern Three bedroom mid terraced home located in sought after Thornhill, Cardiff. This beautifully presented property has a large lounge / dining room, modern kitchen and a fabulous conservatory with underfloor heating leading to private garden. Three bedrooms, modern bathroom . Driveway for 2 cars"
"This three bedroom family home is located in Llanrumney, close to amenities and with great transport links nearby to the A48 and M4. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge, dining room and kitchen to the ground floor. to the first floor there are three bedrooms, a bathroom and separa..."
"Agreed are delighted to offer for sale this substantial two bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated in the delightful Suburb of Pontprennau. The property is within walking distance of local amenities. Offering two reception rooms and one bathroom, the property benefits from having gas central hea..."
"A tastefully presented, and homely three bedroom semi-detached house with a generous rear garden, summer house and off street parking is located on Llanbedr Road, Fairwater"
"A well presented three bedroom detached property situated in popular village location with two reception areas, modern fitted kitchen and modern first floor shower room. Further benefits from gas heating, double glazing, rear garden, roof garden and integral garage. Internal viewing is recommended."
A fantastic opportunity to acquire a three double bedroom apartment sixth floor apartment in the heart of Cardiff City Centre that has the added bonus of being offered to market with no onward chain. Contact us today to arrange your viewing appointment. 
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to bring to the market this impressive investment opportunity that further benefits planning for 4 x 1 bedroom apartments. (Planning number - 18/01151/MNR) the property is currently split into 2 apartments, ground floor is a two bedroom apartment with modern fitted kitchen..."
"We are delighted to present to market this stylish three bedroom executive apartment of generous proportions, which has been adapted and updated for luxury contemporary living. Located on the sixth floor with lift access, the property boasts a large balcony offering wonderful views over Cardi..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this 4 bedroom, double bay fronted end of terrace family home situated on the popular Coedcae Street in Grangetown. This much loved family home is offered for sale for the first time in over 80 years and is ideally situated and a short walk from the Taff embankment,..."
"Plot 104 - NEW RELEASE! A WELL DESIGNED THREE BED SEMI DETACHED HOME WITH PARKING AND GARDEN. FITTED WITH ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGER, SOLAR PANELS AND A BATTERY TO STORE GENERATED ELECTRICITY. GROUND SOURCE HEAT PUMP COMPLETES THIS ENERGY SAVING EQUIPMENT. CALL FOR INFO"
"**TRADITIONAL MID-TERRACED HOUSE* NO CHAIN** MGY are pleased to offer for sale a spacious four bedroom mid-terraced house, situated within the popular Grangetown area. Walking distance to Cardiff City Centre, Cardiff Bay and local amenities. The accommodation briefly comprises of entrance hall, l..."
"This bay fronted home is located in the sought after Pembroke Road in Canton and would be ideal for a first time buyer. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, living/dining room, kitchen and bathroom which is refurbished 2021 on the ground floor and there are three double bedrooms..."
"Situated in an elevated position with a private aspect and surrounding views is this three bedroom semi-detached home offering spacious accommodation for a growing family. There is a private rear garden, good off road parking and no ongoing chain. Close to Llanishen village amenities."
"YOPA is proud to present this substantial, bay-fronted, four-bedroom terrace property in the popular locality of Cathays. A fantastic investment opportunity, in need of some modernisation, but with character features, please enquire early to avoid disappointment. All Offers & Interest are invited."
"**IMMACULATE CITY CENTRE APARTMENT* NO CHAIN** MGY are pleased to present for sale a seventh floor, two bedroom apartment within the popular city centre development, Hayes Apartments. The spacious accommodation comprises of entrance hall to lounge/diner and modern fitted kitchen, bathroom and two..."
"FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY | 3 Bed HMO | Let at £1,200.00 Per Month | Potential Four Bed Let | Three Double Bedrooms | Open Plan Living Room / Dining Room | Kitchen / Breakfast Room | Bathroom & Separate Toilet | Rear Garden | No Chain"
"** OPEN HOUSE EVENT 18TH MARCH 2023, BY APPOINTMENT ONLY ** ** Guide Price £290,000 - £300,000** Three Bedrooms **** Ensuite Shower Room **** Downstairs WC **** Good Sized Rear Garden **** Off Road Parking x2 **  The Malvern Sty..."
"This three bedroom family home offers so much room for the growing family, located in the popular location of Roath Cardiff this property is being sold with no chain and comprises of three reception rooms and three bedrooms. Like what you see, call the sales team today"
Immaculate three-bedroom semidetached family home with garage
"* OPEN HOUSE SATURDAY FEBRUARY 11th AM. VIEWING STRICTLY BY APPOINTMENT * Very well presented with two double bedrooms, single garage and driveway parking for two cars. Positioned in a quiet cul de sac this two bedroom semi detached property THE PERFECT STARTER HOME. Within walking distance to Wh..."
"**** GREAT FAMILY HOME WITH SPACE THROUGHOUT *** On a great plot with larger garden and double width driveway, modern kitchen /diner, handy ground floor toilet, south west facing rear garden all in sought after area of Rumney. Easy access to wide range of local amenities and transport ***"
"This traditional two bedroom period terraced home, is located in the sought-after and historic Orchard Place in Pontcanna and would be ideal for a first time buyer. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, living/dining room, kitchen and bathroom on the ground floor and there are t..."
Terrific Three Bedroom Terrace House
"Located in a quiet cul de sac and benefiting from having fantastic views across the channel is this extended three bedroom semi detached house in South View Drive, Rumney. With plenty of room for all the family and offered to the market with no onward chain. Perfect first home or the growing family."
"Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac within walking distance of schools, shops and public transport, an immaculately presented three bedroom mid terrace home benefitting from a refurbished kitchen with integrated appliances, a luxury shower room, private rear garden and off road parking."
"*NO CHAIN* *FREEHOLD* *SEMI-DETACHED* *OFF-ROAD PARKING* Fortis are pleased to market with no onward chain is this spacious three bedroom semi detached property, situated in the popular cul-de-sac of Northlands offering fantastic transport links to and from Cardiff City Centre. This property wil..."
"Very well presented three bedroom end of terrace property in the ever popular area of Pontprennau, Cardiff. The home offers modern accommodation throughout and is to be sold with no onwards chain. The home benefits from a log cabin to the rear ideal for a home office, studio or gym. Offering a li..."
"A stunning spacious two bedroom apartment with panoramic views across Cardiiff Bay. Private fifth floor balcony approached from both the bedroom and the lounge. Two luxury contemporary bathrooms, undercover car parking space, 999 year lease, available with no chain."
"A stylish and executive two bedroom apartment with balcony in the sought after Hayes development within the heart of the City Centre. With many and varied shops, restaurants and bars on your doorstep and just a 5 minute walk to Cardiff Central Station this apartment has much to offer. Fantastice ..."
This Double Bay Fronted Edwardian House is not one to be missed. A property to make your home located in the desirable area of Canton
"Well presented Three bedroom end terrace family home in the popular Llanishen area of Cardiff. This property has three double bedrooms, large open plan kitchen/diner and a large lounge with off street parking and low maintenance gardens. UPVC double glazing and Gas Central Heating."
"This bay fronted home is located in the sought after Pembroke Road in Canton and would be ideal for a first time buyer.The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, living/dining room, kitchen and bathroom which is refurbished 2021 on the ground floor and there are three double bedrooms and shower ..."
"A spacious double bay fronted three bedroom semi-detached house positioned in a quiet cul-de-sac has plenty of charm and character. Located in the sort after Ludlow Close, Grangetown and close to Cardiff Bay and the City Centre"
"A deceptively spacious three double bedroom terrace home with a modernised kitchen/diner and bathroom, a 16 ft main bedroom, large rear garden and parking for three cars to the front, situated within walking distance of Llanishen village."
*Very well presented three bed mid terrace family home in Llanishen* Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this spacious family home with generous garden and off road driveway parking for multiple vehicles. MUST BE VIEWED
"Fishguard road is a particularly popular area with families and first time buyers due to its location, a short walk from Coed Glas Primary School, Llanishen village and Ty Glas Retail park with facilities such as a Marks and Spencers supermarket, Boots, Homesense furniture store and gym and cafes."
"**NO CHAIN**A stylish semi-detached three bedroom home located in Picca Close, Wenvoe. Built in 2017 with a 10 year NHBC guarantee and benefiting from off road parking, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen diner, three good size bedrooms, family bathroom, en-suite shower room and landscaped rear garden."
"*** Guide Price: £290,000 to £300,000 *** A SPACIOUS & OPEN-PLAN 3-BED FAMILY HOME - MEZZANINE OFFICE/PLAYROOM ACCESSED FROM BEDROOMS 2 & 3 - BEDROOM 1 with SKYLIGHT to VAULTED CEILING - OPEN-PLAN LIVING - MODERN KITCHEN - UTILITY ROOM & CLOAKROOM - VERY LARGE REAR GARDEN with..."
A beautifully presented three double bedroom property. NO CHAIN. 
"Look no further than this spacious three bedroom home, occupying an enviable corner plot with double gated entry and offering lots of potential to further extend. The property has been greatly improved by the current owners and is ideally located in a quiet road, close to amenities, local school..."
Beautifully finished one bedroom new build apartment with bespoke finishing located in the highly desirable Pontcanna area.
"An Exceptionally Well-Presented End Of Terrace House, Set In A Popular Location Within Easy Reach Of Amenities In Llanishen And Heath. We are pleased to offer for sale this stunning property, with high standard of finish, generous rooms and delightful rear gardens."
****OPEN HOUSE 11TH MARCH 2023**** THE PERFECT PLACE FOR YOUR FAMILY!!
An immaculately presented 4-bedroom end terrace family home which has been much improved and extended by the current owners. The property is situated in a popular residential location within proximity to local amenities and public transport links.
"Investment Opportunity! This traditional bay-fronted mid-terrace dwelling has been converted into two self-contained apartments currently generating £17,400 per annum. "
"A well-presented red brick 2-bedroom mid-terrace period home situated in a highly desirable location within a stone's throw of Whitchurch Village which offers a wide range of amenities, public transport links and well-regarded schools."
A rare opportunity to purchase this 2-bedroom first floor retirement apartment within walking distance to Llanishen Village and its wide range of amenities and transport links.
*Spacious two bedroom ground floor maisonette in Rhiwbina* Edwards and Co are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented and modern ground floor maisonette offering spacious living accommodation within close proximity to local amenities and transport links.
"A glorious penthouse apartment within the original mansion buildings in the highly sought-after waterside development, Adventurers Quay. Enjoys a fabulous outlook over the Cardiff Bay Barrage, this well-presented and immaculately maintained apartment offers bright and spacious living acc..."
"We are delighted to offer to the market this lovely three bedroom, semi-detached property situated on Quarry Dale! Being sat within this location, means that you are within close proximity to all local amenities, primary and secondary schools, parks and transport links to and from Cardiff City Ce..."
"A strikingly beautiful apartment in immaculate order that retains the essence of a magnificent period building even after being transformed as part of a recent restoration project. This breathtaking apartment is beautifully presented, benefiting from shutters and personal touches that enhance..."
No Chain! Rarely available! This spacious and superbly positioned upper ground floor garden apartment is one of only a few two double bedroom apartments available on this complex. With a private patio area and views of the beautifully landscaped gardens to the rear of a modern and exclusive comp...
"A stunning First floor DUPLEX apartment for sale, Located within this iconic Cardiff Building, which has been Sympathetically restored. This beautiful bespoke property offers great accomderdation such as a open plan kitchen living space, with sleek modern Avantgarde kitchen, with integrated HOOVE..."
"Agreed are delighted to offer for sale this substantial three bedroom semi-detached house situated in the delightful town of Cardiff. The property is within walking distance of local schools and amenities. Offering two reception rooms and two bathrooms, the property benefits from having gas centr..."
"Beautiful two-bedroom ground floor apartment in Llandaff, just a short walk to The Cathedral Green and Llandaff high street with its many amenities. This impressive property benefits from LVT wood effect flooring, a luxury fitted kitchen, two great sized double bedrooms and a stunning bathroom."
"We are delighted to present to market this immaculate three bedroom family home, ideally located in a quiet close in a sought after part of the popular St. Mellons area of Cardiff, close to amenities and with easy access onto the A48/M4 arteries. This beautiful home has been greatly improved by ..."
This well presented three bedroom detached house in the St. Mellons area of Cardiff is ideal for a family or anyone looking for their first home. This must be seen so call now to book your viewing!
**NO CHAIN**SIX BEDROOM TERREACE**THREE RECEPTION ROOMS**KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**PARKING TO REAR**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A WIDE RANGE OF FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**PUBLIC TRANSPORT LINKS**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this spacious terraced family home situated within the popula
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to present this impressively sized 3 bedroom end of terrace family home on this popular road in Llanishen. Selling with no ongoing chain in brief the property comprises entrance hallway, principle reception room open plan fitted kitchen and breakfast/dining area, utility a..."
"A tastefully presented three bedroom end of terrace house set on a corner plot, located over looking the green open space in this popular location in Danescourt. The accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Lounge opening into the Dining Room and Fitted Kitchen to the ground floor. To the ..."
"David's Homes are delighted to offer for sale this semi-detached bungalow situated in the well-regarded Cyncoed locale. The property comprises 2 bedrooms, lounge, kitchen and bathroom. The property has also has front and rear gardens, a driveway, and garage. Would ideally benefit from modernisation."
"The extremely popular Hanbury is a three-bedroom family home with a bright and modern open-plan kitchen/diner which has French doors leading into the garden. The downstairs WC, three handy storage cupboards and an en suite to bedroom one mean it ticks all the boxes for practical family living."
"*Edwards & Co are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom semi-detached house in Llanishen* This family home is in a great location offering two excellent size reception rooms, kitchen and separate utility, well presented garden with patio sitting area, and driveway parking. MUST BE VI..."
"***GUIDE PRICE - 280,000 - 290,000***This detached family home presented to the market in excellent order throughout and benefits from being tucked away in a quiet cul de sac in the popular area of Old St Mellons, close to local amenities and including shops, schools, and restaurants."
"We are delighted to present to market this fabulous four bedroom family home, ideally situated on a generous corner plot in the sought after area of Pentwyn, close to amenities, schools and public transport links, as well as being ideally placed for easy access to the M4 and A48 arteries. This ..."
"A traditional bay fronted end terraced home situated in the popular location of SPLOTT, with original features, within walking distance of local amenities and within easy access to Cardiff City Centre and the A48/M4 access corridor. The property further benefits from enclosed rear garden."
"Guide Price £280,000 TO £290,000**NO CHAIN**SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME**THREE BEDROOMS**OPEN PLAN KITCHEN DINER**LIVING ROOM**AMPLE STORAGE***FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**DRIVEWAY**Pinkmove are pleased to present this beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached property, s"
"Darlows Estate Agents are proud to announce this stunning 3 bed duplex property located just off of Cathedral Road, this property is spacious throughout and has recently had all walls repainted and new Carpet throughout"
** SOUTH FACING GARDEN**A lovely home which is waiting for it's next family to love it. Well presented throughout and situated in a great location of Downtown Rise. Come and have a look and you'll see what we mean.
Located within a quiet cul de sac Deceptively spacious this lovely property has much to offer being perfect for flexible family living. ** NO ONWARD CHAIN**
Beautifully finished one bedroom new build apartment with bespoke finishing located in the highly desirable Pontcanna area.This stunning property is located less than a mile from the city centre and comes with a share of the freehold.
"JeffreyRoss are pleased to bring to the market this one bedroom mid terrace property in the popular suburb of Heath, Cardiff. Ideal first time purchase or investment opportunity with no chain. In need of some modernisation and boasting generously sized rear garden, versatile rooms and allocated p..."
"**Double Garage**Large Rear Garden** If you are looking for a lovely family home with spacious living accommodation, look no further! Just minutes walk of local shops, bus routes and schools, this home must be viewed internally to be appreciated!"
Located just a stones throw from Cardiff University this 5 bedroom house is HMO licensed for 4 rooms. Currently let for £1400 PCM (No Bills Included) until June 2022
"**NO CHAIN** We are delighted to present to market this fantastic three double bedroom family home with no onward chain, ideally situated in the sought after St. Edeyrn's Village in Old St. Mellons, convenient for local amenities, UHW and with close proximity to the M4 and A48 links. There is a s..."
"*** OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £280,000- MID TERRACE PROPERTY- LIVING/KITCHEN ROOM- DOWNSTAIRS CLOAKROOM - THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS- FAMILY BATHROOM - SPACIOUS GARDEN - GARAGE- SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION *** New to the open market with MR Homes Estate Agents, is this stylish and well presented Mid te..."
"*** Guide Price: £280,000 to £299,950 *** NO CHAIN!!! 4-BEDROOMS - 2/3 RECEPTION ROOMS - CLOAKROOM/W.C - MODERN KITCHEN - ATTRACTIVE & ENCLOSED GARDENS - BRICK-PAVED DRIVEWAY - uPVC D/G WINDOWS & GAS C/H - EPC RATING = D. FREEHOLD. MR HOMES are very pleased to Offer FOR SALE thi..."
"*** Guide Price: £280,000 *** NO CHAIN!!! CASH BUYERS ONLY - INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - 6 ROOMS - MID-TERRACE PROPERTY - FREEHOLD LOCATED IN A MOST SOUGHT AFTER PART OF CANTON - EARLY VIEWING VERY HIGHLY RECOMMENDED - PLEASE CALL US ON  - Viewings by Appointment...."
"*** Guide Price: £280,000 to £290,000 *** GREATLY EXTENDED (DORMER & REAR EXTENSION) - 3 STOREYS - 5-BEDROOMS - 3-RECEPTIONS - OPEN-PLAN MODERN LIVING - MOVE STRAIGHT IN - MODERNISED THROUGHOUT TO A HIGH STANDARD - CLOAKROOM/DOWNSTAIRS W.C & UTILITY CUPBOARD - RE-FITTED KITCHEN/DI..."
"This family home benefits from off road parking for multiple vehicles, a bedroom, modern fitted kitchen, lounge and dining room to the ground floor, three good size bedrooms and a family bathroom to the first floor and a converted loft with two double bedrooms."
"Darlows of Rumney are pleased to present this great three bedroom semi detached family home located on Brachdy Road, Rumney. This property would make a superb family home and is being sold with the added bonus of NO CHAIN AND PLANNING PERMISSION FOR A DOUBLE STOREY EXTENSION!!!!"
"Traditional bay-fronted family home located in a popular location within easy reach of local parks, schools, amenities, and easy reach of the City Centre. This property has been beautifully maintained and presented by the present vendors and is highly recommended for viewing!"
"No Chain! Set on this quiet cul de sac in the popular area of Danescourt is this light and spacious three bedroom semi-detached house. Very much a blank canvas for the next occupier to put their stamp on, the accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Lounge opening into the Dining Room and ..."
"The Bickleigh's modern open-plan kitchen/diner, well-proportioned living room and three good-sized bedrooms mean that this 2.5 storey home is a popular choice for a growing family. The downstairs cloakroom, three storage cupboards and off-road parking make it practical as well as stylish."
"The Greyfriars is a three-bedroom home boasting a spacious open-plan kitchen/breakfast room and dining/family room. The first-floor living room has a Juliet balcony, and the three bedrooms are all doubles - with bedroom one including an en suite. There’s also a bathroom and two storage cupboards."
"A luxurious fifth floor apartment, affording superb panoramic views across Cardiff Bay. Offered for sale with no onward chain and would be a perfect buy for the motivated buyer. The property is situated in a particularly sought after development, previously known as 'The Wharf'..."
FAMILY FORTRESS FIT FOR ALL! ** OPEN HOUSE! **
"hoskinsmorgan Are Pleased To Offer For Sale This Delightful Two Double Bedroom Mid Terrace House Situated At This Very Popular Location Being Within A Stones Throw Of The Lovely Victoria Park. The Property Has An Extended Kitchen, Open Plan Style Lounge Dining Room The Aforementioned Bedrooms, La..."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Semi Detached House Three Bedr...
"This handsome, bay-fronted home is located on one of Cardiff's most sought-after locations, occupying a privileged position minutes away from the local shops, parks and the city-centre. This deceptively spacious abobe offers a voluminous amount of living space."
"This spacious two double bedroom ground floor apartment is located on the prestigious Cathedral Road in Pontcanna. The property occupies a lovely position in this most attractive and refurbished Victorian semidetached house. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, good size living ..."
"Modern newly built home situated conveniently for road links, this Three Bedroom semi detached property is ready to be your home. The welcoming entrance hall gives access to the first floor and living space. Large master suite with en-suite shower along with two further bedrooms. "
An opportunity to purchase a freehold plot of land situated in a sought after location in the heart of Whitchurch village. The plot has the benefit of full planning permission to build a detached dwelling. Further information available upon request. 
"A bay fronted four bedroom home. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, bay fronted living room, sitting room, dining room and kitchen on the ground floor and to the first floor are four bedrooms and a bathroom. To the outside is an enclosed rear garden. In need renovation and being sold wit..."
"INVESTORS ONLY: Fantastic Investment Opportunity! Two great size apartments sold as one Freehold unit with tenants in situ, situated in the popular Splott area of Cardiff. Ideal location being within walking distance to the City Centre and with excellent transport links. Close to the A48 link to ..."
"*** Guide Price: £260,000 to £270,000 *** NO CHAIN!!! - EXTENDED 3-BED SEMI-DETACHED 'DUTCH STYLE' FAMILY HOME - OPEN-PLAN LIVING!!! LARGE EXTENDED KITCHEN/DINING ROOM - VERY SPACIOUS LOUNGE - DOWNSTAIRS UTILITY ROOM - VERY LARGE & ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN - LARGE WOOD PANEL STORAGE SHE..."
NOTHING BUT IDEAL!! ** OPEN HOUSE ON THE 25TH FEBRUARY! **
"Beautifully maintained and situated within the beating heart of Cardiff City Centre, this modern third-floor apartment overlooks the hustle and bustle of The Hayes, perfectly positioned to soak up the action and atmosphere that the Welsh capital has to offer..."
"*** ASKING PRICE OF £275,000- END OF TERRACE PROPERTY- LIVING/DINING ROOM - KITCHEN ROOM- ENCLOSED GARDEN WITH SIDE ACCESS- THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS- FAMILY BATHROOM - ATTIC SPACE - LARGE DRIVEWAY - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION *** New to the open market with MR Homes Estate Agents, is this thre..."
"A two bedroom extended semi-detached bungalow situated in a cul-de-sac on a large corner plot with good off road parking. Situated close to public transport, shops and local schools."
"This stunning, four bedroom, townhouse set in the popular location of St Mellons is not to be missed. The property is finished to a high standard throughout and would make a perfect family home. Call today"
"**THREE BEDROOM HOME** Martin & Co are pleased to offer this generous semi-detached town house. Situated in the very popular new development of St Edeyrn's this property would make the ideal first time purchase or investment. The ground floor offers a spacious reception room, downstairs WC an..."
"A three bedroom semi detached home. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, wc, kitchen, spacious living room and conservatory on the ground floor and to the first floor is the master bedroom with en suite shower room, a double bedroom, single bedroom and a bathroom. To the outside is a drivew..."
"In the very heart of our fine capital City and located in one of the City's most popular developments is this fifth-floor, two bedroom/two bathroom apartments which boasts large living accommodation with separate balcony with panoramic views of Cardiff City Centre. The property further offers tw..."
"£275,000, Three Bedroom Double Bay Fronted End of Terrace House with Enclosed Garden in Chester Place, Grangetown, Cardiff, CF11 6PX"
"A four bedroom LET (application in process with council to obtain a HMO license for 4 occupants). The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, bay fronted bedroom/reception room, dining room, sitting room and kitchen on the ground floor and to the first floor are three double bedrooms and a bathro..."
"Beautiful two-bedroom Townhouse in Llandaff, just a short walk to The Cathedral Green and Llandaff high street with its many amenities. This impressive property benefits from LVT wood effect flooring, a luxury fitted kitchen, a stunning bathroom and access to private turfed outdoor amenity space"
*** OFFERED WITH NO CHAIN *** MR HOMES ARE PLEASED TO BRING TO THE MARKET THIS SPACIOUS FOUR BEDROOM MID TERRACED PROPERTY. The Property briefly comprises of Living Room with a Separate Dining Room. A Large Family Kitchen that leads through to the Utility Room and a Downstairs Toilet. To the Fir...
"HOUSE + DOUBLE STOREY WORKSHOP/ GARAGE A two bedroom end terrace house, with adjoin double storey garage/ Storage unit to side. Located in the popular Roath area of Cardiff, this is a great opportunity for someone who may have a business, or requires a garage/ storage. There is also ..."
"**SEMI DETACHED HOUSE*NO CHAIN** An opportunity to acquire a spacious three bedroom semi detached house, situated in this sought after location close to local amenities at Canton, Leckwith and City Centre. The spacious accommodation comprises of entrance hall, living/dining room, separate kitchen..."
FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME in popular location!!! TWO RECEPTION ROOMS make for plenty of living space!! Enclosed REAR GARDEN is a perfect sun trap!! Call today to arrange your viewing!
"IMMACULATELY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM PROPERTY WITH THE ADDED BONUS OF AN EXTENSIVE CONSERVATORY, IT WOULD MAKE A LOVELY FAMILY HOME, LOCATED IN A SOUGHT AFTER RESIDENTIAL AREA OF ST MELLONS;"
"This truly stunning fourth floor two bedroom luxury apartment designed with versatile city centre living, superb landscaped communal gardens, a private residents car park located on the third level of St Davids, two high quality John Lewis supplied bathrooms, and a 23 FT open plan kitchen & lounge."
Spacious and modern three bedroom apartment in a fantastic position with private balcony to rear with optimum space throughout with over 23 foot of reception space. Concierge in operation 24/7 upon entrance and serviced lift for access and allocated car parking space to the first floor. Must see!
"**Three Bedroom Family Home** We are delighted to offer this great opportunity in the ever popular Roath, Cardiff. This three bedroom semi-detached homes is currently tenanted achieving £1100pcm with the current tenants. The property consists of entrance into living room, open pla (cont.)"
"We are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom end terrace townhouse. The property is ideally situated in the popular development of Amoury Drive, Heath. The property is close to the University Hospital of Wales and has an abundance of local amenities."
"**IDEAL FAMILY HOME**THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED**GREAT ACCESS TO M4 MOTORWAY**WALKING DISTANCE TO LOCAL AMENITIES**CONSERVATORY**GARAGE/OFFICE** We are pleased to bring this spacious 3 bedroom semi-detached property in the sought after Llanover Road, Culverhouse cross. Located with easy commuti..."
"Located in the heart of Canton, close to Thompson Park, Victoria Park and the Chapter arts centre, is this intriguing and beautifully presented property, complete with its own garage. The gated entrance via an under croft style area leading to the main entrance of the property.
The entry lobby ..."
"Book your viewing on this three bedroom property situated in the sought after area of Rumney!!! Do not miss this fantastic opportunity! This is a great example of a three bedroom, semi detached house. An early viewing is essential as it will not be available for long"
"YOPA is proud to present this substantial three bedroom, apartment in Llanishen. The property is decorated to a modern standard, boasts a large private rear garden and a double garage. Please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Cardiff market. All Offers & Interest are Invited."
"**STUNNING TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM APARTMENT **SOUGHT AFTER GATED DEVELOPMENT**BALCONY ** WATER VIEWS**TWO BATHROOMS**OPEN PLAN RECEPTION**ALLOCATED PARKING ** We are delighted to present to market this stunning two double bedroom contemporary apartment which is beautifully presented throughout, ..."
"If you're looking for a fantastic family that you can put your own stamp on and make you're own...look no further! Located in one of Fairwater's most popular roads, opposite Fairwater primary school and in need of modernisation, this three bed semi detached property could make the perfect family..."
"Located in a quiet area in the sought-after Llanedeyrn, this is the perfect family property with extra space to grow into. With a range of schools, shops and amenities nearby, excellent bus routes and easy access to transport links, this property could be just what you are looking for! T..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN! A rarely available SEMI DETACHED bungalow set in the popular location of ST MELLONS within walking distance of local amenities and easy access to local schools, bus routes and shops. Cardiff City centre is easily accessible and the A48/M4 access corridor is just a short drive away."
Are you looking for a modern three bedroom property in St Edeyrn's Village? Then look no further. Built last year this property is in a great condition and is ready for a new owner. If you're interested in viewing the property please call us on 
Well presented three bedroom family home located within the heart of Rumney Village with its vast array of local amenities. Excellent transport links into the City Centre. Easy access to the A48/M4 links. Close to local parks and walks. The property itself comprises an entrance hallway. living ro...
"*** SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION *** Lovely family home on good size plot, designed for ease of maintenance. With an elevated position with pleasant view from large windows. Spacious rooms and exteneded kitchen providing plenty of contemporary living space *** Off road parking for multiple vehicles ***"
"IF YOU ARE LOOKING FOR A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED APARTMENT RIGHT IN THE HEART OF MERMAID QUAY WITH ALLOCATED PARKING, PRIVATE BALCONY AND NO CHAIN THIS PROPERTY IS FOR YOU. CURRENTLY FOR CASH BUYERS ONLY. Taylors are delighted to offer for sale this beautiful two double bedroom top floor apar..."
A deceptively spacious and characterful two bedroom terrace cottage situated in the heart of Llandaff North within walking distance of public transport and all amentiies. Lots of traditional features and a south facing private rear garden with rear access.
A beautifully presented three bedroom family home in Pentrebane. 
"Located in the popular area of St Edryns Village and offered to the market in show home condition is this beautiful town house. Benefiting from having three bedrooms, open plan living and a private garden. Close to shops, bus stops and schools. Perfect first time buy."
"A two bedroom end of link property Ideally located on Heol Don in Whitchurch. Within walking distance of the village with its excellent amenities and public transport links and close to the popular Taff Trail. Furthermore, the highly regarded primary and secondary schools are close at hand. The p..."
"With no onward chain this three bedroom detached house in Orchard Park is definitely one to see. With a good size rooms throughout, garage with storage area and a private garden. Within walking distance to all local amenities this is sure to tick all the boxes. Call for all the details."
"Guide Price £270,000 - £280,000. An excellent opportunity to acquire a four bedroom HMO property currently generating an income of £23,400 p/a. Offered with no onward chain. "
"**IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS** Daniel Matthew Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this immaculate, extended two bedroom semi detached property, situated in the popular location of Pontprennau. The property is located only a short distance from Cardiff Gate Retail Park with great links ..."
"Beautifully present, modern and completely move in ready! Situated on a quite cul de sac in Rumney this three bedroom semi detached property is a MUST SEE. The home offers three reception rooms, two bathrooms and three bedrooms. Outside storage shed and garage can also be found a driveway for par..."
"*NO CHAN* *SEMI-DETACHED* *3 BEDROOMS* *OFF-ROAD PARKING*
Located in this ever popular street of Bwlch Road, Fairwater. Fortis are proud to offer to market this no chain three bedroom semi-detached property. The accommodation briefly comprises of two reception rooms downstairs, kitchen, three be..."
This well presented home would perfectly suit a growing family. Located in the sought after St. Mellons area the property has alot to offer and is close to local amenities.
"**Ideal for first time buyers** OR Great investment property with high rental return **
Spacious two bedroom mid terrace property with large garage plus rear driveway for two cars. The home sits itself within walking distance to Whitchurch village offering a range of shops and cafe's, along with ..."
"*NO CHAIN* *END TERRACE* *3 BEDROOMS* *ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN*
New to market, we are pleased to bring this much loved home located in sought after Fairwater. This property has been well maintained by its previous owners, making it the perfect blank canvas, ideal for investors or first time buyers r..."
"REDUCED BY £20,000. For sale with no on-going chain and an early completion. Modern semi detached house of larger proportions. Providing a spacious and versatile home. Well located off a No Through road into a small crescent of similar properties overlooking a large green area for recreational us..."
A five / Four bedroom HMO located in Heath is the ideal invest for an induvial looking to purchase a property with lots of potential in a ideal location
"Development opportunity, with previous planning permission granted for the development of flats following the demolition of the existing building"
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - A 4/55 bedroom HMO property conveniently situated off City Road offering excellent access to a range of local amenities. £19,200 (pa) NO CHAIN."
"An absolutely immaculate bay fronted Victorian terraced house located in a no through road close to Victoria Park and local shops. Comprising accommodation of: Entrance hall, lounge with feature fireplace, dining room with door to the rear garden and semi-open plan to the lovely fitted kitchen wi..."
"Set back in the corner of this quiet popular location in Fariwater is this stylish, yet so homely, three bedroom semi-detached house. Immaculately presented through out and with fantastic size front, rear and side gardens, this would be perfect for a young family or a first time buyer. M..."
** 360 VIRTUAL WALKTHROUGH AVAILABLE ** NO ONWARD CHAIN * TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS * END OF TERRACE * OFF ROAD PARKING * UTILITY ROOM * COMBI BOILER **Sell Right Estate Agents are pleased to bring to the market this spacious two bedroom end of terrace property in the Llanishen area of Cardiff....
NEXA Cardiff - One agent: One Solution. Oliver Griffiths at NEXA Cardiff is delighted to bring to the sales market a brand new two bedroom duplex maisonette close to Roath park lake and gardens with allocated parking.
"A good-sized three bedroom family home located in this desirable part of Fairwater. Close to all local amenities, Waun-gron park and train station. The property briefly comprises of a large bay-fronted lounge, a dining room and galley style kitchen and a downstairs w.c. There is also a large gard..."
OAC offer an immaculate two double bedroom duplex home in a brand new development of four luxury apartments
A fantastic opportunity to purchase this two double bedroomed bungalow in St Mellons.
"A bay fronted three bedroom end of terraced home. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall with original tiled floor, bay fronted living room, sitting room, and kitchen/breakfast room on the ground floor and to the first floor are three bedrooms and a bathroom. To the outside is a low maintenan..."
"No Chain! Two double bedroom, terraced house situated in Llandaff North. Very easy walking distance to all local shops, bus stop, train station, Llandaff North & Whitchurch Village with Hailey Park & the Taff Trail close by. The Ideal first time purchase or downsize with no onward chain!"
"INVESTMENT PROPERTY: A fully-let, well-presented, spacious, bay fronted Victorian mid-terrace property being conveniently located. Cardiff University is within easy walking distance, as is the City Centre and the University Hospital of Wales. Public transport is also close by."
"What A Find! This immaculate three bedroom end terrace town house set in a quiet corner of St Edeyrns Village, Old St Mellons, is looking for new owners! "
"No Chain! A beautifully presented two double bedroom mid-terrace house, perfectly placed on this exciting Redrow built development of stylish executive homes on the outskirts of open countryside of Cae St Fagans. With modern open plan living, this home would make a perfect first time buy or inves..."
"4 Bed HMO ** Rented till summer 2023 at £1543 per month *** Arabella Street is a superbly convenient street in the heart of Roath, one of Cardiff’s most popular central boroughs. This house is located at the bottom end, near to Albany and City Road and therefore extremely well located for al..."
"**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM, MID-TERRACED HOUSE IN A HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER AREA - WITH ADDITIONAL LOFT ROOM!** MGY are delighted to bring to market this two double bedroom, mid-terraced house situated on the highly desirable Ethel Street, Canton. The accommodation briefly comprises open plan lounge/diner,..."
"***NO ONWARD CHAIN*** If you are looking for a property that you can truly make your own, this one is for you!!! Rarely available and new to the market is this traditional three bedroom family home in need of renovation throughout. Being situated at the top of ball road and with Rumney Village on..."
"* NO CHAIN * ** IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS/INVESTORS ! ** MGY are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom property is the popular location of Birchgrove close to a parade of shops and amenities in Birchgrove. The property briefly comprises of entrance hall, lounge/dining room, kitchen, in..."
"A delightful two double bedroom end of terrace property situated in the popular location of Glandwr Place in Whitchurch. The current owners have maintained the property to a high standard and recent improvements include a superb family bathroom, Worcester combination boiler and lounge carpets. Th..."
"A well presented three bedroom bay fronted home. The accommodation comprises original tiled floor, bay fronted living room dining room and kitchen on the ground floor and to the first floor are three bedrooms and a bathroom. To the outside is a sizeable rear garden. Being sold with no onward chai..."
"Well presented three bedroom semi detached freehold property in popular St Mellons. Close to local amenities and local schools. Excellent bus links to the City Centre. Easy access to the A48/M4 provising links to Cardiff centre and Swansea to the West, Newport, Bristol and beyond to the East. "
"A rare opportunity to purchase this stunning, two bedroom, two bathroom duplex apartment. One of four apartments in this boutique development that has undergone a back to brick renovation with. The chic abode offers contemporary design and architecture throughout, two double bedrooms, boutique 'h..."
*Mid terrace three bedroom house in Rhiwbina* Edwards and Co are delighted to offer for sale this well presented and stylish mid terrace house in a great location. Close to local amenities and transport links with no onward chain. MUST BE VIEWED
"Open plan living on the ground floor, a hideaway bedroom with the second floor all to itself, the Moseley is a new home with great options. Young families, first-time buyers and professionals who have their eye on a potential home office, will enjoy making this flexible home their own."
"***GUIDE PRICE £260,000 - £270,000***STUNNING HOME - Located in a quiet cul de sac of Kember Close, St Mellons and offered for sale in excellent order throughout is this three bedroom end of terrace house that needs to be seen to be fully appreciated as to all on offer here."
*NO CHAIN* *CORNER PLOT* *DRIVEWAY* *THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS* 
"A beautifully decorated two bedroom mid terrace home briefly comprising open plan living, lounge/dining room, kitchen, enclosed rear garden, two double bedrooms and modern family bathroom. Offered to the market with no chain and within walking distance of all local amenities."
Move straight into this stunning three double bedroom townhouse located in a quiet street in St Mellons with shops and schools within walking distance. Defiantly one to see. Call to secure your viewing.
"A spacious, ground floor flat in this popular block on the sought after Cyncoed Road with views of the communal gardens. No Chain."
"Guide Price £260,000 - £270,000. Situated in a popular area in Roath. Close to amenities and transport links. Well presented throughout. Good sized rear garden. A traditional stone fronted family house situated in a popular area in Roath. The accommodation is well presented..."
**LUXURY 8th FLOOR SPACIOUS TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM APARTMENT** Martin and Co are extremely pleased to offer to market the opportunity to acquire a City Centre two double bedroom apartment with parking and superbly positioned with an abundance of immediate surrounding amenities in nearby Queen Street....
"*** Guide Price: £260,000 to £270,000 *** IMMACULATE & SPACIOUS MODERN 3-BED FAMILY HOME - MOVE STRAIGHT IN - CLOSE TO FAIRWATER GREEN - 22ft LOUNGE - MODERN KITCHEN/DINER - 2nd RECEPTION ROOM - STORAGE/UTILITY - PORCH - ENCLOSED SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN - GARAGE - FREEHOLD - MR HOMES..."
"Fully refurbished throughout to a show home standard is this three bedroom semi detached property located on Braunton Avenue, Llanrumney. Call Darlows on to secure your viewing!"
"A three bedroom mid terrace home located in the popular location of Atlas Road. The accommodation briefly comprises of two receptions rooms, large kitchen diner, utility room, enclosed private low maintenance rear garden, family bathroom and three good size bedrooms."
"HMO licensed, four bedroom let. Located on Moy Road, Roath. The property is currently tenanted with a guaranteed monthly income. Offered with no onward chain"
"*** Guide Price: £260,000 to £270,000 *** A MODERN & IMMACULATE 3x DOUBLE BEDROOM SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME - IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS - MOVE STRAIGHT IN - OPEN-PLAN RE-FITTED & MODERN KITCHEN/DINER, INVITING ENTRANCE & RECEPTION AREA - RE-FITTED & MODERN BATHROOM SUITE - NE..."
"Guide Price £260,000 - £270,000.
An excellent opportunity to acquire a four bedroom HMO property in the heart of Roath, CF24 that has the added bonus of being offered with no onward chain. Currently tenanted, this home is generating an approximate income of £15,000 p/a with further case to be rev..."
"We are proud to present this Two Bedroom Terraced House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £260,000 - £290,000*"
"*** Guide Price: £260,000 to £270,000 *** A TRADITIONAL DOUBLE BAY FRONTED, EXTENDED & SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME - RETAINING SOME ORIGINAL FEATURES - THIS PROPERTY IS IN GOOD CONDITION MEANING YOU CAN MOVE STRAIGHT IN - 2x DOUBLE BEDROOMS - 2 SEPARATE RECEPTION ROOMS - GARAGE to REAR - OP..."
*** GREAT potential opportunity *** Be quick to reserve an allocated viewing time *** NO CHAIN SALE ***
"Stunning two bedroom apartment located in a prime location in Cardiff City Centre, within walking distance to many shops, restaurants, cafes & other amenities.This well presented property has views over the city centre & benefits from allocated parking. Contact us on to book a viewing!"
"""The Prestgious Hayes Apartments"". Very sought after and located in the City Centre with popular designer shops and restaurants on the doorstep. Adjacent to the St Davids Shopping Centre and has a parking permit for St. Davids Car Park. Caretaker on-site. for enhanced security. Located..."
"A three bedroom mid terrace home in Leckwith Place, Canton. Located in a quiet cul-de-sac tucked away from passing traffic, yet minutes way from local amenities with a range of convenient stores, superstores, cafes and restaurants. The property is within walking distance to the City Centre."
"David's Homes is delighted to offer FOR SALE this spacious Four Bedroom Mid-Terrace Family Home with flexible and versatile accommodation, being presented as a 'blank canvas', ready for the new occupiers to put their own stamp on, and is ideal for first-time-buyers and families alike."
"Singleton Road is a quiet road located in the sought after Splott area of Cardiff just outside the City Centre. For those who work in the City Centre, Hinton street is located less than 1.5 miles away and offers regular bus services to and from the city centre. There are numerous amenities near b..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £260,000 - £270,000 Located in a quiet cul de sac in St Mellons and only a stones through to Hendre Lake is this three bedroom property which offers an open plan lounge/diner, kitchen, bathroom and a seperate garage. Offered to the market with no onward chain."
Lovely two bedroom semi detached garage linked home with in a large plot
"Unique four double bedroom semi detached property in Pentwyn, Benefits include four double bedrooms, modern kitchen and bathroom, wrap around garden and detached garage/garden room with bar."
"We are pleased to present to market this lovely three bedroom semi-detached family home, ideally located in a quiet street in the sought after area of St. Mellons, which has an abundance of amenities close by and excellent transport links to city centre and M4. The property is also a short walk ..."
"Situated At Popular Grangetown Being Handily Placed For A Variety Of Amenities To Include Shopping Retail Park, Schools, Playing Field, Leisure Centre And The Facilities Of Nearby Cardiff Bay Can Be Found This Large & Improved & Very Well Presented Three/Four Bedroom Mid Terrace House Offering V..."
*** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY *** COMMERCIAL AND HMO PROPERTY ***CASH BUYERS ONLY*** Key Executive Sales offer an excellent opportunity to acquire a mixed-use residential / commercial unit in the heart of the Golden Triangle in Cathays. The accommodation comprises of a 3 bed HMO c...
"***CASH BUYERS ONLY***TERRACE***PARKING***VACANT*** Key Executive Sales exclusively presents his lovely two bedroom, first floor apartment with a large terrace area which overlooks Cardiff Bay. This property offers a master bedroom with an en-suite and spacious fitted wardrobes, a ..."
An immaculate two double bedroom 5th floor apartment in the heart of Cardiff city centre. This is a spacious and well proportioned property and has a unique additional of a large 20’ x 10’ secure storage facility located on the third level together with the car parking space. The Land...
"*** Guide Price: £255,000 to £265,000 *** A BAY FRONTED TRADITIONALLY BUILT PROPERTY - A VERY WELL PRESENTED & SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME with a DOWNSTAIRS BEDROOM with EN-SUITE & SITTING ROOM - 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS TO THE FIRST FLOOR - ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN with REAR GATED ACCESS - FREEHOL..."
"**Cash Buyers Only**TWO BEDROOM CORNER PLOT with envious FRONT, REAR and SIDE GARDENS. Situated on the corner of a quiet ROAD IN LLANDAFF NORTH with OFF ROAD PARKING. Perfect FAMILY HOME - call today to book your viewing by appointment only!"
"NEW TO MARKET - JeffreyRoss are proud to bring to the market this impressive first floor, one bedroom apartment in the heart of Pontcanna. This light and spacious apartment rivals the size of some two bedroom apartments in the area and is set in approx 672 SQFT. This property briefly comprises co..."
"OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £255,000 ** 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS & 2 BATHROOMS ** Located in the popular location of Cathays, just outside of Cardiff city centre, is this unique property. Positioned just minutes from Roath Park and vibrant High streets Crwys & Whitchurch road, making it ideal for ..."
"This three bedroom property would make a great family home as its with a short walk of some great parks, shops and Schools. The property is also being sold with NO CHAIN!! Call Darlows on for more information!"
"****GUIDE PRICE £255,000 - £265,000**** This delightful family home located in Riverside Terrace, Lower Ely offers three double bedrooms, three reception rooms, two bathrooms, modern family kitchen and a private rear garden."
Located in an extremely sought after position within the Thomas Court development this two bedroom ground floor flat benefits from private side access via the living room patio doors
"Situated At Newport Road Opposite Retail Park With Very Good Transport Links To The Cardiff City Centre And Motorway Is This Improved Traditional Built Bay Fronted Mid Terrace House With An Open Plan Aspect To Ground Floor. Accommodation Briefly Comprises Of Entrance Hall, Lounge Through To Dinin..."
"EXTENDED HOUSE WITH SUPERB LIVING ACCOMMODATION mins walk of the Cardiff City Centre.  WE STRONGLY RECOMMEND INTERNAL INSPECTION.  Wide inviting ent hall, 3 sep receptions, modern fitted kit, 3 GOOD SIZE BEDS & family bathrm. Would suit a larger family...."
"Guide Price £250,000 TO £260,000 **NO CHAIN**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**MID TERRACE**THREE RECEPTION ROOMS**KITCHEN**BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**PRIME LOCATION FOR COMMUNTING**GREAT ROR FIRST TIME BUYERS OR INVESTORS**We are delighted to present this three bedroom terraced property situa"
"*** Guide Price £250,000 - £260,000 *** We are pleased to offer for sale this beautifully presented and extended 2 bedroom home, located just outside Cardiff City centre. Boasting a contemporary interior with a light natural décor throughout. The accommodation briefly comprises, a through lou..."
"**BEAUTIFUL THREE BEDROOM HOME** Martin & Co are delighted to offer this spacious family home. Situated in the quiet cul-de-sac of Coeden Dal, located a stones throw from local amenities and offering great transport links. The property boasts a spacious living room, leading to a separate dini..."
"A three bedroom semi detached home in Frank Road, Ely. Benefiting from entrance porch, hallway, spacious living room, dining room, kitchen, three good size bedrooms, family bathroom and a good size private rear garden."
"This a great opportunity to purchase this property within the heart of the 'Student Triangle', close to all the amenities on offer on Salisbury & Crwys Road, and excellent access to Cardiff Universities. Currently let to four occupants until June 2023 with a monthly income of £1..."
"A two double bedroom semi detached situated behind an electronic gated community in Leckwith. Comprising of an entrance hall, cloakroom, lounge, conservatory, landing, bathroom and two double bedrooms. Benefits include UPVC double glazing, gas fired central heating, rear garden and driveway."
ARE YOU LOOKING FOR A THREE BEDROOM IN OLD ST MELLONS? Then look no further. This terraced three bedroom property is located on a cul-de-sac on the desirable Bethania Row and has great links to the M4. To schedule a viewing please call us on !
"***Guide Price 250,000 to 260,000*** NO ONWARD CHAIN**Located in close proximity to Hendre park lake which is an area of conservation offering lovely walks, fishing lake and picnic areas. Cardiff parkway train station which is due to open in 2024 is also within walking distance."
CALLING ALL FAMILIES!!
"A lovely home that is perfect for a growing family located in Rumney with schools within walking distance. Benefits from having two reception rooms, conservatory and a large garden. Viewing comes highly recommended to appreciate all on offer here."
"***THREE BED HMO***TENANTED UNTIL JULY 2024***POTENTIAL TO IMPROVE*** The accommodation is situated over two floors and consists of a wide receiving hallway, two receptions, kitchen, three bedrooms and large bathroom and a small utility area. Located close to all local amenitie..."
"A fully refurbished three bedroom property sat on a large corner plot located within a short walk of local shops, Schools and Parks. The property is presented in show condition throughout. Call Darlows on for more information!!"
"** OPEN HOUSE SATURDAY MARCH 18th -STRICTLY BY APPOINTMENT ONLY** MGY are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom semi detached property in the Gabalfa area of Cardiff close to A48 with links to the M4 motorway. The property briefly comprises of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/living room, ..."
Well presented three bedroom semi detached freehold property in the heart of Rumney Village. Ideally located being just a short stroll to the many local shops and amenities. Quick easy access onto the A48/M4 link. Excellent bus service to the City Centre. The property comprises two good size rece...
"** MODERN TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR MAISONETTE ** PRIVATE GARDEN & GARAGE ** A bright and well proportioned two bedroom ground floor purpose built maisonette situated in the sought after area of Radyr, being a short distance from Radyr Golf Club, other local amenities and transport links. The ..."
"This property comprises of entrance hall, living room, second reception room, dining room and kitchen all to the ground floor. To the first floor there are there bedrooms and a family bathroom. Call today !!"
"NO ONWARD CHAIN! CASH BUYERS ONLY! A traditional bay fronted mid terrace home, with a wealth of original features. This home offers spacious accommodation but does require updating and modernisation."
"A spacious and stylish two double bedroom house located in the heart of canton close to Thompson's and Victoria Park. Tastefully presented throughout the accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Room, Fitted Kitchen, Inner Looby, Bathroom and Utility Area/Home Office to the ..."
Are you looking for a beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached house situated a short walk from Hendre Lake Park? Then schedule a viewing on this chainless property please call on !
"If you are looking for a home to put your own stamp on then take a look at this semi detached home on Pentrebane Road. It would be ideal for a first time buyer who is full of enthusiasm to create a modern home. Inside the accommodation comprises: entrance hall, living room, kitchen, di..."
"****GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000***Located in a quiet cul de sac in St Mellons is this lovely three bedroom home that is offered to the market in excellent order throughout, with a lovely rear garden on a corner plot, fitted kitchen, modern decor throughout and close to local amenities."
"A great investment opportunity to acquire this four bedroom HMO located just off City Road with an array of facilities, close to Cardiff University and only a short stroll from the bustling City Centre. Currently until June 2024 with a monthly income of £1540."
"This development is located in a prime location, Bute East Dock on the site of the former Wharf public house. Third floor apartment. Modern and contemporary in style. A short walk will take you to the City Centre or Cardiff Bay. The Wharf is an ideal location to enjoy living in the heart of the ..."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a modern and spacious three bedroom home in the heart of Rumney, CF3. "
"Wellwood is a small no through road in the area of Llanedeyrn, situated 4 miles northeast of Cardiff city centre. The property is situated close to two primary schools, Cardiff Met University and the newly built St Teilo's Church in Wales High School. The area offers local amenities, shops and su..."
"*3 BEDROOMS* *LOFT ROOM* *DRIVEWAY*
Introducing this tastefully presented three bedroom terraced housed with the added bonus of loft space. This spacious family home is located within excellent access to local shops and amenities. Ideal for first time buyers or investors. The property briefly co..."
"An end terraced family home, set in the popular location of PENTWYN, within walking distance of local amenities and easy access to local schools, bus routes and shops. Cardiff City centre is easily accessible and the A48/M4 access corridor is just a short drive away. Viewing's Recommended!"
"No chain! A generous size mid-terrace house offering off-street parking to the front. Situated close to Fairwater Park, the property is conveniently placed close to both Fairwater and Llandaff Villages with a wealth of shops, cafes, and amenities, and reputable English and Welsh Schools. "
"With local amenities including schools, shops, bus stops and parks this three double bedroom house in Fairwater would make a perfect family home with plenty to offer. Call to arrange for all the details and to arrange your viewing!"
A fine example of a well-maintained and lovingly refurbished bay-fronted family home located in the heart of the popular local area of Splott. The current vendors have spent the past few years restoring each room to a high standard and we thoroughly recommend an internal viewing to full...
"A spacious first floor 2 bedroom apartment located within this handsome conversion of this Victorian town-house in the heart of leafy Pontcanna and close to all the attractions of this stylish area as well as the city centre. This property briefly comprises communal entrance, stairs to the first..."
"Are you looking to live in the heart of the city centre and want to enjoy a modern lifestyle? If so, take a look at this apartment in The Hayes. The apartment is located on the sixth floor with a balcony that overlooks the City centre"
"A spacious, end of terrace property, which has been refurbished throughout and turned into an ideal family home. The property is situated on a generous corner plot. Call Darlows on "
"This development is located in a prime location, Bute East Dock on the site of the former Wharf public house. Modern and contemporary in style. A short walk will take you to the City Centre or Cardiff Bay. The Wharf is an ideal location to enjoy living in the heart of the Capital of Wales. ..."
"Located in Kewstoke Avenue and benefiting from having three bedrooms, two reception rooms and a kitchen with utility room is this lovely semi detached house with no onward chain. Perfect for the growing family or first time buyer. Walking distance to the leisure centre and shops."
"A spacious three bedroom end of terrace family home in Heol Dennant, Fairwater. Benefiting from entrance hall, spacious lounge, conservatory, dining room and kitchen, downstairs WC, three good size bedrooms, family bathroom and a good size private rear garden."
"We are delighted to present to market this beautiful extended three bedroom home situated in the sought after area of Splott within close proximity to local amenities, transport links and the city centre. The living accommodation briefly comprises entrance hallway, generous living room with bay..."
"We are pleased to market this 3 bedroom family home, chain free."
A beautifully presented three bedroom end terraced house. The accommodation comprises: spacious living area and kitchen/dining room on the ground floor and there are three bedrooms and a bathroom on the first floor. To the outside is an enclosed rear garden with side access. The property further ...
"** NO CHAIN ** READY TO MOVE IN ** QUICK SALE NEEDED **
YOPA estate agents are proud to present to the market this mid terrace in Pentrebane. The property is situated at the highest point in Cardiff with views of the whole city including Cardiff bay."
*NO CHAIN* *SOUGHT AFTER STREET* *SEMI-DETACHED* *DRIVEWAY* 
"A stunning purpose built two bedroom first floor self contained flat with delightful private gardens, a drive, a garage and lovelt first floor views across the Village onto rolling fields and countryside. Beautifully improved with PVc double glazed windows and gas heating, very impressive."
"Darlows are proud to announce this freshly renovated property in Wilson Place, This property is large in size, has off street parking and is ready to move in, owned by a true perfectionist this property is a must see"
"Ideally situated on Drope Road in Cardiff, a three bedroom semi detached home offering two reception rooms, a modern kitchen, three spacious bedrooms, front and rear gardens with off road parking and a detached garage. The property is futher beneiftting from Cardiff Airport being with15-20 minutes."
"MGY are pleased to offer for sale this lovely two bedroom semi detached property with a generous plot and garage in the Pontprennau area of Cardiff. The property briefly comprises of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/breakfast room, two bedrooms and bathroom. Gardens to front, side and rear and a dr..."
If you are looking to live in the heart of the city centre and want to enjoy a modern lifestyle then take a look at this apartment in The Hayes. The apartment is located on the fourth floor and come with a balcony that overlooks the city centre
"**SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME** Martin & Co proudly present this generous three bedroom family home. Situated in the quiet cul-de-sac of Ty Cerrig, Pentwyn which offers fantastic transport links and local amenities. The ground floor boasts a light and airy entrance hall, spaciou..."
**PERFECT FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT**NO ONWARD CHAIN* MODERN INTERIOR**DESIRABLE LOCATION** We are pleased to offer for sale this beautifully presented and tastefully decorated 2-bedroom mid-terraced home located in a sought-after location in Cardiff. The home is conveniently situated within ...
"Immaculately well presented 3 bedroom semi detached family home with modern decor throughout, landscaped tiered rear garden, side access and allocated parking space. The property is located in the St. Mellons area between Newport / Cardiff. Ideal first time purchase or investment. View..."
"NO CHAIN! A traditional mid terraced home, in need of modernisation, set in the sought after location of CATHAYS, Cardiff. The property is within walking distance of local shops, schools and bus routes. The property briefly comprises hall, three reception rooms, kitchen, four bedrooms and bathroom."
"**HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION**END OF TERRACED PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**LARGE CONSERVATORY**MODERN KITCHEN**FITTED BATHROOM**LOW MAINTENANCE REAR GARDEN**OFF ROAD PARKING FOR TWO VEHICLES**REF#00021596** Pinkmove are delighted to offer this immaculately well presented, three bedroom, "
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - A SELECTION OF TWENTY PROPERTIES ALL FULLY TENANTED** Nine 1 bedroom apartments, Four 2 bedroom apartments, One 2 bedroom terrace, Three 3 bedroom terrace, One 4 bedroom detached, One 3 bedroom detached, One 3 bedroom semi-detached. Details below"
"Situated in an 'Area of Natural Outstanding Beauty' (AONB) with jaw-dropping panoramic views over rolling countryside with the Celtic Manor Resort 2010 Ryder Cup Golf Course in the foreground, this extensive luxury home built in 2018 blends modern design with a nod to traditional features through..."
Development Land
Kemeys Folly is a Grade II Listed former hunting lodge with origins dating back to circa 1712. Rebuilt in the early 20th Century and combines both historic and functional living.
"Grand by name and grand by nature, Pencoed Manor is an architecturally stunning, one-of-a-kind rural home with six bedrooms, and a separate two-bedroom annexe, set against a breathtaking backdrop of open countryside"
"If homes could sign autographs, Grade II listed Fields House would cause quite a queue. Having starred in Sherlock, Dr Who and Casualty, to name but a few, this Victorian gentleman’s residence dates back to the 1860s and is a fine example of Jacobean style and breathtaking grandeur"
"We are delighted to offer this executive style detached family home, one of only four set on this exclusive gated development, set in a delightful and secluded woodland setting yet is only a short drive away from major road links making it perfect for those trying to find that work/life balance. ..."
"This truly historic eight bedroomed stone built residence, situated in the heart of the Roman town of Caerleon, has been tastefully modernised whilst retaining many original features. This family home is set within private walled gardens and benefits from accommodation that includes a sitting roo..."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A rare opportunity to acquire a truly exceptional family house, marketed for the first time in 70 years, set in stunning lawned gardens on Glasllwch Lane, one of Newport's most desirable addresses, a brief drive from the M4 and city centre train station affording access to Lond..."
"*** ESTABLISHED and PROFITABLE BUSINESS *** RETIREMENT SALE *** EXCEPTIONAL OPPORTUNITY to Acquire TWO City Centre LICENSED HMO's and ONGOING BUSINESS *** PERIOD Properties *** EXCELLENT Access to the TRAIN STATION, Major Road Networks and for CITY *** EMAIL ONLY To REGISTER INTEREST"
**UNIQUE DETACHED PROPERTY**FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS**LARGE OPEN PLAN LIVING AREAS**KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM**THREE BATHROOMS**SELF CONTAINED ANNEX**APPROX 5 ACRES OF LAND**EXTENSIVE DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE**PEACEFUL RURAL LOCATION**We are delighted to present this stunning and unique four bedroom detached fa
Residential Development Opportunity
"A beautiful detached family home on the ever popular Glaslwch Lane in the NP20 area. Accessed via a private lane through to gated property entrance. Boasting five double bedrooms, three bathrooms and two large reception rooms plus large kitchen and utility room and a separate garage."
"An exceptional, highly spacious family house offering FOUR TO SIX DOUBLE BEDROOM accommodation at the end of a private driveway off Melbourne Way in the highly sought after Glasllwch Lane area of Newport, a very brief drive from the M4 and city centre train station. The property further features ..."
"A gorgeous early 20th Century detached former rectory of immense character and space, with six double bedrooms and so much more (inc potential space for an annexe). It also has an open aspect from every window (some of the views are amazing) and a fascinating history too."
"""The Chalet"" is a beautiful, unique family house offering spacious five bedroom accommodation with incredible views over Little Switzerland in this exceptionally sought after location a brief drive from the M4 and within walking distance of the city centre train station. The property fe..."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A rare opportunity to acquire an exceptional family property in outstanding level gardens superbly located on Glasllwch Lane, a very brief drive from the M4 and city centre train station. The significantly extended property further features four double bedrooms, two bathrooms, ..."
"This spacious four bedroomed detached family home to the market. Built in the 1980's and beautifully presented inside and out, early viewing is highly recommended. Located with easy access to the M4 and major road links, this immaculate home is perfect for the growing family with accommodation in..."
PABLACK are delighted to present this exceptional family home located on this highly sought after semi-rural lane in Bassaleg. Superb high specification luxury accommodation. Fantastic open countryside views to the front. Viewing is highly recommended.
"Superb Investment Opportunity - Row of 6 Terraced properties - 2 - 3 Bedrooms - Off Road Parking - Within Easy Access of Newport Town Centre, M4 & Local Railway Station - Rental Figures available on request - No Onwards Chain"
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - SIX 2 BEDROOM APARTMENTS, FULLY TENANTED. Comprising two apartments to ground floor, two the first floor and two the second floor. Spacious apartments offering a good sized lounge, two double bedrooms, separate fitted kitchen, bathroom, allocated parking. Close to many am..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a well-positioned smallholding situated between Newport and Cardiff. Cefn Llogell Fach comprises a detached three-bedroom dwelling, a range of farm buildings and agricultural land extending to approximately 16.30 acres (6.60 ha)."
"YOPA is proud to present this substantial five-bedroom property in the very popular area of Langstone. The property boasts three large reception rooms, large kitchen, five bedrooms, three bathrooms, a large driveway, and a double garage. Book early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant market."
Built in the 1950's this beautifully presented four bedroom detached property is located in the increasingly popular area of Ponthir and sat on approximately 1/2 acre. The property has undergone some serious renovation by the current owners over the years including a two storey extension complete...
"From the impressive wood cladding that enhances the roofline to the decorative door cornice that adds elegance to the entrance, The Warwick has an authentic aura that underlines the sense of quality and craftsmanship that is evident throughout. Yet practicality will also be at the hear..."
"*GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £270,000 *SEMI-DETACHED * THREE BEDROOMS * THREE STOREY * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * BATHROOM * GARDEN DRIVEWAY"
"Superb Investment Opportunity - Row of 5 Terraced properties - 2 - 3 Bedrooms - Off Road Parking - Within Easy Access of Newport Town Centre, M4 & Local Railway Station - Rental Figures available on request - No Onwards Chain"
"**HIGHLY SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION** IMMACULATE DETACHED FAMILY HOME, IMPRESSIVE PLOT WITH HUGE GARDEN & SUBSTANTIAL GATED DRIVEWAY, 5/6 BEDROOMS & 3 BATHROOMS, MASTER EN-SUITE, 3 SEPARATE RECEPTION ROOMS, GREAT MOTORWAY LINKS."
"Guide Price £650,000 TO £670,000*EXECUTIVE DETACHED FAMILY HOME**BASSALEG CATCHMENT AREA**FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM, SITTING ROOM & STUDY**KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY ROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM**THREE EN-SUITE SHOWER ROOMS**LARGE ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**DRIVEWAY & DOUBLE GARAGE**Pinkmove "
**DETACHED PROPERTY**FOUR BEDROOMS**DOUBLE DRIVEWAY**DOUBLE GARAGE**QUIET CUL DE SAC**BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED**NEW DEVELOPMENT**DOWNSTAIRS CLOAKROOM**UTILITY**TWO EN-SUITES**
"An exceptional, individually designed family house offering five bedroom accommodation in a superb plot at the end of a quiet cul-de-sac within excellent school catchment and a short drive from the M4 at junction 27. The property further features an outstanding open plan family kitchen area, supe..."
"An Outstanding Detached Family Home located in the ever sought after area of Langstone. Two En-Suites, Two Reception Rooms, Large garage and more!!"
"*** SPACIOUS EXTENDED 5 Bedroom, 2 En-Suite, PERIIOD FAMILY HOME *** SIZABLE PLOT with GATED Drive & INTEGRAL GARAGE *** SOUGHT AFTER Location neighbouring CELTIC MANOR & its WORLD CLASS Golf Leisure & Business Facilities *** Countryside VIEWS *** EXCELLENT access for BRISTOL, Chepstow, Newport & M4"
"A highly spacious, well proportioned FIVE/SIX BEDROOM family property on one of Newport's most sought after roads, a short drive from the M4. Gardens and grounds of approximately 2/3rds acre with views over Badgers Wood towards Penylan. Bassaleg School catchment area. VIEWING STRICTLY BY APPO..."
This beautifully presented 4 bed detached family home in the sought after area of Rogerstone is tucked away in a peaceful residential cul-de-sac however has M4 links just a minute away and is within the Bassaleg High School and High Cross Junior School catchment. 
This beautifully presented four bedroom detached property is located in the increasingly popular area of Langstone. The property itself sits on a very generous sized plot at approximately 1/3 of an acre.
"* GUIDE PRICE £600,000-£650,000 * DETACHED FAMILY HOME * FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOMS * LARGE LIVING ROOM * SNUG * OFFICE * TWO EN-SUITE SHOWER ROOMS * FAMILY BATHROOM * ENCLOSED GARDEN * DOUBLE GARAGE * LARGE DRIVEWAY"
**DETACHED**FOUR BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**FAMILY BATHROOM**EN-SUITE**GARDEN**DRIVEWAY**GARAGE**
**NO ONWARD CHAIN**PERFECT FAMILY HOME**MODERN INTERIOR**POPULAR LOCATION*5 LARGE BEDROOMS** CORNER PLOT*LARGE DRIVEWAY** We are extremely excited to offer for sale this beautifully presented and tastefully decorated 5 bedroom detached home located in a very sought after location in Newport. The...
"* BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE WITHIN BASSALEG SCHOOL CATCHMENT AREA WITH 3 SEPARATE RECEPTION ROOMS, LARGE KITCHEN DINER & UTILITY ROOM, REFITTED FAMILY BATHROOM & A FULL SIZE MASTER EN-SUITE, DOUBLE GARAGE & DRIVEWAY SET WITHIN STUNNING GARDENS*"
This five-bedroom detached executive home is situated in the increasingly popular area of Langstone. Langstone itself is a highly regarded semi-rural yet residential area with some of the best schools in the locality. It is also situated to the east of Newport with easy access to junctions 23 & 2...
Detached - Double Garage - Two Ensuites - Sought After Location - Excellent Transport Links - Fantastic Family Home - Four Bedrooms - Close to local amenities
* Self Contained One Bedromm Annex * Four Bedrooms * Conservatory * Three Reception rooms * Off Road Parking* * Land leading to the banks of the river with potential moorings right* Walking Distance to Local Pub *
"Guide Price £600,000 to £620,000**EXECUTIVE DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY**FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM**KITCHEN & BREAKFAST ROOM**STUDY**UTILITY ROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM**TWO EN SUITE BATHROOMS**LARGE DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE**Pinkmove are delighted to present this spacious four be"
"*** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY *** SUBSTANTIAL Elevated Period Property, retaining many ORIGINAL FEATURES *** Previously a 7-bedroom CARE HOME, could revert back to a GENEROUS HOME or Subject to Planning a Wealth of Possibilities which might include a HMO or Individual Flats *** Email to VIEW"
"Spacious four bedroom, double fronted detached home with a generous living area and a study to the front of the property This spacious four-bedroom, double-fronted detached home features a generous living area and study to the front of the property, and an impressive open-plan kitchen/dining/..."
"Superb two storey house boasting views over Caerleon village, the river and beyond. The deceptively spacious accommodation features 4 doubles bedrooms, 2 bath/shower rooms, 2 large sitting rooms, study, kitchen/dining room, utility and double garage. "
"**PERFECT FAMILY HOME**DESIRABLE LOCATION* RARE TO MARKET**IMMACULATE THROUGHOUT**5 DOUBLE BEDROOMS** We are pleased to offer for sale this well presented 5-bedroom detached home located in a sought-after location in Langstone, Newport. The house is conveniently situated a very short distance aw..."
"Situated on a corner plot, The Thespian boasts a GARAGE and off-road PARKING plus a spacious OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining area, separate living room with feature BAY WINDOW, and three generous bedrooms with an EN-SUITE to bedroom 1."
"Wonderful four bedroom, double fronted detached home with a single garage and allocated parking The Wye is spacious four-bedroom, double-fronted detached home featuring a generous living area and study to the front of the property, and an impressive open-plan kitchen/dining/ family room at th..."
"YOPA is proud to present this substantial Five bedroom detached property in the sought-after locality of Allt-Yr-Yn. Situated over Four floors with an integral garage, drive, and large garden, please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Newport market. All Offers & Interest Invited."
**EXECUTIVE DETACHED PROPERTY**FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**THREE RECEPTION ROOMS**UTILITY AND CLOAKROOM**MODERN KITCHEN & BREAKFAST ROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM AND TWO ENSUITE SHOWER ROOMS**INTEGRAL DOUBLE GARAGE**DOUBLE DRIVEWAY**POPULAR LOCATION**We are delighted to present this beautifully presented five bed
"Located in the semi-rural area of Llanwern, this stunning four-bedroom semi-detached Farmhouse is located close to junctions 23 & 24 of the M4 Motorway, and is just a short distance from Spytty retail and leisure park, Llanwern Village and Llanwern golf club, with the rear garden set just behind ..."
"**PERFECT FAMILY HOME**TASTEFULLY DECORATED**LARGE PLOT**EXCELLENT VIEWS** We are pleased to offer for sale this beautifully presented and tastefully decorated 4-bedroom detached home located in a sought-after location in Caerleon, Newport. The home is conveniently situated within a very short d..."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - An outstanding, spacious family house offering four/five bedroom accommodation in this highly sought after village location within sought after Bassaleg, offering excellent school catchment a short drive from the M4. The detached property offers further potential in an outstand..."
"This beautifully presented four bedroom detached property is located in the increasingly popular area of Langstone. Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac, Shepherd drive is also within close proximity to junctions 23 and 24 of the M4 Motorway and a stones through away from Newport Spytty Retail park and..."
"An Executive Four Bedroom, Three Bathroom, Two Reception Room Newly Built Home! This property comes with a 10 Year Insurance Warranty so you can move in with nothing to worry about!"
"Built in 1999, this executive five-bedroom detached property is located in the increasingly popular area of Priory Drive, Langstone. Langstone itself is a highly regarded semi-rural yet residential area with some of the best schools in the locality."
"**GUIDE PRICE £550,000 - £575,000**DETACHED**FOUR BEDROOMS**THREE RECEPTION ROOMS**FAMILY BATHROOM**DOWNSTAIRS SHOWER ROOM**GARDEN**DRIVEWAY**STABLE BLOCK**"
"*STUNNING, EXTENDED, 4 BEDROOM HOUSE IN HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION WITH STYLISH KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY ROOM, UTILITY ROOM, LOUNGE, STUDY, EN-SUITE, FAMILY BATHROOM, GARAGE, DRIVEWAY, SUN TERRACE & LARGE REAR GARDEN* VIEWING ADVISED!"
DETACHED FOUR BEDROOM home with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/LIVING AREA and a SEPARATE LOUNGE. Also boasts a SEPARATE UTILITY and an EN-SUITE to the master bedroom.
"**REDUCED NOW Guide Price £535,000 to £550,000****HIGH SPEC EXECUTIVE PROPERTY**DETACHED HOUSE**FOUR BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**FAMILY RECEPTION ROOM**CONTEMPORARY KITCHEN**BI FOLD DOORS **DOWNSTAIRS W.C.**LARGE FAMILY BATHROOM**LARGE REAR GARDEN**GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY**Pinkmove are pleased to"
"The Limeslade is a five-bedroom detached home. There’s a Living room, study, dining room, kitchen, family room with French doors, breakfast room, utility room and downstairs WC. The first floor benefits from five bedrooms - bedroom one and two both come with en suites - and a bathroom."
"Contemporary four bedroom, double fronted detached home with garage The Teifi is a contemporary four-bedroom, double-fronted detached home with a single garage and allocated parking. This property features a wonderful open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading to the garden and a..."
"Charming four bedroom double-fronted detached home with garage and parking This contemporary four-bedroom, double-fronted detached home has a single garage and allocated parking. It also features a wonderful open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading to the garden and a utility r..."
VIEWING ESSENTIAL. Exceptionally well presented. Modern 4 bedroom Dormer style detached bungalow located in an highly popular residential area of Rogerstone in Newport. The property benefits from front lawn & block paved driveway leading to one & half tandem garage & enclosed rear ...
"An outstanding, substantially extended detached period house with POOL & POOL HOUSE offering four bedroom, two bathroom accommodation in this sought after and highly convenient location a brief walk from Beechwood Park and a short drive from the city centre & M4 at junction 24. The property f..."
"Built in 1999, this detached four/five bedroom property is located in the increasingly popular area of Langstone. Benefiting from large driveway and double garage."
"Situated in the ever desirable location of Caerleon, this substantial four bedroom detached property would make an excellent family home. Positioned toward the end of a cul-de-sac, and benefitting from a driveway and garage, an internal viewing is essential to fully appreciate the space and poten..."
FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED family home with INTEGRAL GARAGE and EN-SUITE MASTER BEDROOM.  Extensive OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM along with a SEPARATE UTILITY and CLOAKROOM and a LARGE SEPARATE LOUNGE.
Call us today to book your appointment and find out more information on these stunning new homes! HIGH LEVELS OF INTEREST EXPECTED!
"Guide Price £230,000 TO £240,000 **SPACIOUS WELL PRESENTED TERRACED PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**MODERN KITCHEN**DINING ROOM**UTILITY SPACE**CLOAKROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM**Pinkmove are delighted to present this beautifully presented three bedroom terraced property situated"
"*Guide Price £500,000-£525,000* An Outstanding Detached Home located in the ever sought after area of Bassaleg. Two En-Suites, Three Reception Rooms, Double garage and more!!"
"**GUIDE PRICE £500,000 - £550,000**DETACHED**THREE/FOUR BEDROOMS**TWO LARGE RECEPTION ROOMS**GARDEN**DOUBLE GARAGE**DOUBLE DRIVEWAY**"
* DETACHED FAMILY HOME * FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS * THREE RECEPTION ROOMS * TWO EN-SUITES * FAMILY BATHROOM * CONSERVATORY * GARDEN
*NO CHAIN*SPACIOUS AND EXTENDED DETACHED COTTAGE**FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS**MASTER EN-SUITE AND FAMILY BATHROOM**EXTENSIVE LIVING AREAS**KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM**UTILY AND CLOAKROOM**EXCEPTIONALLY LARGE WORKSHOP/GARAGE DIMENSIONS ARE 9MTRS X 9MTRS AND AMPLE PARKING**UNIQUE OPPORTUNITY**We are pleased to 
In the highly coveted Jubilee Park neighbourhood of Rogerstone sits this breathtaking 5 bed luxury detached family home that has been meticulously crafted with an unwavering attention to detail and no expense spared
"The Overton is a four bedroom detached home. The living room is perfect for gatherings with friends and family. There’s also a spacious front aspect dining room and study, handy downstairs WC, utility with outside access and en suite to the bedroom one."
Executive Detached Property - Popular New Build Redrow Estate - Upgraded Kitchen With Integrated Appliances - Double Garage and Driveway - Two Reception Rooms - Four Double Bedrooms - Two Bedrooms with Ensuite - Immaculate Condition
"Isla Alexander are delighted to offer this executive four-bedroom detached home, on the sought after Redrow development with M4 close by. Superbly designed, this spacious home which has been upgraded throughout and offers a luxury finish."
**DETACHED FAMILY HOME**SIX BEDROOMS**THREE RECEPTION ROOMS**FIVE BATHROOMS**GARAGE**PARKING**
"Guide price £480,000 to £500,000. Hathways are delighted to offer for sale a unique opportunity to acquire a substantial, semi-detached period house situated in the heart of Caerleon Village. Benefiting from many original character features, large garden, and double garage."
"Breath-Taking Views! Simply Incredible are the few words I would use to describe this Four Double Bedroom, Three Reception Semi-Detached home with amazing views!!"
"Excellent family home in the sought after location of Rhiwderin. This wonderful four-bedroom detached house features a spacious rear garden, a double garage and off-road parking, and a conservatory allowing you to enjoy views of the garden all year round. Don't miss the opportunity to view this f..."
"Situated in an exceptional level plot of approximately 1/3 acre in the heart of Bassaleg, adjoining Newport’s most sought after secondary school and a brief drive from the M4, a deceptively spacious bungalow offering three double bedroom accommodation. The property offers outstanding potent..."
"This is such a rare opportunity to acquire a property positioned in a fantastic location in Rogerstone. With easy access to the motorway, this property is great for commuting to Cardiff, Bristol and beyond."
* DETACHED * FOUR BEDROOMS * DRIVEWAY * CONSERVATORY * GARAGE * ENSUITE * CLOAKROOM
**RARE OPPORTUNITY**FAMILY HOME**FOUR BEDROOMS**ENCLOSED GREAT SIZED GARDEN**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**FAMILY BATHROOM**EN-SUITE**GARAGE**DRIVEWAY**
"The Lavernock is a four-bedroom detached home perfectly designed for modern living. Its features include an open plan kitchen/breakfast room - ideal for entertaining friends and family - a bright front aspect living room, separate family area and study, and en suite to the bedroom one."
"**GUIDE PRICE £465,000 - £475,000**DETACHED**THREE/FOUR BEDROOMS**INTEGRAL GARAGE**GATED DRIVEWAY**GARDEN**TWO EN-SUITE SHOWER ROOMS**FAMILY BATHROOM**DOWNSTAIRS CLOAKROOM**"
"£460,000-£475,000! Show Stopper Home! Located in the sought after location of Glan Llyn is this Four Double Bedroom, Three Reception room detached home!"
"The ground floor we would say has been designed for space and light. Whether it's a busy family or you like entertaining you certainly have the room in this house. The property is filled with all the latest features that the modern family could need, while the contemporary, elegant inter..."
"A spacious, individually designed detached house offering FOUR BEDROOM family accommodation in this exceptionally sought after location a very brief drive from the M4 and within walking distance of Ridgeway and Glasllwch School. The property further features a stunning double reception room, attr..."
"Located in the old Roman village of Caerleon, this three-bedroom detached property has been a family home by the current owners for the past 46 years."
"Pinkmove are pleased tooffer this new Enzo's Homes development, Abbey Woods. Enzo's Homes have built a reputation for high-qualityhomes in some of the UK’s most beautiful locations, and this latest developmentis no exception. Based in the convenient area of Llantarnam, Cwmbran, thisnewly plann"
"* BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FAMILY HOME * Sage & Co are delighted to offer for SALE this MODERN, THREE BEDROOM, SEMI-DETACHED property set in the popular location of RISCA, only a short drive from the main A467 Bypass and the RISCA TRAIN STATION giving direct access to CARDIFF CITY CENTRE. T..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000 ** An historic house situated in the heart of the Roman village of Caerleon. The accommodation spans three floors featuring five bedrooms, 2 ensuites, main bathroom and three reception rooms. The location of this property and internal layout offer..."
"Guide Price £450,000 TO £460,000*HIGHLY DESIRABLE LOCATION**DETACHED PROPERTY**FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**SECOND SITTING ROOM AND STUDY**SPACIOUS KITCHEN/DINER**FAMILY BATHROOM & EN-SUITE**DOWNSTAIRS SHOWER ROOM AND UTILITY**LARGE DRIVEWAY**CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES**SOLAR, ELECTR"
"YOPA is proud to present this rare to market four-bed end of terrace property with a Post office in the heart of the sought-after village of Bassaleg. With a profitable business, Large plot, Parking & Bassaleg school catchment, please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant market."
"This property is currently not for sale. The show home offers you a detailed look at this exciting new Enzo Homes Development in Llantarnam.Viewing of show home by appointment only. Please call the office to arrange or direct to Maria, our site manager on .-------------------------------"
"The Goldsmith features a DOUBLE GARAGE, OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining/family area, with integrated appliances and adjoining UTILITY, separate lounge, dining room/STUDY, FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS, and TWO EN-SUITES."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A spacious, individually designed family house offering FOUR BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM accommodation in sought after Rogerstone, within excellent school catchment and a brief drive from the M4. The property further features a superb entrance hallway, spacious living room, study, fa..."
"The Whitmore is a detached home with a living room and a open plan kitchen/breakfast room. It’s practical too, with a downstairs WC, utility with outside access and storage cupboard. The large bedroom one has an en suite with the landing leading on to three further bedrooms and the amily bathroom."
"Excellent four bedroom semi-detached house in the sought after area of Llanwern. This spacious home offers a modern kitchen/ diner, two spacious reception rooms, a large garden, a garage and off-road parking, and a loft room. Don't miss out on this fantastic family home. BOOK YOUR VIEWING TODAY!"
"** GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £435,000**DETACHED**FOUR BEDROOMS**GATED DRIVEWAY**INTEGRAL GARAGE**BALCONY**LARGE LOUNGE**GENEROUS ENCLOSED GARDEN**"
"* GUIDE PRICE £425,000-£450,000 * DETACHED * THREE STOREY * FOUR BEDROOMS * TWO BATHROOMS * EN-SUITE * CLOAKROOM * GARDEN * DRIVEWAY"
"* GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000 * SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME * FIVE BEDROOMS * FAMILY BATHROOM * SPACIOUS LIVING ROOM * DINING ROOM * GARAGE * EXTENSIVE DRIVEWAY * MATURE GARDENS"
"Executive Detached Home, Four Bedrooms, Large Garden along with a driveway and Double Garage. Not One to Miss!!"
**IN CATCHMENT AREA OF BASSALEG SCHOOL AND GOOD LOCAL PRIMARY SCHOOLS**EXCEPTIONAL DETACHED 4 BEDROOM HOME**PRIMARY BEDROOM EN SUITE**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**KITCHEN**UTILITY ROOM AND CLOAKROOM**OFF ROAD PARKING AND DOUBLE GARAGE**LANSCAPED REAR GARDEN**Pinkmove are delighted to present this lovely fou
"* GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000 * DETACHED FAMILY HOME * THREE/FOUR BEDROOMS * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * DOWNSTAIRS SHOWER ROOM * UTILITY * WALK-IN WARDROBE * EN-SUITE * SHOWER ROOM * EXTENSIVE GARDEN * DRIVEWAY"
"An EXTENDED family house offering four bedroom, two bathroom, three reception room accommodation in this exceptionally sought after family location within excellent school catchment and a brief drive from the M4. The property further features ground floor cloakroom, uPVC double glazing, gas combi..."
"**OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £425,000**DETACHED**THREE BEDROOMS**THREE RECEPTION ROOMS**DRIVEWAY**GARDEN**EN-SUITE**"
"Inviting offers in the region of £425,000. HATHWAYS are delighted to offer for sale this generous detached bungalow set within its own plot. Situated in the much sought after historic village of Caerleon this property, with bags of potential, has wide market appeal. "
"* GUIDE PRICE £425,000-£435,000 * DETACHED PROPERTY * FOUR BEDROOMS * EN-SUITE * OFFICE * DRIVEWAY * GARAGE * QUIET RESIDENTIAL AREA * DOWNSTAIRS CLOAKROOM * GARDEN * CONSERVATORY"
Detached | Three Bedrooms |large walk-in cupboard/ Living Room | Dining Room | Lounge/Family Room | Kitchen | Bathroom | Rear Garden | Patio | Rear Garden | No Onward Chain | EPC Rating D This three bedroom bay-fronted detached house with a wealth of original features is located in a sought afte...
"An outstanding, EXTENDED & RENOVATED family house offering four bedroom, two bathroom accommodation in this superb location a very brief drive from the M4 and within excellent school catchment. The property further features three reception rooms, stunning kitchen breakfast-room, utility room, gro..."
"NEW PRICE NOW Guide Price £425,000 TO £450,000*IMMACULATELY WELL PRESENTED**FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED**MASTER EN SUITE**TWO LARGE RECEPTION ROOMS**FITTED KITCHEN DINER**FAMILY BATHROOM**REAR GARDEN**OFF ROAD AND GARAGE PARKING**SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION**REF#00016748**Pinkmove are delighted to o"
* TOWN HOUSE * THREE BEDROOMS * FAMILY BATHROOM * EN-SUITE * LIVING ROOM * GARDEN * ALLOCATED PARKING
* DETACHED FAMILY HOME * FOUR BEDROOMS * THREE RECEPTION ROOMS * DOWNSTAIRS SHOWER ROOM * UTILITY ROOM * FAMILY BATHROOM * PRIVATE GARDEN * GARAGE * DRIVEWAY
Larger Than Average - Excellent Size Garden - Land to Rear - Large Basement - Bags of Potential - Double Garage - Off Road Parking for Multiple Vehicles - Very Well Presented
"A FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOME with INTEGRAL GARAGE. Ground floor boasts OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM with SEPARATE UTILITY, CLOAKSROOM and a SEPARATE LOUNGE."
"*WELL PRESENTED, 5 BEDROOM, DETACHED HOUSE WITH LIVING ROOM, DINING ROOM, MODERN KITCHEN, UTILITY ROOM, ENSUITE SHOWER ROOM, FAMILY BATHROOM, LARGE REAR GARDEN, GARAGE & DRIVEWAY*"
No Onwards Chain - Popular Location - Excellent Access to M4 - Off Road Parking - Garage - Four Bedrooms - Master with ensuite - Detached - Low maintenance rear garden.
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** The Bowyer is a spacious FAMILY HOME with a single GARAGE, benefiting from an OPEN PLAN kitchen/dining/family room with INTEGRATED ZANUSSI APPLIANCES. The 1st floor has 3 DOUBLE bedrooms & a generous single, plus an EN-SUITE. "
"The Barlow is a light, airy and spacious four-bedroom home. The open-plan kitchen-diner is the heart of the home, the upstairs offers four modern bedrooms. The master bedroom is complete with an en-suite and is a haven you can retreat to at the end of a busy day.
For the"
Beautifully presented modern executive family home
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - An outstanding modern family house offerings spacious, high-spec FOUR BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM accommodation in this quiet, convenient location between Newport and Cardiff, a short drive from the M4 at Junction 28. The property further features a stunning open plan family kitchen/..."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - An exceptionally spacious period property offering FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM, THREE RECEPTION ROOM accommodation in this sought after west side location a short walk from the city centre train station and a brief drive from M4. The property further features an excellent size kitchen ..."
Long Income Pub and Bar Portfolio. BUSINESS UNAFFECTED. Offers in excess of £400000.00  BUSINESS TRADING AS USUAL AND REMAINS UNAFFECTED. The building has a Victorian style façade which is arranged over two storeys. The ground floor comprises a traditional pub layout with a c...
"**DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS, VERSATILE, THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW IN QUIET HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER WEST SIDE LOCATION WITH LARGE CONSERVATORY, TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, GARAGE & DRIVEWAY SET ON A GOOD SIZE PLOT WITH BEAUTIFUL VIEWS**"
"A rare opportunity to acquire an outstanding plot in this highly sought after location with full planning permission for a FIVE BEROOM, THREE BATHROOM family house. The site has been cleared and the concrete base is currently being completed."
This stunning 4 bedroom semi detached property has been built to a very high specification by local well established award winning property developers. Call Darlows on for more information!
Larger Than Average - Potential four bedroom - Driveway for multiple vehicles - Garage - Attic Conversion - Low Maintenance Garden - Close to Local Amenities
Fortis are delighted to bring to market a unique opportunity to acquire a large family home and take over a well-established family run business and premises. 
"Situated on a corner plot and benefitting from a double driveway, the Cutler is a 4-bedroom home that features an open-plan kitchen, dining, and family room, an integral garage, a separate living room, and an en suite to bedroom 1."
"The Whiteleaf is a four-bedroom family home. The kitchen/breakfast room enjoys an open aspect through French doors. There is a living room, a dining room, a cloakroom and utility. Upstairs there are four bedrooms, with bedroom one benefiting from an en suite, a bathroom and three storage cupboards."
"A three-storey, four-bedroom home, The Paris has everything you need. From a practical concealed laundry space in the kitchen-diner to fitted wardrobes in one of the bedrooms – it’s a home for keeping you organised, driven, and ready for your day ahead.
For the full t"
"The Roseberry features a kitchen / dining room with FRENCH DOORS leading onto the garden, fitted CONTEMPORARY style kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and UTILITY. SEPARATE living room and CLOAKROOM. There is an EN-SUITE to MASTER bedroom. "
RARE OPPORTUNITY**DETACHED HOME**HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION OF ALLT YR YN**VIEWS OF MONMOUTHSHIRE & BRECON CANAL**EASY ACCESS OF JUNCTIONS 25-27 OF M4**APPROX. 1 MILE FROM NEWPORT CITY CENTRE**MODERN FITTED KITCHEN/DINER**LARGE LOUNGE**GROUND FLOOR WC**THREE GENEROUS BEDROOMS**FIRST FLOOR BATHR...
"* GUIDE PRICE £390,000 - £400,000 * DETACHED * FOUR BEDROOMS * LIVING ROOM * KITCHEN/DINER * UTILITY * EN SUITE * FAMILY BATHROOM * DRIVEWAY * GARAGE"
LARGER THAN AVERAGE FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOME WITH TWO USEABLE ATTIC ROOMS *No onward chain *Four bedrooms plus two attic rooms *Good sized kitchen with separate dining room *Spacious lounge *Ground floor WC *Garage and driveway *Enclosed garden *Walking distance to amenities *Major roa...
"**REDUCED NOW Guide Price £390,000 TO £400,000***WELL PRESENTED DETACHED FAMILY HOME**FOUR BEDROOMS**MASTER EN-SUITE**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**MODERN KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM**CLOAKROOM AND WC**DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this four bedroom detached property situated on"
"The Marston is a four-bedroom detached home. The kitchen/diner has French doors to the rear garden, there’s a front-aspect living room, a downstairs WC, storage and a garage. Upstairs are four good-sized bedrooms - spacious bedroom one has an en-suite - and there’s a modern fitted family bathroom."
"*SHOWHOME OPEN - please contact us to arrange an appointment* The Milliner is a spacious home with a detached GARAGE, a generous OPEN PLAN kitchen / dining / family room with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and FRENCH DOORS, plus a DUAL-ASPECT lounge, four DOUBLE BEDROOMS and an EN-SUITE to bedroom 1."
"*OPEN TO OFFERS! TWO GENERATION LIVING!! 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM, DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH STYLISH KITCHEN, REFITTED BATHROOM, UTILITY ROOM & LIVING/DINING ROOM WITH A SELF CONTAINED, 1 DOUBLE BEDROOM ANNEX WITH KITCHEN/LIVING AREA & SHOWER ROOM* "
"READY TO MOVE INTO WITH FLOORING INCLUDED! The Roseberry features a kitchen / dining room with FRENCH DOORS leading onto the garden, fitted CONTEMPORARY style kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and UTILITY. SEPARATE living room and CLOAKROOM. There is an EN-SUITE to MASTER bedroom. . "
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN! ** DETACHED FAMILY HOME SET IN POPULAR CUL DE SAC LOCATION ** Sage & Co are delighted to offer for SALE this FOUR BEDROOM, SEMI-DETACHED property set in the exceptionally popular and convenient location of ROGERSTONE within excellent school catchment for Basslaeg High..."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - Superbly located on sought after Old Chepstow Road, an attractively maintained modern house offering four bedrooms, two bathroom accommodation within excellent school catchment and a brief drive from the M4 at junction 24. The property further features two reception rooms, kitc..."
"**NO CHAIN**SUBSTANIAL FAMILY HOME**FIVE BEDROOMS**FOUR RECEPTION ROOMS**KITCHEN**BATHROOM AND SHOWER ROOM**GENEROUS ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**GARAGE PARKING**REF#00020284**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this spacious, five bedroom / four reception room family home situated within a highly desirable re"
"Deceptively spacious, this substantial semi-detached home offers oodles of space inside and out and is perfect for large and extended modern living, no matter what your family size"
"Idyllic three-bedroom detached home with allocated parking This idyllic three-bedroom, detached home with allocated parking boasts a modern open-plan kitchen/dining room with access to the rear garden, a cloakroom and fantastic storage. This wonderful home also benefits from a bright and spac..."
The Redbourne is a four bedroom family home with single garage and parking featuring a kitchen / dining room with FRENCH DOORS and a CONTEMPORARY style kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and UTILITY. A SEPARATE living room and CLOAKROOM. There is an EN-SUITE to MASTER bedroom. READY FOR 2023!
"GUIDE PRICE OF £380,000 TO £400,000 Hathways are delighted to offer for sale this attractive bay fronted property with three bedrooms overlooking Beechwood Park. Enjoying generous proportions, high ceilings, two reception rooms, mature gardens, garage, and city location with easy access to the M4."
"3 STOREY FAMILY HOME We are delighted to offer for sale this fabulous detached family home. The Laurels is a totally bespoke, individual home that has been built to an exceptional standard. The accommodation has been designed over three floors and can be utilised and the flexibility to create..."
"We’ll contribute 5% towards your deposit*, plus reserve for just £99!
*Offer available on plot 106 only, for the full Terms and Conditions apply, click "
"**BALCONY TO FRONT** Brand new 4 bedroom family home with accommodation comprising Lounge with balcony, kitchen/diner, cloaks/wc, 4 bedrooms (Bed 1 with en-suite), 2 further bathrooms & a garage. Call Peter Alan in Newport for information."
"**HOME TO SELL?? ASSISTED MOVE AVAILABLE (T&Cs apply, contact us for details** Brand new 4 bedroom family home with accommodation comprising Lounge, kitchen/diner, cloaks/wc, utility, 4 bedrooms (Bed 1 with en-suite), family bathroom & a garage. Call Peter Alan in Newport for information."
"Spaced over three floors, this four-bedroom home has everything you need"
"Situated 4 miles from central Newport, The Scrivener boasts a GARAGE and off-road PARKING plus a spacious OPEN-PLAN kitchen dining area with UTILITY, separate front-facing lounge with BAY WINDOW and four generous bedrooms with an EN-SUITE to bedroom 1."
"A four-bedroom DETACHED FAMILY home with SINGLE GARAGE and PARKING featuring a living room with FRENCH DOORS leading out onto the garden. A fitted kitchen with ACCESS out onto the garden, a SEPARATE dining room and CLOAKROOM. Upstairs, there is an EN-SUITE to master bedroom."
SEMI-DETACHED**DORMER BUNGALOW**FOUR BEDROOMS**OPEN PLAN LOUNGE/DINER**SPECTACULAR VIEWS**GATED DRIVEWAY**DOUBLE GARAGE**GARDEN**CORNER PLOT**BASEMENT BAR**BATHROOM**SHOWER ROOM**WC**
"** Guide Price £375,000 TO £400,000****FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED REDROW CAMBRIDGE STYLE HOME**IMMACULATELY WELL PRESENTED**MASTER EN SUITE**GENEROUS LIVING ROOM**OPEN PLAN KITCHEN DINER/FAMILY ROOM**UTILITY ROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED GARDEN**GARAGE AND OFF ROAD PARKING WITH ELECTRIC VEH"
"Guide Price £375,000 TO £390,000 **DETACHED FAMILY HOME**FOUR BEDROOMS**MASTER BEDROOM WITH EN-SUITE AND FITTED WARDROBES**DRIVEWAY PROVIDING AMPLE OFF ROAD PARKING**ENCLOSED GOOD SIZE REAR GARDEN**SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION**FANTASTIC ACCESS LINKS TO THE M4 MOTORWAY**Pinkmove are delighted t"
"**WATCH THE VIDEO** WELL PRESENTED, 3 STOREY DETACHED HOUSE WITH 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, ENSUITE SHOWER ROOM, KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, LOUNGE, LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN, GARAGE & DRIVEWAY WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO CAERLEON VILLAGE **"
**DETACHED**FOUR BEDROOMS**GARDEN**LARGE DRIVEWAY**GARAGE**ENSUITE**BATHROOM**CLOAKROOM**
* TERRACED PROPERTY * LIVING ROOM * KITCHEN/DINER** * THREE BEDROOMS * DOWNSTAIRS CLOAKROOM * GARAGE & PARKING * LOW MAINTENANCE GARDEN WITH REAR ACCESS * QUIET RESIDENTIAL AREA
"This is an excellent opportunity to acquire a stunning FIVE bedroom detached home with two reception rooms, gorgeous kitchen space and off road parking for multiple vehicles"
"An EXTENDED period house offering four (possibly five) bedroom family accommodation in highly sought after Bassaleg Village, within excellent school catchment and a brief drive from the M4. The property further features a spacious entrance area or sun room, open plan living and dining areas, exte..."
BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED AND MUCH IMPROVED DETACHED HOME WITH GENEROUS GARDEN *Immaculately presented throughout *Four good sized bedrooms *Much improved *Stylish fitted kitchen/breakfast area *Through lounge/diner *Refitted bathroom and ensuite *Driveway leading to garage *Good sized rear ...
"**SPACIOUS SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM**MODERN KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOM**LARGE REAR GARDEN**AMPLE OFF ROAD PARKING**GARAGE AND HOME OFFICE**EXCELLENT LOCATION**Pinkmove are delighted to present this three bedroom family property, situated on Tennyson Av"
"Situated in the increasingly popular area of Langstone, is this three-bedroom detached home Langstone itself is a highly regarded semi-rural yet residential area with some of the best schools in the locality. It is also situated to the east of Newport with easy access to junctions 23 & 24 of the ..."
"YOPA is proud to present this nearly new, high-specification four-bedroom detached property in the sought-after village of Jubilee Park in Rogerstone. With an abundance of extras, a drive, and a detached garage, please enquire early to avoid disappointment. All Offers & Interest are Invited."
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000-£400,000. DREAM DETACHED! This Home was built in 2014 and has had no corners cut. No Onward Chain, Four Bedrooms, Two En-Suites and a further two bathrooms. Everything you need and more! Do not miss out"
"YOPA is proud to present this substantial Four bedroom detached property located in Coedkernew. With a double detached garage, Three bathrooms, Easy M4 access & located in a quiet cul de sac, please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Newport market. All Offers & Interest Invited."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A detached modern house offering outstanding family accommodation in this highly sought after and convenient location within excellent school catchment and a brief drive from the M4 at junction 24. The property further features a bay-fronted living room, sitting or dining room,..."
* DETACHED * FOUR BEDROOMS * GARDEN * EXTENSIVE DRIVEWAY * THREE BATHROOMS * STUDY * OPEN PLAN LIVING
A spacious THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM home of the HIGHEST STANDARD with FULL LENGTH LOUNGE and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING AREA. Also boasts a large EN-SUITE to the master bedroom.
"A four-bedroom FAMILY DETACHED home with SINGLE GARAGE and PARKING featuring a kitchen / dining room with FRENCH DOORS leading out onto the garden - great space for ENTERTAINING! UTILITY, A SEPARATE living room and CLOAKROOM. Upstairs, an EN-SUITE to bedroom one. "
Contemporary three bedroom semi-detached home with allocated parking The Towy is an idyllic three-bedroom semi-detached home featuring a spacious living area to the front of the property and a modern kitchen/dining room to the rear with French doors providing access to the garden. This home a...
Modern three bedroom semi-detached home with two allocated parking spaces The Towy is an idyllic three-bedroom semi-detached home featuring a spacious living area to the front of the property and a modern kitchen/dining room to the rear with French doors providing access to the garden. This h...
"Hurricane Way is a tasteful and expansive residence that caters to the needs of families and couples alike. With its four generously sized bedrooms, you'll have ample space to enjoy your own privacy while also basking in the warm ambiance of a welcoming environment"
"Wonderful three-bedroom, semi-detached home with allocated parking This contemporary three-bedroom semi-detached home with allocated parking features a spacious living area to the front of the property and a modern kitchen/dining room to the rear with French doors providing access to the gard..."
"Modern three-bedroom, semi-detached home with parking The Afan is a contemporary three-bedroom semi-detached home with allocated parking features a spacious living area to the front of the property and a modern kitchen/dining room to the rear with French doors providing access to the garden...."
"You can now save up to £28,005* when you reserve Plot 128 – The Paris.
Was £391,995. Now £362,995 & Ready to move into this Summer!
*Terms and conditions apply. View "
"Impressive Detached Dorma Bungalow! A Three Bedroom home located in the sought after location of Rogerstone. Benefitting from off-road parking and a garage, best of all No Onward Chain!"
SPACIOUS 3 BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH STUNNING VIEWS *Three bedroom detached bungalow *Stunning views to the rear *Large basement area with great potential *Garage *Lovely garden with elevated veranda *Recently re-rendered exterior *uPVC double glazing and modern boiler *Walking dist...
"**GUIDE PRICE £360,000 - £380,000**DETACHED DORMER BUNGALOW**FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS**FAMILY BATHROOM**SUNROOM**GARDEN**OUT BUILDING**ON STREET PARKING**"
"* GUIDE PRICE £360,000 - £380,000 * DETACHED FAMILY HOME * FOUR BEDROOMS * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * DOWNSTAIRS CLOAKROOM * EN-SUITE * FAMILY BATHROOM * IMPRESSIVE GARDEN * GARAGE * DOUBLE DRIVEWAY"
"Light and airy, The Becket features an open plan kitchen diner, family room, making it the perfect space for entertaining family and friends. This three-story home includes four spacious bedrooms with the master suite placed over the second flo"
"**NO CHAIN**FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS**LOUNGE DINER**KITCHEN**BATHROOM**BUILT-IN STORAGE**COMMUNAL PARKING**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A WIDE RANGE OF FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00021467**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this spacious, two double bedroom apartment situated within a desira"
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** The ground floor of the Whitecroft features an OPEN-PLAN kitchen dining area and separate LOUNGE. The first floor leads to 3 bedrooms, one with en-suite & a family bathroom. The master bedroom to the top floor also boasts en-suite."
"***READY TO MOVE IN***CALL US NOW FOR A VIEWING*** Brand new detached family home. 4 bedrooms, 3 bathrooms, additional study, detached garage. Blinds, Flooring & light fittings included, 10 year NHBC warranty for your piece of mind."
"A three-storey, four-bedroom home, The Paris has everything you need. From a practical concealed laundry space in the kitchen-diner to a fitted wardrobe in bedroom one – it’s a home for keeping you organised, driven, and ready for your day ahead.
 "
This four bedroom beautifully decorated and stylish detached home is situated on the popular 'Mon Bank' development.
"Guide Price £350,000 TO £375,000 **SPACIOUS DETACHED PROPERTY**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**THREE RECEPTION ROOMS**KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOMS**LARGE DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE**LARGE PLOT AND REAR GARDEN**QUIET CUL DE SAC LOCATION**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this three bedroom, detached house sit"
"*£350,000 - £365,000* A truly stunning EXTENDED contemporary house offering three double bedroom, two bathroom accommodation in this highly sought after residential location within excellent school catchment and a short drive from the M4. The property further features an exceptional ..."
Four Bedrooms - Two Bathrooms - Garage - Sought After Location - Close to Local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links - Off Street Parking - Side Access - Low Maintenance Garden
"*STUNNING, 4 BEDROOM, DETACHED HOUSE IN HIGHLY SOUGHT LOCATION WITH STYLISH KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY ROOM, LIVING ROOM, GROUND FLOOR W/C, EN-SUITE, FAMILY BATHROOM, TANDEM DRIVEWAY & GARAGE*"
LARGE EXTENSION - Semi Detached - Four Reception Rooms - Walk In Wardrobe - Ensuite - Beautiful Views - Garage and Driveway - Balcony off Master Bedroom - Downstairs Shower Room
* DETACHED * THREE BEDROOMS * GARDEN * GARAGE * DOWNSTAIRS SHOWER ROOM * FAMILY BATHROOM * DRIVEWAY
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - An outstanding, individually designed, spacious family home ideally located in this quiet cul-de-sac in the popular area of Beechwood with easy access to local shops, schools, park and J24 of the M4. The superb master build property comprises to the ground floor of living room,..."
"This beautifully presented four bedroom detached property is located in the increasingly popular development of Glan Llyn. The property itself is within a short distance to Glan Llyn Primary school, LLanwern Bull Restaurant, and a lakeside park and play area."
* DETACHED * FOUR BEDROOMS * GARDEN * GARAGE & OFF ROAD PARKING * UTILITY * CLOAKROOM * ENSUITE * BATHROOM * GARDEN
"Set in the west Newport suburb of Bassaleg, this spacious three-bedroom, three-storey
family home has been finished to an exacting standard. Residing within a quiet residential
cul-de-sac, the property blends contemporary features with impressive amounts of flexible
living space"
**DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS**SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS**LOUNGE**KITCHEN BREAKFAST ROOM**LARGE BATHROOM**GARAGE**ENCLOSED LARGE REAR GARDEN** Pinkmove are delighted to offer this two bedroom semi-detached bungalow on Cefn Court in Rogerstone. The house has excellent transport links as we
"**THREE BEDROOM DETACHED**IMMACULATELY WELL PRESENTED**MASTER EN SUITE**LIVING ROOM**GENEROUS KITCHEN DINER**FAMILY BATHROOM**REAR GARDEN, GARAGE AND OFF ROAD PARKING**REF#00019028**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this immaculately well presented, three bedroom detached family home situated within a"
"* GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 * DETACHED * THREE BEDROOMS * GARAGE * DRIVEWAY * GARDEN * ONE BATHROOM * CLOAKROOM * LOTS OF POTENTIAL"
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** The ground floor of the Whitecroft features an open-plan kitchen dining area and separate lounge. The first floor leads to 3 bedrooms, one with en-suite & a family bathroom. The master bedroom to the top floor also boasts en-suite."
"Beautifully presented three bed detached cottage located in a highly sought after area with excellent transport links to the M4, Cardiff and Bristol. Contemporary kitchen and bathrooms finished to a high standard, lounge with wood burning stove, enclosed rear garden & driveway with off road ..."
"The Southcott is a beautiful new town house extending over THREE FLOORS, comprising an OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining area, spacious living area with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden, a dedicated STUDY and generous top floor master bedroom with EN-SUITE shower. Complete with a SINGLE GARAGE. "
"Bluestone Estate Agents are proud to present this four bedroom semi-detached property located in the sought after location of Chepstow Road. The property benefits from four great sized bedrooms, off-road parking for up to five vehicles, a spacious garage, two bathrooms and a loft conversion. The ..."
"An exceptionally spacious FOUR BEDROOM, THREE RECEPTION ROOM, TWO BATHROOM semi-detached period house in a highly convenient west side location a short drive from the M4 and within walking distance of the city centre train station. The property features a wealth of period features as well as a st..."
"You can now save up to £47,000* when you reserve Plot 139 – The Paris.
Was £391,995. Now £344,995 & Ready to move into now.
Plus, flooring, lights and blinds included!
<"
"Guide Price £300,000 TO £310,000  **DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION**THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM**KITCHEN**CONSERVATORY**LARGE PLOT AND GARDES**PARKING FOR MULTIPLE VEHICLES + GARAGE**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this three bedroom, detached family home"
BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED AND SPACIOUS 4 BEDROOM TOWNHOUSE IN JUBILEE PARK *Spacious three-storey accommodation *Four bedrooms *Impressive principle bedroom with ensuite *Sociable kitchen/diner *Full-width lounge *Enclosed rear garden *Garage plus plenty of parking *Highly sought after devel...
If you’re lo
"Guide Price £340,000 to £350,000 **NO CHAIN**SPACIOUS DETACHED BUNGALOW**THREE BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**KITCHEN/DINER**FRONT AND REAR GARDEN**DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE**POPULAR LOCATION**We are delighted to present this three bedroom, detached bungalow situated on The Orchard in Ponthir."
"*UNIQUE OPPORTUNITY* 3 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH LARGE DRIVEWAY & GARAGE, IN THE HEART OF THE CAERLEON VILLAGE, GOOD SIZE GARDENS, SHORT WALK TO PRIMARY & SECONDARY SCHOOLS, FANTASTIC ROAD LINKS TO JUNCTION 24 & 25 OF THE M4*"
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - Benefiting from a stunning high-spec renovation, this detached, extended property offers four bedroom, two bathroom accommodation in a superb, elevated position a short drive from the city centre and M4 at Junction 24. The property further features an outstanding kitchen diner ..."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A substantial, larger style period house offering FOUR BEDROOM accommodation in sought after Malpas, a short drive from the M4 and city centre. The property further features three reception rooms, kitchen breakfast-room, cloakroom, first floor bathroom, uPVC double glazing, gas..."
"A stunning renovation of a substantial period property offering FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM accommodation over three storeys in this popular and highly convenient location a short drive from the M4 and city centre. The property further features a spacious hallway, three reception rooms, sty..."
Modern executive home requiring some updating
"Outstanding Family Home! This recently modernized Newly Built home located in Glan Llyn offers it all! Four Bedrooms, off road parking and a garage, landscaped garden, new kitchen new bathroom, a scenic outlook and more! Best of it all….No Onward Chain"
"*NO CHAIN!! EXTENDED, 4 BEDROOM, DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH FITTED KITCHEN, LOUNGE WITH PATIO DOORS, DINING ROOM, PLAY ROOM/STUDY, MASTER EN-SUITE, BEAUTIFUL REAR GARDEN & EXTENSIVE PARKING IN HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION*"
SPACIOUS EXTENDED FAMILY HOME WITH LARGE GARDEN *Heavily extended semi detached family home *Large lounge with bay window *Impressive open plan kitchen/diner *Additional sitting room/study space/4th bedroom *Ground floor WC *Three/four bedrooms*First floor family bathroom *Large flat gar...
**DETACHED FAMILY HOME**THREE BEDROOMS**MASTER BEDROOM WITH EN-SUITE**LOUNGE**KITCHEN/DINER**FAMILY BATHROOM**DRIVE AND INTEGRAL SINGLE GARAGE**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this beautifully presented three-bedroom detached home in Langstone. The property is located in a highly sought-after locati
"The Charnwood Corner features a living room with French doors, an open-plan kitchen/breakfast room and a utility room with garden access, storage cupboards and downstairs WC. Upstairs, there are three bedrooms - bedroom one is en suite - a bathroom and further storage cupboards."
"*GUIDE PRICE £330,000-£340,000* SPACIOUS & BEAUTIFULLY UPGRADED THROUGHOUT, PERIOD PROPERTY WITH STUNNING KITCHEN/FAMILY ROOM, SOUGHT-AFTER ST. JULIANS AREA, 2 RECEPTION ROOMS, 4 BEDROOMS, 2 MODERN BATHROOMS, BASEMENT & LARGE GARDEN WITH GREAT VIEWS*"
FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME SITUATED IN ROGERSTONE *Four bedroom detached family home *Good sized lounge *Kitchen/diner with adjoining utility *Ground floor WC *Extended porch *Ample off road parking and garage *Enclosed rear garden *Walking distance to excellent amenities *Main ro...
Modern Throughout - Garage - Popular Location - Excellent Transport Links - Close to M4 - Four Bedrooms - Conservatory
A fantastic family home located approximately 1 mile from Newport City Centre and it associated retail and transport links. 
"Sitting proudly in a sought-after location in Newport is this modern four-bedroom, three storey townhouse, peppered with stylish touches throughout and boasting a generous sun-filled garden"
"**GUIDE PRICE £330,000 TO £340,000**IMMACULATELY WELL PRESENTED TOWN HOUSE**DESIRABLE LOCATION**FOUR BEDROOMS**MASTER EN SUITE**GENEROUS FITTED KITCHEN DINER**OPEN PLAN RECEPTION ROOMS**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN, GARAGE AND OFF ROAD PARKING**REF#00021303**Pinkmove are delight"
"**Guide Price £325,000 to £335,000**DESIRABLE LOCATION**FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM TOWN HOUSE**MASTER EN SUITE**GENEROUS FITTED KITCHEN DINER WITH ADDITIONAL UTILITY**LIVING ROOM WITH BALCONY**FAMILY BATHROOM AND GROUND FLOOR SHOWER ROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**OFF ROAD PARKING**REF#00020866**Pi"
"Sage & Co. are delighted to offer for sale this STUNNING, UPGRADED and DETACHED property on the outskirts of Newport City Centre. This THREE BEDROOM property includes many upgrades from Bellway Homes for example to the kitchen, spotlights to bathrooms and 'floor to ceiling' tiles in bathroom and ..."
"** Guide Price - £325,000 to £335,000** This detached home is well positioned on a good sized plot at the end of a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought after location of Langstone . Offering easy access to the M4 Newport making commuting to Cardiff, Bristol and beyond easy, and included in the catchme..."
Improved New Build Property - Modernised and Upgraded Throughout - Private Driveway - Sought After Location - Close to Local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links - Private and Landscaped Garden
**BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED DETACHED PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS**MASTER EN-SUITE**LIVING ROOM**MODERN KITCHEN/DINER**CLOAKROOM AND UTILITY**FAMILY BATHROOM**LARGE DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**We are delighted to present this beautifully presented three bedrooms detached property situated on 
"This beautiful four bedroom semi-detached house is a wonderful example of luxury modern living. Cleverly designed for the rigours of a busy family, but with lots of stylish space, plenty of natural light and a smart, sun-drenched garden"
"GUIDE PRICE £325,000 TO £350,000. This superb FOUR BED family home that has been remodelled and upgraded to a high standard by the current owners. Located in the popular Bassaleg area the property is with close proximity of Bassaleg school, usual amenities and excellent transport li..."
"*STYLISH, 3 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE IN HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION WITH KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, LIVING ROOM, STUNNING BATHROOM, GOOD SIZE REAR GARDEN WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO THE CITY CENTRE*"
"*UNIQUE OPPORTUNITY* 2 BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW ON A LARGE CORNER PLOT, IN THE HEART OF THE OLD CAERLEON VILLAGE, NEEDING RENOVATION WITH STACKS OF POTENTIAL, SUBSTANTIAL WRAP AROUND GARDENS, FANTASTIC ROAD LINKS TO JUNCTION 24 & 25 OF THE M4*"
"IDEAL FAMILY HOME WITH LOTS TO OFFER ! Sage and Co are pleased to offer FOR SALE this WELL PRESENTED SEMI DETACHED FOUR BEDROOM family home set in the sought after village of BASSALEG close to local amenities including Newport City Centre, highly regarded schools (Bassaleg School catchme..."
**SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME**FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS - MASTER EN-SUITE**LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM**MODERN FITTED KITCHEN**CLOAKROOM AND UTILITY ROOM**FIRST FLOOR FAMILY BATHROOM AND GROUND FLOOR SHOWER**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**DRIVEWAY PROVIDING AMPLE OFF ROAD PARKING**CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES**EXCELLENT 
- Fabulous size Garden- Converted Basement Bar - Beautifully Presented Family Home- Off Road Parking - Garage - Popular Location - Close to Local Amenities - Excellent Transport links
"Excellent four-bedroom family home located in the sought after area of Coedkernew. This lovely home features four good sized bedrooms, two bathrooms including an ensuite, a downstairs WC, two reception rooms, a bright and airy conservatory, and a garage with off-road parking. Don't miss out on th..."
BEAUTIFUL CHARACTERFUL FOUR BEDROOM HOME IN ROGERSTONE *Beautiful & characterful family home *Four bedrooms *Sought-after Rogerstone location *Two good sized reception rooms *Kitchen/breakfast room *Ground floor bathroom *Stylish ensuite to main bedroom *Enclosed private rear garden and ...
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A spacious, detached family house offering FOUR BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM accommodation in sought after Caerleon, a brief drive from the M4 and within excellent school catchment. The property further features two reception rooms, kitchen, uPVC double glazing, good size lawned garde..."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A detached modern house offering THREE/FOUR bedroom, two bathroom accommodation in a quiet cul-de-sac in this sought after family development within excellent school catchment and a short drive from the M4. The property features open plan living & dining rooms, bedroom 4 or..."
"No chain! Ideal Detached! A Well presented, spacious Four Bedroom, Two Bathroom, Three Reception room detached home located with great commuting links. Furthermore a driveway at the front!"
Driveway - Extended - Garden Room / Fourth Bedroom - Modern Throughout - Garden Bar - Cul de sac - Excellent transport links - Sought after location
Substantial size family home. Sought after residential area. 4 bedroom mid terrace family home with fantastic size rear garden and front forecourt. Easy access to Caerleon Road shops and local primary and comprehensive schools. Excellent road links to the M4 and city centre. Viewing is highly rec...
"A beautiful three bedroom home with stylish and versatile living space, perfect for welcoming friends and family. The open-plan kitchen, dining, and living room provide a sociable space to entertain or unwind. Floor-to-ceiling windows flood the home with light, giving it a spacious and airy feel."
"This is a popular three-bedroom home. The Sherwood has an open-plan kitchen/dining room and a bright front-aspect living room. A utility room, storage cupboard and downstairs cloakroom complete the ground floor. Upstairs, bedroom one is en suite and there’s a family bathroom and further storage."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** The Southcott is a beautiful new town house extending over three floors, comprising an open-plan kitchen/dining area, spacious living area with french doors to the rear garden, a study, generous top floor master bedroom with en-suite."
"Highly desirable residential area. Excellent road links to the M4, access to local schools & amenities. Double bay fronted period detached spacious family home with 3 good size bedrooms. Driveway providing off road parking leading to detached garage & rear garden. Updating & modernis..."
"The Ombersley features a kitchen / dining / family room with FRENCH DOORS leading onto the garden, fitted CONTEMPORARY style kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. SEPARATE living room and CLOAKROOM. An EN-SUITE and MASTER bedroom SPANS second floor. "
Sold with Sitting Tenants!! An Executive Four Bedroom Detached Property currently being let out at £1400 PCM
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - An attractively improved, architect designed detached dormer-bungalow offering three bedroom accommodation in this sought after location within excellent school catchment and a brief drive from the M4. The property features two first floor double bedrooms and WC, ground floor d..."
"**BAY FRONTED PERIOD PROPERTY OFF CHEPSTOW ROAD - CLOSE TO J24 OF THE M4** Comprising bay fronted open lounge, new spacious fitted kitchen/diner, three bedrooms, bathroom, private garden. Few minutes drive to M4 for easy commuting, close to many amenities"
"*WELL PRESENTED, 3 BEDROOM, DETACHED HOUSE IN HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION WITH KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, LIVING ROOM, FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM, GARAGE, DRIVEWAY & BEAUTIFUL VIEWS*"
"Guide Price £320,000 TO £325,000 **BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED**SPACIOUS DETACHED FAMILY HOME**THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**MODERN KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM**UTILITY AND CLOAKROOM**SHOWER ROOM**FRONT AND REAR GARDEN**AMPLE OFF ROAD PARKING AND SINGLE DETACHED GARAGE**We are delighted to present t"
Detached Bungalow Large Front and Rear Gardens - Garage - Off Road Parking - Great Location - Excellent Transport Links - Close to Local Amenities
"The Milford is the LARGEST 3-bed on the development and features a kitchen / dining room with FRENCH DOORS leading onto the garden, fitted CONTEMPORARY style kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. SEPARATE living room with BAY WINDOW and CLOAKROOM. There is an EN-SUITE to MASTER bedroom. READY FOR 2023"
"*SPACIOUS, DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE WITH 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM, LOUNGE/DINING ROOM, FAMILY ROOM, GROUND FLOOR SHOWER ROOM, FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM, GARAGE & EASY ACCESS TO JUNCTION 24 OF THE M4*"
"Are you a first-time buyer? We can help you with our First Time Buyer Boost scheme*
Save when you reserve the Webster 3-bedroom"
NO CHAIN - STUNNING DETACHED DORMER BUNGALOW WITH IMPRESSIVE KITCHEN *No onward chain *Two double bedroom with built-in wardrobes *High quality kitchen with marble worktops *Spacious lounge/dining room *Ground floor WC *Stylish first floor shower room *Long driveway leading to garage *En...
"Excellent three-bedroom detached family home in the sought after estate of Mon Bank. This lovely modern home offers a modern kitchen/ diner, a spacious living room, two bathrooms including an ensuite, a low-maintenance rear garden, and a driveway with a garage."
"Presenting this modern, detached, three-bed family home in Afon Village, Rogerstone for sale. This property is located on a quiet no-through road on the edge of the cul-de-sac, looking onto a bank of beautiful greenery and with footpaths close-by for easy access to the stunning countryside su..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** Introducing The Chandler, a stunning new home featuring an open-plan kitchen/dining area with french doors on to the rear garden, plus a separate lounge with feature bay window, and an en suite to bedroom 1. "
SUPER IMPRESSIVE & SPACIOUS THREE/FOUR BEDROOM TOWN HOUSE OVERLOOKING THE RIVER *Stunning town house with river views *Three/four good sized bedrooms *Impressive first floor lounge with French doors to balcony *Open plan kitchen/dining living area *Balconies to ground & first floor *Two ...
"REDUCED - A rare opportunity to acquire this two double bedroom semi detached cottage situated on the cusp of Newport Just off the A48 near to Cardiff. Also along on the M4 Corridor making this a fantastic place to commute to and from. The property briefly comprises entrance hall, lounge, co..."
"The Ashdown is a semi-detached home with a kitchen/breakfast room, a separate dining room, a cloakroom and useful built-in storage cupboards. The living room - with a Juliet balcony - and bedroom three are on the first floor. En suite bedroom one, bedroom two and a bathroom are on the second floor."
"The Edwena, three bedroom home is versatile and stylish, perfect for welcoming friends and family. The open-plan kitchen, dining, and living room provide a sociable space to entertain or unwind. Floor-to-ceiling windows flood the home with light, giving it a spacious and airy feel."
"You can now save up to £37,000* when you reserve Plot 141 – The Edwena.
Was £303,995. Now £324,995 & move in for Spring
Plus, flooring, lights and blinds included!
"
"The Leaside features a living room with FRENCH DOORS leading onto the garden, fitted CONTEMPORARY style kitchen / dining room with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and CLOAKROOM. There is an EN-SUITE to MASTER bedroom. READY FOR 2023!"
"Guide Price £300,000 - £310,000**SPACIOUS DETACHED PROPERTY**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM**KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOM**LARGE CORNER PLOT AND GARDEN**GARAGE & DRIVEWAY**CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES**Pinkmove are pleased to present this three bedroom, detached property, situat"
"*STUNNING DETACHED FAMILY HOME, MODERN DEVELOPMENT & CONVENIENT LOCATION CLOSE TO THE M4 MOTORWAY, DOUBLE DRIVEWAY, CONVERTED GARAGE, SEPARATE UTILITY ROOM, PERFECT FOR A GROWING FAMILY*"
"** 10% yield** A Five Bedroom, Two Reception Room, Two Bathroom HMO located on Chepstow Road. This property is currently vacant however once tenanted would rent out for approximately £2,500 PCM"
"*NO CHAIN!! EXTENDED, TRADITIONAL 3 BED SEMI DETACHED AT THE END OF A QUIET CUL DE SAC, CONVENIENT FOR MAINDEE SHOPS AND ADJACENT TO WOODLAND PARK*"
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000 to £320,000. Hathways are delighted to offer for sale this four bedroom, semi-detached, house. Benefiting from a garage, driveway, and great location on the outskirts of Caerleon Village, this property is ideal for the growing family."
"A larger than average period house offering THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM accommodation in this sought after west side location, a brief walk from the train station and short drive from M4. The property further features two reception rooms, conservatory, ground floor WC, large block paved dr..."
"RELISTED DUE TO A MARKETING BREAK *NO UPPER CHAIN* STUNNING COTTAGE WITH BAGS OF CHARM, IN THE HEART OF THE OLD CAERLEON VILLAGE, LOVINGLY REFURBISHED, STUNNING KITCHEN, 2 BEDROOMS, FAMILY BATHROOM, BEAUTIFUL GARDEN, FANTASTIC ROAD LINKS TO JUNCTION 24 & 25 OF THE M4*"
"*EXTENDED, BAY FRONTED SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME, 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, MODERN KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM, LOUNGE, DINING ROOM/SITTING ROOM, FAMILY BATHROOM, DRIVEWAY, GARAGE, GROUND FLOOR W/C, FANTASTIC REAR GARDEN, EASY ACCESS TO JUNCTION 25 OF THE M4*"
"**GUIDE PRICE £300,000 TO £315,000**IMMACULATELY WELL PRESENTED**THREE BEDROOM DETACHED**MASTER EN SUITE**GENEROUS LIVING ROOM**FITTED KITCHEN DINER**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**OFF ROAD PARKING**REF#00019650**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this immaculately well presented, t"
"A superb detached modern former show house offering three bedroom, two bathroom accommodation in this exceptionally sought after family location within excellent school catchment and a brief drive from the M4. The property further features an attractive reception room, modern kitchen diner, groun..."
"Three bedroom family home is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac in Rhiwderin, it has a good sized garden and is close to the local schools, shops and restaurants.
"
"*REDUCED NOW Guide Price £300,000 TO £325,000**END TERRACE**FOUR BEDROOMS**MASTER EN SUITE**KITCHEN DINER**LIVING ROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM**TWO BALCONIES WITH RIVER VIEWS**OFF ROAD AND GARAGE PARKING**ENCLOSED GARDEN**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A WIDE RANGE OF FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**PUBLIC TRANS"
"A larger style period house offering THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM accommodation in this popular residential location a very short drive from the M4 at junction 25. The property further features two spacious reception rooms, kitchen breakfast-room, first floor shower room, uPVC double glazing, gas combina..."
"GUIDE  PRICE £300,000 to £325,000. Hathways are delighted to offer for sale this 4 bedroom, semi-detached house on a large end plot, in the much sought after area of Caerleon."
"*EXTENDED, 3 BEDROOM, SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM, LIVING ROOM, SITTING ROOM, GROUND FLOOR W/C, UTILITY ROOM, MODERN BATHROOM, DOUBLE DRIVEWAY & GARAGE* GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £315,000*"
"YOPA is proud to present this unique, two-bedroom detached coach house. Located off a private drive, situated on a huge plot, on an exclusive street, and with a large outbuilding and a driveway please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Newport market. All Offers & Interest Invited"
"Guide Price £300,000 TO £310,000**NO CHAIN**DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS**THREE RECEPTION ROOMS**KITCHEN**UTILITY**FAMILY BATHROOM**LARGE DRIVEWAY TO FRONT**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**We are delighted to offer this three bedroom semi-detached home located on St "
"* GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £315,000 * SEMI-DETACHED * WELL-PRESENTED * THREE BEDROOMS * CONSERVATORY * ONE BATHROOM * CLOAKROOM * GARDEN * DRIVEWAY"
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a uniquely positioned three bedroom detached home with off road parking, garage and generous garden to rear"
"Guide Price £300,000 TO £325,000**SPACIOUS SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY**POPULAR LOCATION**THREE BEDROOMS**AMPLE LIVING SPACE**MODERN KITCHEN**GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY**LARGE REAR GARDEN**EXCELLANT TRANSPORT LINKSPinkmove are delighted to offer this lovely three bedroom semi-detached family home si"
STYLISH AND MUCH IMPROVED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED HOME IN AFON VILLAGE *Much improved detached family home *Three bedrooms *Stunning high-spec kitchen *Good sized lounge *Converted garage now dining room *Ground floor WC *Ensuite to bedroom 1 *Lovely enclosed low-maintenance garden *Walki...
**NEW-BUILD 3 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME**. The Webster features an open-plan kitchen-diner with French patio doors and soft closing cupboards as standard. A spacious reception hallway guides you upstairs where three spacious bedrooms await.
"Enjoy an open-plan kitchen-dining room with French doors leading to the garden, perfect for entertaining your family and friends. When you’re ready to unwind and relax, step into the separate living room. Upstairs you’ll find the master bedroom which benefits from it&"
"The Lansdown with single garage and parking features a kitchen / dining room with French doors leading onto the garden with fitted contemporary kitchen, separate living room and a cloakroom. Upstairs three bedroom, a family bathroom and en-suite to master bedroom. "
"Stunning two bedroom semi-detached home with allocated parking This two-bedroom semi-detached property with allocated parking, features a fantastic open-plan living/kitchen/dining area with a modern, sleek kitchen and French doors leading to the rear garden. There’s also a cloakroom and..."
"Quality doesn't have to be complicated. Sometimes, the simplest things have an undeniable elegance and charm, as you'll discover in the beautifully laid out Letchworth. Simple lines make the most of the space, while inspired designs let the life and light flow freely through the heart of ..."
"*GUIDE PRICE £299,950 - £315,000* SPACIOUS 1900’s SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, 3 RECEPTION ROOMS, KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM, GROUND FLOOR W/C, FRONT & REAR GARDENS & DRIVEWAY*"
"*NO CHAIN!! EXTENDED, 3 BEDROOM, SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH LIVING/DINING ROOM, MODERN KITCHEN, GROUND FLOOR BATHROOM, EASY TO MAINTAIN REAR GARDEN & GARAGE IN THE HEART OF CAERLEON VILLAGE*GUIDE PRICE £299,950-£325,000*"
"*MASSIVE REDUCTION!! NO CHAIN, 3 BEDROOM, DETACHED HOUSE WITH KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, LIVING ROOM, FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM, GARAGE, DRIVEWAY WUTH THE EASIEST OF ACCESS TO JUNCTION 25*"
"Beautiful detached house located in the sought after area of Glan Llyn. This home is located in a quiet residential area along Lydney Walk, which is adjacent to the Twin Ponds that are home to a variety of wildfowl, ideal for taking young children to see the ducklings and goslings. This excellent..."
"*IMMACULATE, 3 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN CONVENIENT LOCATION WITH REFITTED KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, LIVING ROOM, CONSERVATORY, WALK-IN WARDROBE. EN-SUITE, FAMILY BATHROOM, GARAGE, DOUBLE DRIVEWAY & EASILY MAINTAINED REAR GARDEN* GUIDE PRICE £299,950 - £320,000*"
"***BRAND NEW SEMI DETACHED HOME*** Hallway, lounge, kitchen diner, utility, cloaks/wc, 3 bedrooms (master with en-suite, family bathroom, private rear garden, off road parking."
"Are you a first-time buyer? We can help you with our First Time Buyer Boost scheme*
Save when you reserve the Houghton 3-bedroom"
"* GUDIE PRICE £295,000 - £315,000 * DETACHED PROPERTY * GARAGE * LARGE CORNER PLOT * THREE BEDROOMS * WELL PRESENTED * GARDEN * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * ONE BATHROOM * ON STREET PARKING"
**SPACIOUS MID TERRACED PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM **KITCHEN**DOWNSTAIRS CLOAKROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**DRIVEWAY** Pinkmove are delighted to offer this three-bedroom mid-terrace property situated on Preston Avenue in Newport. The property is a short distanc
* DETACHED * THREE BEDROOMS * WELL-PRESENTED * EN-SUITE * BATHROOM * PARKING * QUIET CUL DE SAC * GAREDN
"*NO CHAIN**MODERN PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOM**DETACHED**OFF ROAD PARKING**DOWNSTAIRS WC**EN-SUITE**KITCHEN/DINER**LARGE GARDEN**DRIVEWAY**We are delighted to offer this three bedroom, detached family home situated within a desirable and modern development of Newport. The property is within close proxim"
"Located in the increasingly popular development of Glan Lyn, and sat in a quiet cul-de-sac, this three-bedroom semi-detached property will make for a great first-time-purchase, or family home. This property comprises of large lounge, open planned kitchen diner, utility room and downstairs cloak r..."
"Offers in the region of £290,000. We are delighted to be offering for sale this well presented, Link Detached, three-bedroom family home. The property is approached via a driveway and front garden leading to the main entrance door. Modern and well decorated throughout."
"**GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000**SEMI-DETACHED**THREE BEDROOMS**GARDEN**DRIVEWAY**BASEMENT**OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER**ONE BATHROOM**"
"**GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £310,000**NO CHIAN**SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME**THREE BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**SHOWER ROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM**GARDEN**DRIVEWAY**"
"Guide Price £290,000 to £300.000**WELL PRESENTED SEMI-DETACHED HOME**THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM**MODERN KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**GARAGE AND DRIVE**GOOD ROAD LINKS**We are pleased to offer this three bedroom semi-detached home located on Clevedon Road "
"Wonderful family home in the sought after location of Maesglas. This fantastic home is beautifully presented, and features three good sized bedrooms, an open-plan living/diner and kitchen, a lovely staircase with glass panelling, and a low-maintenance rear garden with decking."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A detached family house offering THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM accommodation in a sought after west side location a brief drive from the M4 and benefitting from stunning views. The property adjoins & overlooks Gaer Fort and further features two reception rooms, ground floor WC, fir..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £310,000**DETACHED**FOUR BEDROOMS**OPEN PLAN LOUNGE/DINER**PRIVATE GARDEN**GARAGE**DRIVEWAY**"
**DETACHED**THREE BEDROOMS**WELL PRESENTED**GARDEN**DOUBLE DRIVEWAY**CLOAKROOM**BATHROOM**ENSUITE**
"A greatly improved, spacious semi-detached Franklin house offering THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM accommodation in a quiet location a brief drive from the city centre and M4 at junction 24. The property further features a double reception room, kitchen, large utility room, ground floor WC, first floor fami..."
"* GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000 * SEMI-DETACHED * THREE BEDROOMS * TWO BATHROOMS * OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER * SPACIOUS LIVING ROOM * DRIVEWAY * GARAGE * GARDEN"
"Guide Price £290,000 TO £300,000 **SPACIOUS TOWNHOUSE**FOUR BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**MODERN KITCHEN/DINER**SECOND RECEPTION ROOM**MASTER EN-SUITE AND FAMILY BATHROOM**OFF ROAD PARKING TO REAR**Pinkmove are delighted to present this beautiful four-bedroom townhouse situated on Jamaica Walk "
" FABULOUS GROUND FLOOR EXTENTION We are delighted to offer for sale this amazing family home. Located in this sought after area close to local amenities, shops and schools. Major road links and the M4 corridor are also within easy reach makin..."
"An attractively presented semi-detached period house offering three bedroom accommodation in this superb location with stunning views to the rear. The property is a short distance from the M4, within excellent school catchment and further features two reception rooms, extended kitchen, ground flo..."
"*BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, 3 BEDROOM TERRACED TOWN HOUSE WITHIN BASSALEG SCHOOL CATCHMENT, SPACIOUS PROPERTY OVER 3 FLOORS, MODERN KITCHEN & UTILITY ROOM, LOUNGE DINER, REFITTED FAMILY BATHROOM & MASTER SHOWER EN-SUITE, GARAGE & LARGE DRIVEWAY*"
Modern executive family home - part exchange available!
"**OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £140,000**** OPEN DAY ON SATURDAY 18TH MARCH 9-12pm - PLEASE CALL TO REGISTER YOUR DETAILS ****MID TERRACE**THREE BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**BATHROOM**REAR GARDEN**ON STREET PARKING**"
### PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE ### NO CHAIN#### Sage and Co are delighted to offer for sale this IMMACULATE THREE BEDROOM DETACHED property in the popular GLAN LYN area. The property has parking for TWO CARS and further benefits from an EN-SUITE and EASILY MAINTAINED GARDENS Situated within ...
"An attractive three-storey, three-bedroom family home, the Saunton has an open-plan kitchen/dining room, a living room and three bedrooms. The top floor bedroom has an en suite. The enclosed porch, downstairs WC, three storage cupboards and off-road parking mean it's practical as well as stylish."
"IMMACULATE & EXTENDED FAMILY HOME IN A SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION, TASTEFULLY DECORATED THROUGHOUT, 3 BEDROOMS, 2 RECEPTION ROOMS, GROUND FLOOR SHOWER ROOM W/C, MODERN KITCHEN & BATHROOM, DRIVEWAY & BEAUTIFULLY LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN*"
"***OFFERS IN THE REGION OF £285,000 *** MR HOMES PRESENTS A PROPERTY RARE TO THE MARKET AND SITUARTED IN A BEAUTIFUL QUIET VILLAGE THIS THREE BEDROOM PROPERTY IS A MUST SEE. THE LOCATION OF THIS PROPERTY IS A PICTUREQIC VILLAGE COMPLETE WITH LOCAL PUBS AND SHOPS, STEEPED IN LOCAL HISTORY W..."
"3 bedroom semi detached family home with garage and off road parking located on the highly sought after Afon Village development in Rogerstone. Excellent road links to the M4, Risca, access to local amenities and schools. Viewing recommended. "
* SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME * FOUR BEDROOMS * LIVING ROOM * EN-SUITE * FAMILY BATHROOM * GARDEN * DRIVEWAY
DOUBLE-STOREY EXTENDED 4 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION *Substantial semi-detached family home *Four bedrooms *Luxury bathroom plus ensuite *Spacious lounge/diner *Additional reception room/study *Impressive kitchen/breakfast area *Driveway *Enclosed rear garden *Walking distanc...
Open House Newport estate agents invite you to view this highly desirable and completely refurbished fabulously presented four bedroom house in Ponthir Village. This lovingly presented home offers contemporary family living in a house that has been brought to the market after an impressive t (cont.)
"The Braunton features a bright open-plan kitchen/dining room with access to the garden and a spacious front-aspect living room, downstairs WC and storage cupboard. Upstairs you'll find two bedrooms and a family-sized bathroom and on the top floor, there’s a spacious bedroom with more fitted storage."
A three-bedroom home with a STUDY and PARKING featuring a living room with FRENCH DOORS leading out onto the garden. A kitchen/dining room with BAY WINDOW and CLOAKROOM. two bedrooms and family bathroom to first floor and An ENSUITE and master bedroom SPANS the second floor for that WOW FACTOR! 
"Parkmans are delighted to offer for sale this highly renovated cottage situated in the village of Bassaleg. The property is well situated to the M4 motorway giving those who commute to the Towns and Cities of Cardiff, Newport, Bristol and Caerphilly excellent access. The very popular Bassa..."
"*NEW PRICE NOW Guide Price £280,000 TO £290,000 *NO CHAIN*NO CHAIN**SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY**HIGHLY DESIRABLE LOCATION**THREE BEDROOMS**SPACIOUS LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM**MODERN KITCHEN**DOWNSTAIRS FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**LARGE DRIVEWAY & GARAGE**Pinkmove are pleased to pre"
"* OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £280,000 * END OF TERRACE * THREE BEDROOMS * OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM * CLOAKROOM * ENSUITE * BATHROOM * GARDEN * GARAGE"
Open Plan Living - Off Road Parking For multiple vehicles - Popular Location - Enclosed Rear Garden - Excellent Transport Links - Close to local amenities
"*GUIDE PRICE £280,000 - £290,000* IMMACULATE, 3 BEDROOM, SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME ON THE POPULAR MON BANK DEVELOPMENT WITH STYLISH KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY ROOM, LIVING ROOM, GROUND FLOOR W/C, EN-SUITE, FAMILY BATHROOM & DRIVEWAY*"
Semi-Detached Town House | Three Bedrooms | Living Room | Kitchen/Dining Room | Conservatory | Reception Room | Store | Family Bathroom | Two En-Suites | Rear Garden | Off Road Parking | WC | Freehold Purplebricks are pleased to offer onto the market this spacious and well-presented three bedroo...
"Large Family Home, a 3/4 bedroom Semi-Detached town house located in Coedkernew. Close to local amenities, comes with an en-suite with a garage and parking!"
"No Chain! A three bedroom, three reception room extended family home located in Glasslwch! New to the market and a perfect family home!"
"A larger style semi-detached house offering three bedroom accommodation at the end of a quiet cul-de-sac in highly sought after Bassaleg, within excellent school catchment and a short drive to the M4. The property has been superbly maintained and further features two reception rooms, attractive k..."
"NO CHAIN - THREE BEDROOM DETACHED HOME REQUIRING SOME UPDATING *Three bedroom detached family home *Useable basement area with own access *Requires some modernisation *Lounge through to dining room *Ground floor WC, first floor bathroom *Driveway *Extended front porch area *Good sized ga..."
"Guide Price £280,000 TO £290,000 **SPACIOUS SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM**CONSERVATORY**KITCHEN**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE**EXCELLENT ROAD LINKS**Pinkmove are delighted to present this modern and spacious three bedroom sem"
Beautifully presented & extended Four Bedroom Terraced House!! NO ONWARD CHAIN!
"Boasting a corner plot on this highly sought after development this fabulous home is beautifully presented and needs to be viewed. Located within easy reach of Newport city centre and major road links, including the M4 corridor this is an ideal location for those looking to commute. Local ameniti..."
THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN ROGERSTONE *No onward chain *Three good sized bedrooms *Through lounge/diner *Ground floor WC *Excellent potential to improve *Lovely enclosed garden *Long driveway and detached garage *Walking distance to amenities *Main road links close by *Mu...
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** The Tailor is a beautiful new home benefitting from side-by-side driveway parking, an open-plan kitchen/dining area with french doors to the rear garden, and an en-suite to bedroom 1. Located approx four miles from central Newport. "
**HMO PROPERTY**GREAT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY**FIVE BEDROOMS**LIVING AREA**LARGE KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM**TWO BATHROOMS**ENCLOSED GARDEN**OFF ROAD PARKING FOR TWO VEHICLES**We are delighted to present this fantastic opportunity to invest in this spacious HMO property in the heart of Newport. The prope
**NO CHAIN** WOW! This unique Semi-detached Period property offers space and character in abundance and the potential to become an impressive family home.
**TERRACE**LOTS OF POTENTIAL**THREE RECEPTION ROOMS**THREE BEDROOMS**GARDEN**GARAGE**DRIVEWAY**
"Moon & Co. are delighted to offer to the market 114 Manor Park, situated within this popular residential location, close to a wide range of amenities. The property itself comprises to the ground floor reception hall, giving access to WC, living room which in turn leads to kitchen/dining room, th..."
***Exceptional Investment Opportunity*** High Yield With Potential For Increase*** Fully Let With Some Long Term Tenants*** HMO 5 Bedrooms***. Set on a desirable centrally located street in the increasingly popular city of Newport is this large recently refurbished to high standard HMO offering h...
"A spacious detached Franklin family house offering three/four bedroom accommodation in a quiet cul-de-sac just off Chepstow Road, a brief drive from the city centre and M4 at junction 24. The property further features a spacious double reception room, modern kitchen, study/bedroom 4, superb famil..."
"This stunning three-bedroom semi-detached property is now for sale. Tastefully renovated by the current owners, this property will be an ideal first-time-purchase or family home. The property itself was originally built circa 1930 and is within close proximity to local schools, shops, pubs, resta..."
NO CHAIN! A Great Sized Four Bedroom Home located in Caerleon. With scenic views overlooking the Usk Valley this home is sure to tick boxes!
"*NO CHAIN*SEMI DETACHED**EXTENDED**THREE BEDROOMS**OPEN PLAN RECEPTION ROOMS**KITCHEN**CONSERVATORY**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**OFF ROAD PARKING**CLOSE TO MANY FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00020418**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this extended, three bedroom, semi detached family home situated within a"
No Onwards Chain - Larger Than Average - Basement - Popular Location - Close to local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links
* SEMI-DETACHED * THREE BEDROOMS * UTILITY * STUDY * EXTENSIVE GARDEN * ON STREET PARKING * CLOAKROOM * ONE BATHROOM
"YOPA is proud to present this Unique Two/Three bedroom Detached bungalow. Available with no chain, located on a huge plot with a huge garden, Drive, detached garage and high spec modernisations please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Newport market. All Offers & Interest Invited"
Chain Free - Bassaleg Catchment Area - Seperate Annex - Multi Generational Living - Four Bedrooms - Two Bathrooms - Sought After Area
* DETACHED * TWO BEDROOMS * DRIVEWAY * GARAGE * GARDEN * UTILITY * ONE BATHROOM * LIVING ROOM * KITCHEN/DINER
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A unique opportunity to acquire a semi-detached property in superb plot within the heart of sought after Caerleon village, in excellent school catchment and a short drive from the M4. The property offers two bedroom accommodation as well as first floor bathroom, two reception r..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** Situated approximately four miles from central Newport, and 40 minutes' drive from Bristol, the Tailor features an OPEN-PLAN kitchen dining area with a separate front-facing lounge, an EN-SUITE to master bedroom plus FAMILY bathroom."
"**NEW-BUILD 3 BEDROOM HOME**OPEN FRONT ASPECT** A brand new 3 bedroom end-link home on this popular new development. Accommodation comprises; hallway, cloaks/wc, lounge, kitchen/diner, 3 bedrooms (bedroom 1 with en-suite), family bathroom/wc, 2 off road parking spaces, private rear garden."
"** Three Bedroom, Duplex Apartment ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Study/ Office Space ** Rear Garden ** Modern Fitted Kitchen with vaulted ceiling ** Period Features **"
"YOPA is proud to present this substantial three bedroom, semi-detached property on a private gated development in Duffryn. The property boasts a rear garden, a driveway and garage. Please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Newport market. All Offers & Interest are Invited."
"Guide Price £270,000 - £290,000. Hathways are delighted to be offering for sale this well presented, detached, three-bedroom family home.  "
"Isla-Alexander Property Experts are proud to present to market this superbly located, traditional bay fronted home. The internal accommodation is split over two levels and is the perfect example of a period conversion, with versatile living space this could be a three/four-bedroom home."
"**IMMACULATELY WELL PRESENTED**END TERRACE**THREE BEDROOMS - MASTER EN SUITE**LOUNGE DINER**GENEROUS KITCHEN**CONSERVATORY**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED GARDEN, GARAGE AND OFF-ROAD PARKING**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A WIDE RANGE OF FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00011673**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this b"
"A Modern and Elegant newly built home located in the sought after location of Glan Llyn! Three bedrooms, Two receptions rooms plus more, not one to miss out!"
"Guide Price £190,000 to £200,000  **NO CHAIN**MID LINK PROPERTY**TWO BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM**KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**DRIVEWAY**Pinkmove are delighted to present this two bedroom property, situated on Dockwell Terrace, Station Road in Llanwern. On"
"This traditional three bedroom semi-detached home has been well laid-out with busy family life in mind, yet carries bags of untouched potential to really open up and express yourself in a new home for a new chapter"
A well presented Three Bedroom Detached home. Benefiting from a Garage and Driveway this home in Coedkernew is sure to tick boxes!
"Extended 4 bed semi detached family home situated in this highly sought after residential area. Excellent road links to the M4, bypass to Cwmbran, Pontypool, amenties & schools. The property has a double storey extension with integral garage, off road parking to front & rear garden."
"The Danbury is an ergonomic three-bedroom home with a good-sized living room, an open-plan kitchen/dining room and plenty of useful storage space on both floors. Upstairs there are three spacious bedrooms - one is en suite - a family bathroom."
"NO CHAIN - STUNNING THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME IN SOUGHT AFTER GLAN LLYN *Sought after Glan Llyn location *Three bedrooms *Ground floor WC, first floor bathroom & ensuite *Finished to a superb standard throughout *Lots of upgrades *Impressive kitchen with integrated appliances *Enc..."
Substantial 3 storey 6 bedroom HMO investment property. Located just off Caerleon Road in Newport. Local amenities and motorway links. Fully tenanted. Potential to convert back to residential. Viewing recommended. 
"*SPACIOUS, 3 DOUBLE BEDROOM, TERRACED HOUSE WITH LIVING ROOM, DINING ROOM, KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM, UTILITY AREA, STUDY/OFFICE, FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM & TANDEM DOUBLE DRIVEWAY (4 CARS)*"
"*NO CHAIN!! 3 DOUBLE BEDROOM, END LINK HOUSE WITH KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, LIVING ROOM, UTILITY ROOM, W/C, EN-SUITE, FAMILY BATHROOM, GARAGE, DRIVEWAY WITH EASY ACCESS TO JUNCTION 25 & 26 OF THE M4*"
"Situated in a highly desirable, convenient location just outside Newport city centre is this very large, traditional family home offering spacious, characterful & well presented accommodation throughout whilst further benefiting from excellent transport links to Bristol, Cardiff & surrounding..."
"Popular residential area. Exceptionally well presented. 3 double bedroom semi detached family home. Fantastic road links to the M4 and bypass to Cwmbran, Pontypool. Access to local amenities, schools and bus route to the city centre. Viewing highly recommended."
"Fantastic five-bedroom family home in the sought-after area of St Julians. This excellent property features five good sized bedrooms including a loft conversion with an ensuite, two reception rooms, a spacious kitchen, and a low-maintenance rear garden."
SUPERBLY PRESENTED AND EXTENDED BUNGALOW *Highly sought after location *Set in beautiful gardens *Single garage *Spacious lounge with central fireplace *Extended fitted kitchen/dining room with French doors to garden *Two double bedrooms *Attractive Bathroom with feature tiling *UPVC dou...
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - An EXTENDED family house offering three bedroom accommodation at the end of a quiet cul-sac in sought after and convenient Malpas, a short drive from the M4 and city centre. The property further features two spacious double reception rooms, large side & rear gardens, uPVC d..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £265,000 TO £275,000**DETACHED**THREE BEDROOMS - MASTER EN SUITE**KITCHEN**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**GARAGE AND OFF-ROAD PARKING**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A WIDE RANGE OF FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00001931**Pinkmove are delighted to offer thi"
*SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY *FOUR BEDROOMS *GARDEN *OFF ROAD PARKING *WELL PRESENTED
BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FOUR BEDROOM TOWNHOUSE NEAR TO AMENITIES *No onward chain *Four bedrooms *Stylish kitchen/diner *Two bathrooms plus ground floor WC *Very versatile living accommodation *Enclosed rear garden *Off road parking *Walking distance to amenities *Main road links close by ...
No Onwards Chain - Recently Decorated Throughout - Larger Than Average - Permit Parking - Attic Conversion - Open Plan Living - Close to City Centre - Excellent Transport Links
"Wonderful three-bedroom semi-detached house in a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought after location of Bassaleg. This excellent family home features three good sized bedrooms, an open-plan living/ dining room, a downstairs WC, and a garage and off-road parking."
"A superbly EXTENDED and improved semi-detached house offering three good size bedroom accommodation in this sought after family close to Pye Corner train station, the M4 and within excellent school catchment. The property further features a stunning open plan family kitchen & sitting/dining r..."
"The Lambourne home with PARKING featuring a living room with FRENCH DOORS leading out onto the garden. A SEPARATE fitted kitchen / dining and CLOAKROOM completes the ground floor. There are THREE bedroom upstairs, an EN-SUITE to the master and family bathroom. Help to Buy - Wales scheme available."
"Three Bedroom Semi-Detached House with Double Driveway! Situated in the very desirable Jubilee Park estate, Rogerstone! Modern through out & still under NHBC warranty!"
SPACIOUS 4 BEDROOM TOWNHOUSE IN POPULAR LOCATION NEAR TO AMENITIES *Mid-terraced townhouse *4 bedrooms *Kitchen/diner *Full-width lounge *Ground floor WC *Family bathroom plus ensuite to bedroom 1 *Newly installed combination boiler *Detached garage and driveway *Rear garden *No onward c...
NO CHAIN .RECENTLY RENOVATED AND MODERNISED VERSATILE 3/4 BEDROOM TOWN HOUSE SITUATED ON THE POPULAR WEST SIDE OF NEWPORT SET WITHIN MANAGED COMMUNAL GROUNDS GARAGE AND PARKING SOUGHT AFTER SCHOOLS LOCAL AMENITIES EXCELLENT M4 MOTORWAY LINKS FOR COMMUTERS VIEWING ESSENTIAL 
Off Road Parking - Extended Semi Detached - Two Reception Rooms - Conservatory - Close to local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links - Popular Location - Seconds away from M4
"NO CHAIN - 2 Bedroom terraced house in a popular location. This property boasts good size accommodation and is ideal for first time buyers, second time buyers or even investors.
An extended three story property located approximately half a mile from Newport City Centre. The property does require..."
"An opportunity to own a BRAND NEW three bedroom modern town house in a private, secure mews development in the city centre, set off the sought after Llanthewy Road, West side location. Prepare to be impressed with accommodation over three floors"
Off Road Parking - Rear Extension - Two Bathrooms - Landscaped Garden - Convenient Location - Excellent Transport Links - Open Plan Living Space
Family Home - Three Bedrooms - Attic Conversion - Popular Location - Excellent Transport Links - Close proximity to City Centre - Modern Throughout
Three Bedroom Detached Property in Rogerstone! Bassaleg School Catchment! No Onward Chain!
"** REDUCED NOW Guide Price £260,000 TO £270,000****BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS**MASTER EN SUITE**LOUNGE DINER**MODERN FITTED KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOM**GROUND FLOOR WC**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE PARKING**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A WIDE RANGE OF F"
"GUIDE PRICE £260,000-£270,000! Larger than average family home split over Four Floors with! Located close to many local amenities and ideal for commuting!"
"GUIDE PRICE £260,000-£270,000! No Chain! Impressive Semi-Detached! A Well improved, Three Bedroom, Three Reception Room home located close to many local amenities with schools a short distance away. Perfect for commuting!"
"Set on a large plot located on Aberthaw Road is this Three Bedroom, Two bathroom, two reception room semi-detached family home. No Onward Chain and Parking for Multiple Cars!"
No Onwards Chain - Four Bedroom - Two Bathrooms - Enclosed Rear Garden - Close to local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links
"***BRAND NEW 3 BEDROOM HOME*** Hallway, lounge/Diner, kitchen, ground floor cloaks/wc, 3 bedrooms (en-suite to principal bedroom), family bathroom, private rear garden, off road parking. call us now for further information."
"Perfectly designed with you in mind, The Lawrence is the ideal size for someone starting their journey on the property ladder or for someone looking to downsize. This home has everything you need in from the separate kitchen featuring soft closing doors, to an open plan living diner perfect"
"Well presented 3 bedroom semi in this popular location on the edge of Caerleon. This family home features refitted bathroom and modern kitchen/breakfast room with sunny aspect garden, driveway and garage. "
"*NO CHAIN!! 2 BEDROOM, SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH LIVING/DINING ROOM, KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM, UTILITY ROOM, MODERN BATHROOM, GARAGE & DRIVEWAY*"
"*SPACIOUS & VERSATILE 3 DOUBLE BEDROOM TOWNHOUSE WITH KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, LIVING ROOM, EN-SUITE, FAMILY BATHROOM, GOOD SIZE REAR GARDEN, GARAGE & DRIVEWAY PARKING WITH EASY ACCESS TO JUNCTION 28 OF THE M4*"
"*3 BEDROOM, SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH LIVING/DINING ROOM, KITCHEN, UTILITY ROOM & W/C, FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM, LOVELY GARDENS & GARAGE WITH EASY ACCESS TO JUNCTION 24 OF THE M4"
NO CHAIN. This newly renovated 4 bedroom terraced property stretches over 3 floors and is perfect for a family. This property is next to a range of local amenities and is a short drive to Newport Retail Park and A48.
"*NO CHAIN!! SPACIOUS, 3 BEDROOM, SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH 2 RECEPTION ROOMS, EXTENDED KITCHEN/DINER, FIRST FLOOR SHOWER ROOM, LARGE REAR GARDEN, LONG DRIVEWAY & GARAGE* "
No Onward Chain - Three Bedrooms - En-Suite - Downstairs WC - Located in the sought after area of Glan Llyn - Off Road Parking
No Onwards Chain - Immaculately Presented - Summer House in Garden - Sought after Location - Off Road Parking - Downstairs WC - Excellent Transport Links
"* DO NOT MISS OUT - EXTENDED FAMILY HOME! * Sage & Co are delighted to offer FOR SALE this FIVE bedroom, SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY in a popular location overlooking Risca Town Centre, offering PANORAMIC VIEWS across the surrounding countryside and with easy access to local schools, main bus rout..."
"**SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION**EXCELLENT SCHOOLS**IDEAL FAMILY HOME** Parkmans are pleased to present this lovely property, situated in the sought-after area of Bassaleg, close to local amenities, excellent transport links and access to excellent local schools. The property benefits f..."
STYLISH THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME *Stylish semi detached home *Three bedrooms *Full-width lounge *Modern fitted kitchen *Ground floor WC *Family bathroom plus ensuite to bedroom 1 *Lovely remodelled garden *Parking to the side *Walking distance to amenities *Main road conne...
No Onwards Chain - Immaculately Presented - Sought after Location - Off Road Parking - Downstairs WC - Excellent Transport Links - Three Bedroom - Ensuite
**NO CHAIN**3 BEDROOMS**SEMI-DETACHED**OFF ROAD PARKING**FIRST FLOOR SHOWER ROOM**GOOD SIZE REAR GARDEN**WALKING DISTANCE TO PYE CORNER RAILWAY STATION**WITHIN 1 MILE OF THE M4 MOTORWAY**EASY ACCESS TO NEWPORT CITY CENTRE**
"**Guide Price £260,000-£270,000** An extended Three Bedroom, Semi Detached home with off road parking and Three Reception Rooms!"
Off Road Parking - End Terrace - Attic Conversion - Modern Throughout - Popular Location - Excellent Transport Links - Close to Local Amenities
"*BEAUTIFULLY RENOVATED THROUGHOUT, 3 BEDROOMS, SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH CONTEMPORARY KITCHEN & BATHROOM SUITE, OPEN-PLAN LIVING/DINING/FAMILY ROOM, DRIVEWAY, GOOD SIZE LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN WITH EASY ACCESS TO JUNCTION 25 & 26 OF THE M4*"
"SPACIOUS, 3 BEDROOM LINK-DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH MODERN KITCHEN OPENING INTO DINING AREA, LOUNGE, BEAUTIFULLY LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN, PARTIALLY CONVERTED GARAGE & DRIVEWAY, FANTASTIC MOTORWAY ACCESS*"
"* OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £270,000 * MID-TERRACE * FOUR BEDROOMS * THREE RECEPTION ROOMS * FAMILY BATHROOM * YARD * ON STREET PARKING"
"A Modern executive detached family home, well presented throughout. On the highly desirable Glan Lynn development"
"* GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000 * SEMI-DETACHED * THREE BEDROOMS * WELL PRESENTED * ENSUITE * DOWNSTAIRS CLOAKROOM * GARDEN * DRIVEWAY"
**SEMI-DETACHED**THREE BEDROOMS**SUPERB VIEWS**GARAGE**QUIET CUL DE SAC**BASEMENT**GARDEN**ONE BATHROOM**BASEMENT SHOWER ROOM**
Off Road Parking - Four Bedrooms - Two Bathrooms - Low Maintenance Garden - Larger than Average - Close to local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links - Popular Location
"£250,000 - £260,000 - An attractively improved semi-detached period house offering three bedroom accommodation in this highly sought after, convenient residential location a brief drive from the M4 and within walking distance of the city centre train station. The property further feat..."
"* GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000 * SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME * THREE BEDROOMS * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * FAMILY BATHROOM * ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN * ON STREET PARKING"
"Fabulous family home boasting a corner plot and lovely views. Located close to local amenities, shops and schools this beautiful property is also within easy access of major road links and the M4 corridor making it ideal for those looking to commute. Please take a look around the video tour w..."
"OFFERS IN THE REGION OF £250,000. HATHWAYS are delighted to offer for sale three-bedroom, semi-detached house situated in the highly sought-after area of Caerleon. With a sizeable corner plot and huge potential this property is an ideal family home."
"A House to Make A Home! Plenty of Potential! This Four Bedroom, Three Reception Room terraced home located on Morden Road, being offered with No Chain will not stay around long!"
Mon BankDevelopment - Off Road Parking - Three Bedrooms - Popular Location - Close to Local Amenities - Modern Throughout
This Semi-detached property is located in the increasingly popular development of Glan Llyn. The property itself is within walking distance to Glan Llyn Primary school and a lakeside park and play area. It's also a stone's through away from Newport Spytty Retail and leisure park and the M4 corrid...
"*RENOVATED COTTAGE IN THE HEART OF CAERLEON VILLAGE, 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, 2 RECEPTION ROOMS, STYLISH KITCHEN & BATHROOM WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN*"
"*NO CHAIN* RETAIL UNIT & SPACIOUS LIVING ACCOMMODATION WITH 3 GOOD SIZE BEDROOMS, MODERN KITCHEN, 2 RECEPTION ROOMS, GROUND FLOOR BATHROOM, FIRST FLOOR SHOWER ROOM WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO NEWPORT CITY CENTRE*"
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - An attractive bay-fronted period house offering three bedroom accommodation in this superb location a brief walk from Beechwood Park and a short drive from the M4 at junction 24. The property further features two reception rooms, first floor bathroom, uPVC double glazed windows..."
A Stunning 4 Bedroom End of Terrace Town House split over Three Floors Located in a Mews Complex in Coedkernew. The currently owners of the property have modernised it allowing the new owner to move straight in! The property further benefits from a garage and off road parking
"**GUIDE PRICE £250,000 TO £260,000***NO CHAIN*END TERRACE**FOUR BEDROOMS**WELL PRESENTED**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**FITTED KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOM**GREAT SIZED REAR GARDEN**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A WIDE RANGE OF FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**IDEAL FOR COMMUTING**REF#00014372**Pinkmove are delighted "
3 Self Contained Flats - No Onwards Chain - Sold With Sitting Tenants - City Centre Location - Walking Distance to Train Station
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A truly exceptional, highly spacious period house offering superbly presented FOUR BEDROOM accommodation over three storeys in this highly convenient location a brief drive from the M4 and within walking distance of the city centre train station. The property further features t..."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A deceptively spacious EXTENDED end-terraced cottage offering three bedroom, two bathroom accommodation in sought after fire Allt-yr-yn, within walking distance of Ridgeway beauty spot, the city centre and a brief drive from the M4. The property further features two reception r..."
BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED AND UPDATED THREE BEDROOM HOME *Beautifully presented throughout *Impressive open plan kitchen *Three bedrooms *Stylish family bathroom *Ground floor WC *Enclosed rear garden *Two off road parking spaces *Walking distance to excellent amenities *Main road connection...
"*NO CHAIN! EXTENDED, 3 BEDROOM END TERRACE HOUSE WITH KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, SITTING ROOM/BEDROOM 4, LIVING ROOM, FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM, TIERED GARDEN IN SOUGHT AFTER CAERLEON AREA*"
"*STUNNING, EXTENDED, REFURBISHED, 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM HOUSE WITH MODERN OPEN PLAN LIVING/KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, GROUND FLOOR W/C, EN-SUITE SHOWER ROOM, FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM, GARDEN ROOM/OFFICE/GYM & NO ONWARD CHAIN*"
"*NO CHAIN! 3 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE IN QUIET LEVEL LOCATION WITH LIVING/DINING ROOM, FIRST FLOOR SHOWER ROOM, LARGE REAR GARDEN, GARAGE & DRIVEWAY*"
**3 BEDROOMS**SEMI-DETACHED**NO ONWARD CHAIN**GARAGE WITH SERVICE PIT**ADDITIONAL OFF ROAD PARKING**FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM**GROUND FLOOR WC**EASE ACCESS TO RISCA TOWN CENTRE**LESS THAN 1 MILE TO RISCA TRAIN STATION**ONLY A SHORT DISTANCE TO THE M4 MOTORWAY**
"NO CHAIN!! STYLISH, 3 BEDROOM, END TERRACE HOUSE WITH LIVING/DINING ROOM, KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM, GROUND FLOOR W/C, EN-SUITE, FAMILY BATHROOM, EASILY MAINTAINED REAR GARDEN & 2 ALLOCATED PARKING SPACES*"
"A Well Maintained, Newly Built home located on Lysaght Village. This Three Bedroom, Three Story semi-detached home is not one to skip past. Call early and move in before Christmas*"
" Available with no ongoing chain a beautifully decorated UPVC double glazed, gas centrally heated three bedroom semi-detached property situated on Swan Crescent in the modern development of Lysaght Village. It is conveniently placed for commuter routes to the M4 and close to local shops and amen..."
"NEW PRICE NOW Guide Price £245,000 TO £255,000**WELL PRESENTED SEMI-DETACHED**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**MASTER EN-SUITE**LIVING ROOM**KITCHEN DINER**FAMILY BATHROOM**DOWNSTAIRS W.C.**DRIVEWAY**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN*Pinkmove are pleased to offer this three double bedroom, semi-detached home l"
"THREE BEDROOM HOME WITH GARAGE IN SOUGHT AFTER GLAN LLYN *Three bedroom terraced home *Garage and off road parking *Ground floor WC, first floor bathroom & ensuite *Lounge *Modern fitted kitchen/diner *Enclosed rear garden *Set back off the road *Walking distance to excellent amenities &..."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A stylishly improved and extended semi-detached house offering three/four bedroom accommodation in this exceptionally convenient location a very short drive from the M4 at junction 25. The property further features incredible views over Caerleon, double reception room, sitting ..."
**SPACIOUS DETACHED DORMA BUNGALOW WITH PANORAMIC VIEWS** Sage and Co are pleased to offer FOR SALE this TWO BEDROOM DORMA BUNGALOW set in Risca with fabulous views overlooking the BRISTOL CHANNEL and a short distance from the M4. This property has been extended by the present owne...
"An exceptionally well presented three bedroom town house situated in a highly sought after location close to Tredegar House, Asda Supermarket and within easy access to the M4 corridor. The property benefits from newly landscaped rear garden and has an integral garage. Viewing highly recommended."
A superb opportunity to acquire a substantial period property currently used as a ground floor business unit (longstanding hairdressers) and first floor residential apartment with parking at the rear. The property offers investment potential in its current layout but also as two residential units...
"Representing a unique opportunity to acquire a move-in ready semi-detached property on the outskirts of the vibrant Newport, this home is ideal for any house hunter looking for a stress-free move into a highly desirable location. With no redecoration required, this attractive home will provide a..."
"*STYLISH, EXTENDED, 3 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING/LIVING ROOM, MODERN BATHROOM, PORCH, GARAGE & DOUBLE DRIVEWAY* "
"YOPA is proud to present this renovated and extended Three/Four Bedroom Semi-detached property in Newport. With a refurbished kitchen, side extension, and south-facing garden, please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Newport market. All Offers & Interest are Invited."
"Excellent three-bedroom family home in the sought after area of Woodland Park. This fantastic home offers three good sized bedrooms, an open-plan living/ diner, a fitted kitchen, a loft room, and a low-maintenance rear garden."
"Impressive renovation! A Three Bedroom, renovated Semi-Detached home located on Chaucer Road in Newport"
"**GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000**SEMI DETACHED**THREE BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**FAMILY BATHROOM**GARDEN**DRIVEWAY**"
YOPA is proud to present to the market this four-bed mid-terrace property in the heart of Newport city centre. The property is within walking distance of public transport and local amenities. Please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant market. All interest and offers are invited.
"*REDUCED NOW Guide Price £240,000 TO £250,000**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM**MID TERREACE**LIVING ROOM**SITTING ROOM**FITTED KITCHEN DINER**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A WIDE RANGE OF FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**PUBLIC TRANSPORT LINKS**REF#00019139**Pinkmove are delig"
A Beautifully Presented Three Bedroom Three Floor Town House. With the property being split over three floors each room is a generous size and could make an ideal family home. Located on Lysaght Village the property is within close proximity of local amenities and commuting links!
"*Guide Price £240,000 TO £250,000**NO CHAIN**SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY** THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM** KITCHEN DINER**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**GARAGE AT REAR & DRIVEWAY**Pinkmove are delighted to present this semi-detached property situated on College Glade in the beautiful vi"
"An exceptionally spacious FOUR BEDROOM period property. This charming four storey property features two well-proportioned ground floor reception rooms with large double glazed windows, galley kitchen, utility room and WC, generous basement rooms, first floor bathroom, uPVC double glazing through..."
"**REDUCED NOW Guide Price £240,000 TO £250,000****BEAUTIFUL SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME**THREE BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**FIRST FLOOR FAMILY BATHROOM**LARGE ENCLOSED GARDEN**FANTASTIC LOCATION WITH LOCAL SHOPS AND TAKE AWAYS ON YOUR DOORSTEP**CLOSE TO LOCAL SCHOOLS**PUBLIC TRANSPORT LI"
* MID TERRACE FAMILY HOME * FOUR BEDROOMS * LIVING ROOM * KITCHEN/DINER * UTILITY ROOM * FAMILY BATHROOM * GARDEN * ON STREET PARKING
* END-TERRACE * THREE BEDROOMS * KITCHEN * LOUNGE/DINER * FAMILY BATHROOM * GARDEN * OFF-ROAD PARKING
"An excellent size semi-detached house offering three bedroom accommodation in highly sought after Bassaleg, within excellent school catchment annd and a short drive from the M4. The property further features a ground floor WC, first floor bathroom, uPVC double glazing and gas combination central ..."
Town House - Three Bedrooms - Off Road Parking - No Onwards Chain - Excellent Transport Links - River Views
"Guide Price £240,000 to £245,000 **NO CHAIN**END TERRACE**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS**SPACIOUS LOUNGE/DINER**KITCHEN**BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this three bedroom end terrace home located in Caerleon. The property is located in the hear"
"* GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000 * TOWNHOUSE * THREE STOREY * TWO/THREE BEDROOMS * GARDEN * UTILITY * DRIVEWAY * GARAGE * CLOAKROOM * ENSUITE BATHROOM *ENSUITE SHOWER ROOM"
*SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME * THREE BEDROOMS * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * STYLISH KITCHEN * MODERN FAMILY BATHROOM * GARDEN * DRIVEWAY
"We are proud to present this Mid Terrace House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £240,000 - £265,000*"
"An EXTENDED semi-detached period house offering three bedroom accommodation in this popular and convenient location just off Chepstow Road, a brief drive from the M4 and city centre. The property further features two reception rooms, uPVC double glazed conservatory, extended kitchen, first floor ..."
"*Freehold on Completion* - An Extended Three Bedroom, Two reception room home located in the sought after area of Malpas. This home comes to the market with a loft room and off road parking! No Onward Chain!"
A most impressive four bedroom property situated off Corporation Road close to all the local amenities and transport links to both Cardiff and Bristol. Recently refurbished with no expense spared. Enclosed private rear gardens. Modern open plan kitchen/dining area. An early inspection is highly r...
EXTENDED FOUR BED!! Does the idea of a newly refurbished house sound good to you? Take a look at this superb four bedroom available with NO CHAIN!!
**EXCELLENT FAMILY HOME/FIRST TIME BUY WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN** Parkmans are delighted to offer for sale this good size semi-detached family home with no onward chain. The property offers well appointed and presented living accommodation comprising of three bedrooms and first floor bathro...
"*RENOVATED, 3 BEDROOM, SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH LIVING/DINING ROOM, REFITTED KITCHEN, CONSERVATORY, UTILITY AREA, REFITTED BATHROOM, GARAGE, SOLAR PANELS & NO ONWARD CHAIN*"
"*WELL PRESENTED, EXTENDED, 3 BEDROOM, SEMI DETACHED HOUSE IN POPULAR & CONVENIENT LOCATION WITH KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY ROOM, LIVING ROOM, REFITTED BATHROOM, LARGE WORKSHOP WITH POWER & LIGHTING, DRIVEWAY AND EASY ACESS TO JUNCTIONS 24 & 28 OF THE M4*"
"*Guide Price £235,000 - £240,000 *EXCELLENT 3 BED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE WITH PARKING, GENEROUS SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN WITH LARGE CONSERVATORY IN POPULAR WEST SIDE LOCATION*"
"*NO CHAIN* MODERN DEVELOPMENT, CONVENIENT LOCATION CLOSE TO THE M4 MOTORWAY, 3 BEDROOMS, SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH DOUBLE DRIVEWAY, PERFECT FOR A GROWING FAMILY*"
"This two bedroom bungalow, with no onward chain is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac with large front and rear gardens and magnificent views looking over Newport and the surrounding areas."
"Guide Price £235,000 to £240,000 **NO CHAIN***BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED**END LINK PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS**MASTER EN-SUITE**LIVING ROOM**KITCHEN/DINER**CLOAKROOM**BATHROOM**OFF ROAD PARKING**Pinkmove are delighted to present this beautifully presented three bedrooms end link home situated o"
"The Gainsborough is great STARTER HOME featuring a living room with FRENCH DOORS leading onto the garden, fitted CONTEMPORARY style kitchen / dining room with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and CLOAKROOM. There is are two bedrooms and a family bathroom. Help to Buy - Wales scheme available. READY FOR 2023!"
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - Situated in sought after Allt-yr-yn, a short drive from the M4 and benefitting from stunning views over ""Little Switzerland"" to the rear, a THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM family house. The property further benefits from two reception rooms, kitchen with utility area, first floo..."
"A modern semi-detached house offering superb THREE BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM accommodation in a quiet, convenient development a short drive from the M4 and city centre. The property further features a double reception room, stylish kitchen, ground floor WC, excellent size side & rear gardens, two..."
"* GUIDE PRICE £230,000 - £240,000 * SEMI DETACHED * THREE BEDROOMS * THREE RECEPTION ROOMS * UTILITY * CLOAKROOM * FAMILY BATHROOM * GARDEN * DRIVEWAY"
"Dramatically priced to sell. This excellent investment opportunity, situated in a prominent location on Corporation Road amongst a variance of amenities within easy access of Newport City centre a contemporary café/diner/ fish and chip takeaway & duplex apartment generating 1000pcm."
"GUIDE PRICE £230,000 to £240,000. HATHWAYS are delighted to offer for sale this substantial three bedroom semi-detached house in Newport."
"GUIDE PRICE £230,000 TO £240,000 Sarah Walters is proud to present to market this three bedroom home in a convenient location in Malpas. So many highlights including modern kitchen diner, lounge, conservatory, ground floor WC. The list goes on, book today!"
"GUIDE PRICE £230,000 TO £240,000 Offering the same square footage as 3 beds. This generous two double bedroom home is immaculately presented, you can move straight in. With kitchen/diner, large rear garden and off road parking it ticks boxes. Easy access to city centre and M4."
Open House Newport estate agents invite you to view this extended and highly desirable mid-link three bedroom house in the Malpas area of Newport. Live here if you want to be close to three popular primary schools. Live here if you want excellent transport links to Bristol & Cardiff. Live he (cont.)
Hybrid Living! A Three Bedroom House with a self contained apartment! Double Garage - Local within close proximity of Newport City Centre!
No Onwards Chain - Sought After Location - Off Road Parking - Quiet Cul de Sac - Excellent Opportunity - Close to local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links
"**New Price now Guide Price £230,000 TO £240,000** *WELL PRESENTED HOME**SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS**LOUNGE/DINER**KITCHEN**CONSERVATORY**MODERN FAMILY BATHROOM**DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE**Pinkmove are pleased to present this lovely three bedroom semi-detached property situated on "
"Offering exceptional potential, a traditional bay-fronted period house in this sought after location a brief drive from the M4 and a short walk from the city centre train station & Ridgeway beauty spot. The property further features three bedrooms, two reception rooms, pleasant gardens and dr..."
No Onwards Chain - Garage - Off Road Parking - Three Bedrooms - Excellent Transport Links - Convenient Location - Close Access to M4
"**LARGE 3 BEDROOM PROPERTY**NO ONWARD CHAIN* MODERN INTERIOR** We are pleased to offer for sale this well presented 3 bedroom mid-terraced home located in a sought after location in Newport. The home is conveniently situated within a very short distance away from schools, shops and public transp..."
"*NO CHAIN!! EXTENDED, 3 BEDROOM HOUSE WITH EXTENDED KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM, LIVING/DINING ROOM, WOOD BURNER, GROUND FLOOR SHOWER ROOM, BATHROOM & GARAGE WITH EASY ACCESS TO JUNCTION 25 OF THE M4*"
"*SPACIOUS, EXTENDED, 3 BEDROOM COTTAGE IN HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION WITH LIVING/DINING ROOM, KITCHEN WITH GRANITE WORKTOPS, FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM & EASY TO MAINTAIN COURTYARD*"
"*SPACIOUS SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME, 3 BEDROOMS, MODERN KITCHEN, LOUNGE, DINING ROOM, BATHROOM, DRIVEWAY, GARAGE, TIERED REAR GARDEN WITH BEAUTIFUL VIEWS OVER THE RIVER USK & CAERLEON VILLAGE WITH EASY ACCESS TO JUNCTION 25 OF THE M4*"
"Perfectly proportioned, the Alnmouth has a stylish open-plan kitchen/dining/living room. It features flexible first-floor rooms, a good-sized family bathroom, handy storage cupboards and parking. Ideal if you are a first-time buyer looking for a fresh modern home you can make your own."
"Guide Price £225,000 - £235,000 Guide Price Three Bedrooms * Semi Detached * Garage * Off road Parking* Kitchen / Diner* No Chain*"
"Bassaleg Bungalow! No onward chain. This Two bedroom, extended recently modernised bungalow located in Bassaleg is not one to miss out on!"
"Stunning, Very Spacious, Fully Renovated to a High Specification & Perfect for all family living, desires & needs is this Large 3 Storey, Modern, Town house. Conveniently Located just outside Newport city centre close to all local amenities, schools, shops & leisure facilities it further ..."
"Excellent three-bedroom family home or investment opportunity in a popular location close to the city centre with plenty of amenities close by. This lovely home offers three double bedrooms of which two have ensuite bathrooms, two spacious reception rooms, a modern-fitted kitchen, and off-road pa..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £225,000**LAND**DEVELOPMENT OF 4 DWELINGS**PLANNING PERMISSION GRANTED**"
"**IMMACULATELY WELL PRESENTED**THREE BEDROOMS**TERRACE**LOUNGE DINER**FITTED KITCHEN**BATHROOM**SHOWER ROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**CLOSE TO FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00019678**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this immaculately well presented, three bedroom, mid terrace family home situated within"
No Chain! A Three Bedroom semi-detached home located in Bassaleg! With scenic views to the rear and garage to the front this is a house to make a home
"*NO CHAIN! SPACIOUS, 3 DOUBLE BEDROOM HOUSE WITH 3 RECEPTION ROOMS, L SHAPED KITCHEN, GROUND FLOOR BATHROOM, ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN WITH EASY ACCESS TO JUNCTION 25 OF THE M4*"
"*NO CHAIN!! MODERN, 3 BEDROOM, SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH LIVING/DINING ROOM, KITCHEN, GROUND FLOOR W/C, FIRST FLOOR SHOWER ROOM, MULTIPLE PARKING WITH EASY ACCESS TO JUNCTION 25 OF THE M4*"
* SEMI-DETACHED * THREE BEDROOMS * GARDEN * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * WELL-PRESENTED * ONE BATHROOM * SUPERB VIEWS
"Perfect for commuter's this three bedroom mid terraced property in a popular location with links to the M4. This modern property is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac. There is a fitted kitchen with integral electric oven and gas hob, with space for a washing machine and space for a fridge/freez (cont.)"
"**GUIDE PRICE £220,000 - £230,000**END OF TERRACE**THREE STOREY**FOUR BEDROOMS**PARKING**GARDEN**OPEN PLAN LOUNGE/DINER**TWO BATHROOMS**"
"A stunning two bedroom duplex apartment benefitting from a high-specification £40,000 upgrade in this beautiful, historic building a short walk from the city centre train station and a brief drive from the M4. The grade II listed building features incredible communal spaces and lift while t..."
No Onwards Chain - Off Road Parking - Sought After Area - Front and Rear Gardens - Close to Local Amenities - Great Transport Links
"A beautifully finished three bed semi-detached home located in the highly sought-after suburb of Malpas. Thoughtfully designed for family life, this home has been completed to an exacting standard and is a true hidden gem for the discerning home hunter"
"**GUIDE PRICE £220,000-£230,000**END-TERRACE**THREE BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**UTILITY ROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM**GARDEN**ON STREET PARKING**"
NO CHAIN - SPACIOUS SEMI DETACHED HOME IN ROGERSTONE *Spacious semi detached family home *Rogerstone location *Three good sized bedrooms *Ground floor bathroom *Two good sized reception rooms *Kitchen (requiring updating) *Large enclosed garden with rear access *Modern gas combi boiler *...
"Set in a renovated Victorian house in a top-notch location, No.15 The Beeches is a lofty, New York-style penthouse apartment just a stone's throw away from the bustling culture of Newport"
"* GUIDE PRICE £220,00 - £230,000 * * MID TERRACE * TWO BEDROOMS * KITCHEN/DINER * LIVING ROOM * GARDEN * ALLOCATED PARKING"
"YOPA is proud to present this Three bedroom semi-detached property in the popular locality of Malpas. With a modern kitchen, two good-sized gardens, a detached garage, and a driveway, please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Newport market. All Offers & Interest are Invited."
"This three bedroom semi detached home that's been lovingly modernised by the current owners and is ready to move into. In the popular location of ST Julians, walking distance to Glan Usk Primary school and also is easy access to the M4 for Bristol and Cardiff and ample shops and amenities close by."
**NO CHAIN**SEMI-DETACHE**THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**KITCHEN**LARGE UTILITY AREA**BATHROOM**REAR GARDEN**OFF ROAD PARKING**Pinkmove are delighted to present this lovely three bedroom semi-detached property situated on Waltwood Park Drive in Llanmartin. The property is located on a quiet residentia
"Three Bedroom Semi Detached Property,Converted Refitted Kitchen, Lounge, Converted garage offering Additional Living Space of a Dining room or Playroom, Three Bedrooms, Bathroom, Front & Rear Gardens, Driveway parking for Multiple Vehicles, No Onward Chain"
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Semi Detached House Two Bedroo...
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - An EXTENDED semi-detached bay fronted house benefitting from superb large gardens and offering two (formerly three) bedroom, two bathroom accommodation at the end of a quiet cul-de-sac a brief drive from the M4 and a short walk from the city centre train station. The property f..."
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - An attractive well proportioned period house located just a few minutes walk from the train station and offering spacious THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM, bathroom, two reception room accommodation with family kitchen breakfast-room. The property in located on Newport's sought after w..."
Three bedroom semi detached house with wonderful views
**SEMI-DETACHED**3 BEDROOMS**GROUND FLOOR WC AND FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM**ORIGINAL WOOD BLOCK FLOORING**LOVELY FAMILY HOME**ONLY A SHORT DISTANCE TO RISCA TOWN CENTRE**LESS THAN 1 MILE TO THE TRAIN STATION**WITHIN 3 MILES OF THE M4 MOTORWAY**GOOD ACCESS TO SCHOOLS**
"**IDEAL FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION** Sage and Co are pleased to offer FOR SALE this THREE BED SEMI DETACHED family home set in the sought after village of ROGERSTONE close to local amenities including Newport City Centre, highly regarded schools (Bassaleg School catchment), health centr..."
"** Three Bedroom Semi-Detached Family Home with Single Garage & Drive.** Located in the Gaer, Newport, NP20 ** NO ONWARD CHAIN **"
Three Bedroom Detached Family House with Modern Fitted Kitchen & Single Garage
"**NO CHAIN**Guide Price £210,000 to £220,000****WELL PRESENTED**END TERRACE**THREE BEDROOMS**LOUNGE/DINER**FITTED KITCHEN**CONSERVATORY**LARGE FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A WIDE RANGE OF FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this deceptiv"
"*NO CHAIN* IMMACULATELY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME WITH GARAGE *Immaculately presented semi detached home *Sought after St. Julians location *Three bedrooms *Modern first floor bathroom *Lounge through to dining room *Beautiful, enclosed, low maintenance garden *Driveway ..."
"MOVE STRAIGHT IN! IMMACULATELY presented, This THREE bed terraced property with twin BAY WINDOWS to the FRONT is an IDEAL FIRST HOME that has been RECENTLY refurbished throughout. ***NO ONWARD CHAIN***"
"GUIDE PRICE £210,000-£220,000! A spacious Three Bedroom, Semi-Detached Home. Open Plan Kitchen/Diner. Recently updated throughout. Large Driveway and Gardens"
"A Fully Renovated extended, Three Bedroom, Bay fronted home located in the sought after area of St Julians. A Large rear garden and off-road parking!"
A spacious three bedroom end terrace home that is being marketed with a sitting tenant in the heart of Newport City Centre. INVESTORS ONLY
"What a beautiful home! Let us take you inside this superbly presented three bedroom semi-detached property, positioned in an extremely sought after location."
"Three-bedroom family home in a great location just around the corner from Newport City Centre. This excellent home features three good sized bedrooms, two reception rooms, and a fitted kitchen."
"**GUIDE PRICE £210,000 - £220,000**NO CHAIN**TERRACED**THREE BEDROOMS**LARGE RECEPTION ROOM**OPEN PLAN KITCHEN DINER**ENCLOSED GARDEN**OFF ROAD PARKING**HIGHLY CONVENIENT LOCATION**REF#00016300**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this three bedroom semi-detached style terraced family home s"
"**Asking Price £210,000****SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY**POPULAR LOCATION**THREE BEDROOMS**LOUNGE DINER**KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOM**REAR GARDEN**CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES**GOOD ROAD LINKS**Pinkmove are pleased to present this three bedroom semi detached property situated on Gaer Park Drive in Newport."
End Terrace - Three Bedrooms - Family Home - Two Reception Rooms - Off Road Parking-Popular Location - Close to Local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links
"Guide Price £210,000 TO £220,000 **IDEAL FIRST HOME**END LINK PROPERTY**TWO BEDROOMS**MASTER EN-SUITE**LOUNGE**KITCHEN**CONSERVATORY**DOWNSTAIRS WC**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**TWO ALLOCATED PARKING SPACES**Pinkmove are please to present this lovely two bedroom home situated o"
"Excellent three-bedroom semi-detached house in a quiet area on Aberthaw Circle. This lovely family home features three double bedrooms, an open plan living/ dining room and kitchen, off-road parking with a carport, and a low-maintenance rear garden with stunning views overlooking Newport."
"**FANTASTIC THREE BEDROOM HOUSE IN BEECHWOOD WITH SUPERB VIEWS ACROSS THE CHANNEL AND CITY!** Comprising lounge, large open plan fitted kitchen/dining room with appliances, three bedrooms, family bathroom with shower, large mature gardens..................."
Five Bedrooms - Two Reception Rooms - Kitchen Diner - Rear Garden - Hard Standing to Rear - Three Storeys - Excellent Transport Links - Popular Location - City Centre Location.
"A semi-detached house offering three bedroom accommodation in a quiet cul-de-sac within sought after Malpas, a short drive from the M4 and city centre. The property further features two reception rooms, first floor bathroom, uPVC double glazing, level gardens and double width driveway."
Looking for the perfect First Time Buy? Three Bedroom House with off road Parking & Enlarged Plot!
Semi Detached - Two Bedrooms - Driveway - Garage - Multiple Reception Rooms - Bags of Potential - Popular Location - Excellent Access to M4 motorway - Close to local amenities - Walking distance to Local School
" 4 BEDROOMS We are delighted to offer for sale this spacious family home. Located close to local amenities, schools and shops. Major road links are also within easy reach making it an ideal location for those ..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this spacious family home with fabulous views over Newport . Located within easy access of local amenities, shops, schools and the Royal Gwent Hospital. The property is also within easy reach of major road links and the M4 corridor making it ideal for those l..."
"*ALL OFFERS CONSIDERED!! EXTENDED, 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH LIVING/DINING ROOM, KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, GROUND FLOOR BATHROOM, FIRST FLOOR SHOWER ROOM, GOOD SIZE REAR GARDEN & GARAGE*"
"**NO CHAIN**THREE BEDROOMS**END TERREACE**LIVING ROOM**KITCHEN DINER**BATHROOM**FRONT AND REAR GARDEN**GARAGE**CLOSE TO MANY FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00020438**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this three bedroom, end terraced family home situated within the popular residential area and extremely"
* SEMI DETACHED * THREE BEDROOMS * RECEPTION ROOMS * SHOWER ROOM *SUBSTANTIAL GARDEN * PARKING
"Guide price £200,000 to £220,000. Hathways are delighted to offer for sale this three-bedroom, terraced, house. Benefiting from a garage and Caerleon Village location. Within the catchment area of popular primary and secondary schools, this property is an ideal family home."
"**GUIDE PRICE £200,000 TO £210,000**MID TERRACE PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**LOG BURNING STOVE**KITCHEN DINER**FIRST FLOOR FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED LOW MAINTENANCE REAR GARDEN**CLOSE TO MANY FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00021160**Pinkmove are delighted to present this"
"NO CHAIN. Spacious mid terraced family home located in this sought after residential area off Caerleon Road. Walking distance to Caerleon Road shops. Easy access to local schools, city centre and excellent road links to the M4. Great family home and viewing is highly recommended. "
The Magnolia is a two-bedroom apartment over garage with SINGLE GARAGE and PARKING featuring an OPEN PLAN living / kitchen / dining space - a great space for entertaining. There are two bedrooms with an EN-SUITE to master bedroom. Help to Buy - Wales scheme available. 
**WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT * GARAGE AND DOUBLE DRIVEWAY *GOOD LOCATION *PANORAMIC VIEWS *COME AND HAVE A LOOK AROUND!!* Sage & Co are delighted to offer FOR SALE this THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY set in a quiet cul de sac location overlooking Risca Town Centre offering panoramic...
"** SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY** **NO ONWARD CHAIN** Sage and Co are pleased to offer FOR SALE this TWO BED SEMI DETACHED house set in the sought after village of ROGERSTONE close to local amenities including Newport City Centre, highly regarded schools (Bassaleg School catchment), health..."
"This most impressive ground floor apartment has been tastefully refurbished throughout. Benefitting from two double bedrooms, shower room, kitchen/breakfast room and formal lounge. Delightful enclosed mature gardens with mature shrubs, decking area and useful storage shed. Ideally located in the ..."
"A Three Bedroom, Mid terraced home located in a small cul-de-sac not far from Risca town"
"Well presented 3 bedroom semi detached family home with front / side / rear gardens with off road parking for numerous vehicles. Excellent road links to the M4 Cardiff, Bristol, walking distance to the local primary school, access to local amenities, Newport Velodrome, Sports Village and Spytty R..."
"*No Chain* A Three Bedroom, Open Plan Kitchen/Living/Diner. Recently Modernised home. With off road parking for multiple vehicles located in St Julian's. Located close to plenty of local amenities"
"A modern semi-detached house offering two bedroom accommodation in a quiet cul-de-sac within excellent school catchment a brief drive from the M4. The property further features an attractive reception room, kitchen diner, first floor bathroom, front & rear gardens and double length driveway."
"Flying Keys are delighted to bring to market this very beautifully presented and recently modernised, spacious two bedroom detached Bungalow situated in the extremely sought after location of Risca. "
**3 BEDROOMS**FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM**GROUND FLOOR WC**ATTIC ROOM**SPACIOUS LOUNGE**WALKING DISTANCE TO THE TRAIN STATION**CLOSE TO RISCA TOWN CENTRE**NEAR TO THE A467 GIVING GOOD ACCESS TO THE M4 MOTORWAY**NO CHAIN**
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A superb modern house offering two double bedroom accommodation in this exceptionally sought after, quiet location within excellent school catchment and a short drive from the M4. The property comprises hall, living room, kitchen breakfast-room, two first floor bedrooms and bat..."
*BACK ON MARKET DUE TO CHAIN COLLAPSE*BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED MID LINK PROPERTY**TWO BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**KITCHEN**CLOAKROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE**CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES**Pinkmove are pleased to present this two bedroom mid link property situated on Aberthaw 
"A spacious refurbished two bedroom apartment situated in a highly sought after location in Ponthir village. The apartment has undergone significant works which include new kitchen, shower room, roof, fascias and soffits, and new outside staircase. The apartment benefits from ample parking and sin..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £190,000 TO £200,000**NO CHAIN**COTTAGE STYLE TERRACE**THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTIONS**KITCHEN**BATHROOM**ENCLOSED GARDEN**CITY CENTRE LOCATION**REF#00020220**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this deceptively spacious, three double bedroom, cottage style terrace prope"
"**END TERRACE**BEAUTIFULLY WELL PRESENTED**TWO BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**FITTED KITCHEN DINER**BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**ALLOCATED PARKING**CLOSE TO FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00016291**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this beautifully well presented, two double bedroom, end terrace family home"
**TERRACED**THREE BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**KITCHEN**BATHROOM**ENCLOSED GARDEN**ON ROAD PARKING**CLOSE TO FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**PUBLIC TRANSPORT LINKS**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this well presented and spacious three bedroom terraced family home situated within a popular residential a
EXCELLENT DETATCHED BUNGALOW**LEVEL PLOT**QUIET LOCATION**FREEHOLD TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS**CONSERVATORY**FITTED KITCHEN**ENCLOSED LOW MAINTANACE FRONT AND REAR GARDENS**DETACHED GARAGE ON WESTMOOR CLOSE**CHAIN FREE**A MUST SEE**BOOK TO VIEW TODAY TO AVOID DISSAPOINTMENT. A great opportunity to own ...
"A spacious period house offering THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM accommodation with first floor bathroom in this highly convenient location off Chepstow Road, a brief drive from the M4 and city centre. The property further features a double reception room, dining room, kitchen, uPVC double glazing, gas comb..."
Off Road Parking - Larger than Average - Modern Kitchen - Modern Bathroom - Close to local Amenities - Seconds from M4
"RECENTLY MODERNISED! Guide Price - £190,000 - £200,000
A Larger than average Three Bedroom Mid-Terraced property located just off Cardiff Road. No Chain! Call early to avoid disappointment!!"
"**GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £ 200,000**IMMACULATELY WELL PRESENTED**DESIRABLE LOCATION**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM MID TERRACE**LIVING ROOM**KITCHEN DINER**BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**OFF ROAD PARKING**REF#00018498**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this immaculately well presented, two double be"
Mid Terraced Family Home | Three Bedrooms | Lounge | Dining Room | Kitchen | Family Bathroom | Private Rear Garden | On Street Parking | No Onward Chain | Updating Required This is a perfect project to a confident DIYer who is looking to get stuck into a property that needs some modernisation in...
**END OF TERRACE**TWO BEDROOMS**ON STREET PARKING**GARDEN**DOWNSTAIRS CLOAKROOM**NEWLY RENOVATED**
THE PERFECT PROJECT!! Are you looking for a house that you can turn into your own? Then stop looking!
"Cosy 2-bedroom, mid-terraced house in a great location. Deceptively spacious inside, offering an ideal home for couple or small family. Perfect for first-time buyers or investors. The property sits in a quiet development next to Tredegar House and is ideally located for transport links to Ne..."
"Guide Price £190,000-£200,000!! A House to Make a Home. This Three Bedroom, Semi Detached home located on East Grove Road would make the ideal project home. Call Early to avoid disappointment"
No Chain! Whether you be a First Time Buyer or a downsizer this Three Bedroom family home located a stone’s throw away from Junction 26 of the M4 Motorway is sure to tick boxes! Bring your furniture and move straight in
"£190,000 - £200,000
This is an excellent opportunity to purchasing a well presented, incredibly spacious two bedroom first floor apartment with a balcony and River Usk views. No Onward Chain"
"*** Situated for EXCELLENT Access to M4 / Severn Bridge for COMMUTING to BRISTOL, CARDIFF and Newport City *** Superb INVESTMENT PROPERTY or First Time Buyers *** MODERN 2 Bedroom Home with CONSERVATORY *** No Chain, EMAIL to VIEW"
"*SPACIOUS, RENOVATED AND REFITTED THREE BEDROOM, MID TERRACE WITH NEW KITCHEN AND BATHROOM, SECOND FLOOR W.C & GENEROUS LOFT AREA IN POPULAR LEVEL LOCATION OFF CROMWELL ROAD*"
End Terrace - Three Bedrooms - Lovely Family Home - Two Reception Rooms - Popular Location - Close to Local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links - Great size rooms
"A larger than average, extended family home located on Marlborough Road. Benefitting from Two reception rooms and an enclosed rear garden. Located minutes from Newport town centre and commuting links"
"Spacious four-floor terraced house with plenty of space that would make for a fantastic family home. This lovely home offers three good sized bedrooms including a loft room, a spacious living/ dining room, a modern kitchen and a low-maintenance rear garden with decking. Don't miss out on this exc..."
"Whether or not you be a First Time Buyer, Downsizer or you are looking for an investment this home may be for you! A Two Bedroom Mid Terraced Home located in a gated commuting"
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A deceptively spacious semi-detached house offering three bedroom accommodation in a highly convenient location a brief drive from Newport city centre and the M4 at junction 24. The property further features a spacious reception room, kitchen breakfast-room, first floor shower ..."
Generous Sized Terraced located minutes from Junction 24 of the M4 Motorway and close to plenty of local amenities. Benefiting from Three Double Bedrooms and off road parking for two vehicles!
MODERN DEVELOPMENT**DECEPTIVLEY SPACIOUS**OPEN PLAN LOUNGE DINER**MODERN FITTED KITCHEN**TWO BEDROOMS**GROUND FLOOR WC**FAMILY BATHROOM**LEVEL ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN** OFF ROAD PARKING FOR TWO CARS**QUIET LOCATION**EASY ACCESS TO CITY CENTRE**EXCELLENT ROAD NETWORKS** Conviently located just outsi...
"**GUIDE PRICE £180,000 - £190,000**SEMI-DETACHED**THREE BEDROOMS**DOWNSTAIRS BATHROOM**GARDEN**ON-STREET PARKING**"
"No Chain!! - Features of this three bedroom property include brand new kitchen and bathroom, spacious through lounge/diner, plus two double bedrooms and a single on the first floor. A low maintenance garden is to the rear. An ideal first time buy or investment."
"**TWO BEDROOM HOUSE ON POPULAR MALPAS ROAD, ONE MINUTE FROM M4 FOR EASY COMMUTING TO BRISTOL AND ONWARDS** Comprising two lounges, spacious kitchen, two bedrooms, good sized bathroom, private garden, walking distance to city centre, £850 PER MTH achievable rent offer excellent investment opp..."
"Check out this two bedroom apartment overlooking the river. A beautifully presented home offers a modern fitted kitchen / lounge plus a balcony offering fantastic views. Ticking boxes on space, style and location - Book in today to avoid disappointment"
*NO CHAIN* - SPACIOUS AND STYLISH MAISONETTE NEAR TO AMENITIES *No onward chain *Spacious and versatile maisonette *Three bedrooms *Two reception rooms *Superb kitchen *Luxury bathroom *Individually accessed via own door *Small courtyard garden *Walking distance to amenities *Major road ...
"GUIDE PRICE £180,000 to £190,000. Hathways are delighted to offer for sale this two bed semi-detached bungalow on a sizeable plot in situated in Lliswerry, Newport."
**LARGER THAN AVERAGE MAISONETTE* MODERN INTERIOR**ALLOCATED PARKING* We are pleased to offer for sale this beautifully presented and modernised 3 bedroom maisonette located in a very sought after location in Newport. The home is conveniently situated within a very short distance away from schoo...
"Guide Price £180,000 TO £190,000**NO CHAIN**REFURBISHED PROPERTY**WELL PRESENTED MID TERRACE PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**MODERN KITCHEN**DINING ROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM**Pinkmove are delighted to present this lovely three bedroom terraced property situated on Archibald Street in "
"YOPA is proud to present this Two bedroom, end terrace property in the popular village of Lysaght. The property has parking for two cars and is in good modern condition throughout. Please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Newport market. All Offers & Interest are Invited."
* SEMI-DETACHED * THREE BEDROOMS * OPEN PLAN LOUNGE/DINER * CONSERVATORY * BATHROOM * GARDEN * ON STREET PARKING
"Guide Price £180,000 TO £190,000 **INVESTMENT PURCHASE ONLY**SOLD WITH SITTING TENANTS**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS**MASTER EN-SUITE**LIVING ROOM**KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM**FAMILY BATHROOM** REAR GARDEN**GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY** We are pleased to present this lovely two bedroom terraced property sit"
"YOPA is proud to present this Fantastic Investment Opportunity. This Three Bedroom Property is split into two flats, Nearby Newport City Centre, Easy M4 Access & recently refurbished. Please enquire early to avoid disappointment in This Buoyant Newport Market. All Offers & Interest are Invited."
"**SEMI DETACHED**THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**KITCHEN DINER**MODERN BATHROOM**CONSERVATORY**LARGE REAR GARDEN**EXCELLENT ROAD LINKS**CLOSE TO AMENITIES**REF#00021459**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this three bedroom, semi detached family home situated just off the Southern Distributor Road, and ha"
"INVESTORS ONLY | DUPLEX APARTMENT | Three Bedrooms | Living Room | Fitted Kitchen | Family Bathroom, En-Suite Shower Room & Cloakroom | Rear Garden | Parking Space | Partly UPVC Double Glazed | Gas Central Heating | No Chain | Currently Let at £825.00 Per Month"
CASH BUYERS ONLY - A large end of terrace property that was previously Three apartments. The property was two 1 bedroom flats and a studio flat. The property requires modernisation throughout. Rental figures achievable once renovated would be £550 per one bedroom and £500 for the studio
"Immaculately presented 2 bedroom home in Duffryn, Newport. Modern property offering convenient living, located in a quiet cul de sac with driveway this home is perfect for first time buyers. Excellent road links for the M4 and A48. Call now to arrange a viewing."
"No Onward Chain - A Four Double Bedroom, Mid-Terraced home with off-road parking within close proximity of Newport town Centre and great commuting links!"
"Ideal first-time home in the sought-after area of St. Julians. This family home features three good sized bedrooms, a spacious living room, a spacious fitted kitchen/ diner, and a low-maintenance rear garden. This property is sure to be popular!"
"*RENOVATED, 3 BEDROOM, MID TERRACE HOUSE IN POPULAR EAST SIDE LOCATION WITH SPACIOUS LIVING ROOM, KITCHEN, UTILITY ROOM, FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM, FRONT & REAR GARDENS WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN*"
An immaculately presented Mid terrace home
"Kingston Newell are pleased to offer a semi detached cottage within catchment area of Bassaleg school and close to local village amenities. Two bedrooms, one family bathroom and a fully fitted kitchen. Access links to the M4. In need of updating and modernisation. Driveway for two vehicles."
"An attractively improved, spacious period house offering three bedroom accommodation in this highly convenient location off Caerleon Road, a short drive from the M4 and city centre. The property is within walking distance of excellent local shops, amenities & Glebelands park and further featu..."
"Just off Chepstow Road, this house would make an excellent family home. This three-bedroom semi-detached house has plenty of potential to make this the perfect home for you. The house features a spacious kitchen, an open plan living/ dining room, a driveway, low-maintenance garden, and fantastic ..."
"No Chain!! A larger than average Three Bedroom, Two/Three Reception Room mid-terraced home located on Malpas Road. This property is perfect for commuting being a stones throw away from Junction 26 of the M4 Motorway!!"
No Chain! This impressively renovated Three Bedroom mid-terraced home located in Bettws has plenty to offer. Three generous bedrooms!
"This stunning first floor apartment sits in the sought after location of Newport and offers thoughtfully designed spaces that are wonderfully flexible to cook, entertain and relax"
"This excellent terraced house offers a well-proportioned reception room, a fitted kitchen/diner, a utility room, a shower room, three sizeable bedrooms and a three-piece bathroom. The home also boasts front and rear gardens and on-street parking. This home presents a fantastic opportunity for pro..."
No Onwards Chain - Modern Throughout - Off Road Parking - Popular Locations - Close to local amenities - Excellent Transport Links
"Outstanding Renovation! This Three Bedroom, Mid-Terraced home has been renovated throughout by the current owners creating a move in ready property!"
* TERRACED * THREE BEDROOMS * EXTENSIVE GARDEN * DRIVEWAY * SUPERB POTENTIAL
"**GUIDE PRICE £175,000 - £180,000**MID-TERRACE**TWO BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**SHOWER ROOM**GARDEN**ON STREET PARKING**"
HOME SWEET HOME!! A spacious three bedroom terraced home with additional loft room and garage with no onward chain!!
ASPEN HOUSE a two-bedroom SECOND FLOOR apartment with PARKING featuring an OPEN PLAN living / kitchen / dining space with a Juliet balcony - a great space for entertaining. There are two bedrooms with an EN-SUITE to master bedroom. Help to Buy - Wales scheme available. 
"Modern Two Bedroom Apartment, located on the top floor of the apartment complex in Selskar Court with direct river views and surrounding views over Newport!"
"Well presented 3 bedroom terrace property located in Bettws, Newport. * No upper chain * Consisting of: Well-appointed kitchen with base and wall units and breakfast area Open-plan, bright and airy lounge / dining room with feature fireplace in the lounge area <..."
"Attention all home seekers! Are you looking for a stunning three bedroom maisonette that boasts style, comfort and breath-taking views? Look no further! "
LAUREL HOUSE a two-bedroom FIRST FLOOR apartment with PARKING featuring an OPEN PLAN living / kitchen / dining space with a Juliet balcony - a great space for entertaining. There are two bedrooms with an EN-SUITE to master bedroom. Help to Buy - Wales scheme available. 
360 VIRTUAL TOUR - An extended bay-fronted period house offering two double bedroom accommodation in this popular and convenient river side location a brief walk from the city centre & train station and a short drive from the M4. The property further features a double size open plan living ro...
"No Chain! A generously sized Two Double Bedrooms, one large single bedroom, family home. Located minutes from Junction 26 of the M4 motorway. Further benefiting from a driveway located at the rear with space for 2/3 vehicles"
ASPEN HOUSE a two-bedroom FIRST FLOOR apartment with PARKING featuring an OPEN PLAN living / kitchen / dining space with a Juliet balcony - a great space for entertaining. There are two bedrooms with an EN-SUITE to master bedroom. Help to Buy - Wales scheme available. 
"No Onward Chain! A house to make a home, this Three Bedroom, Three Reception room mid-terraced home located in Malpas is sure to tick boxes!"
"GUIDE PRICE £170,000-£175,000! A well presented Two Bedroom Mid Terraced property located in a Gated Development within Coedkernew. Being sold with a tenant in Situ paying £775 per month"
"Well presented three bedroom semi detached family home with good access to local amenities and located just minutes away from the M4 motorway providing excellent transport links to Cardiff and Bristol. No onward chain, off street parking, viewing advised."
"Freehold Investment Shop -split over approximately 3468 SqFT over five floors. With Huge Potential - Currently on FRI Lease to The Card Factory at £10,000 p.a - On prime high street location"
"Spacious end of terrace property with no onward chain, located close to excellent transport links and local amenities. Comprising of porch, entrance hallway, two reception rooms, one of which has potential for a third bedroom, kitchen, two double bedrooms, large family bathroom, enclosed rear gar..."
"*PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS OR INVESTORS* 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM END LINK HOUSE IN A QUIET CUL-DE-SAC WITH LIVING ROOM, KITCHEN, CONSERVATORY, REFITTED FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM, PRIVATE REAR GARDEN & DRIVEWAY*"
"A stylishly improved, extended terrace offering two double bedroom accommodation in this very convenient location close to the M4 and a short walk from the train station and city centre. Hallway, spacious living area, modern kitchen, utility room, two first floor bedrooms and stylish bathroom. uP..."
ASPEN HOUSE a two-bedroom GROUND FLOOR apartment with PARKING featuring an OPEN PLAN living / kitchen / dining space - a great space for entertaining. There are two bedrooms with an EN-SUITE to master bedroom. Help to Buy - Wales scheme available. 
"A house to make a home! Glan Usk Primary School catchment. Deceptively spacious Three bedroom, Two reception room family home located in St Julians!"
Three Bedrooms - Mid Terrace - City Centre Location - Close to Local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links - Walking Distance to Riverside
"*NO CHAIN! WELL PRESENTED, 4 BEDROOM MID TERRACED HOUSE WITH KITCHEN, FULL WIDTH LOUNGE/DINER, BATHROOM & CLOAKROOM, FORECOURT & REAR GARDEN, THREE MILES FROM JUNCTION 27 OF THE M4* "
No Onwards Chain - Off Road Parking - Convenient Location - Bags of Potential - Excellent Transport Links - Close to Local Amenities
WELL PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION *Traditional bay-fronted family home *Three bedrooms *Potential to improve *Two reception rooms *Beautiful mature rear garden *Modern gas combination boiler *Walking distance to excellent amenities *Major road links close by *I...
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN! SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION! ** Sage & Co are pleased to offer FOR SALE this TERRACED PROPERTY situated in Pontymister just a short walk from RISCA TOWN CENTRE, doctors surgery and TRAIN STATION offering fantastic travel links to the M4 for those commuting to Bristol, Newpo..."
"** GOOD SIZE FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION** Sage & Co are pleased to offer for SALE this GOOD SIZE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME set within the popular location of Risca, close to local amenities including schools, doctors surgery and local transport links. This property com..."
"GUIDE PRICE £160,000-£165,000! Two Double Bedroom, Extended end of terrace home located a stone’s throw from plenty of local amenities!"
**IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS**MID TERRACE PROPERTY**TWO BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM**KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES**GOOD TRANSPORT LINKS**Pinkmove are pleased to present this lovely two-bedroom mid terrace property situated on Conway Road in Newport
"A three bedroom mid terrace home in Pill, NP20 is being offered with no onward chain. Located within walking distance to Newport City Centre, easy access to the southern distributor road and close to supermarket"
Isla Alexander are pleased to welcome this two bedroom home in the heart of Newport's city centre. Two reception rooms and a first floor bathroom. Potential to adapt to a three bedroom. In need of refurbishment to restore into a family home or a great buy to let investment.
"**GUIDE PRICE £160,000 TO £170,000**MID TERRACE**TWO BEDROOMS**DINING ROOM**LIVING ROOM**FITTED KITCHEN**BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**CLOSE TO FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00007222**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this well presented, two double bedroom, mid terrace family home situa"
Bay Fronted Character Property - City Centre Location - On Street Parking - Two Reception Rooms - Close to local amenities - Excellent Transport Links
Three Bedrooms - Two Reception Rooms - Excellent Transport Links - Close to Local amenities - Popular Location - River Walk nearby - Close to public park - Easy commute to Newport town centre
 NO ONWARD CHAIN Purple Bricks are delighted to offer for sale this lovely home which is perfect for first time buyers. Located in this popular area of Newport close to all local amenities. Major road links and the M4 corridor...
No Onwards Chain - Ground Floor Apartment - Off Road Parking - Sought After Location - Walking Distance To Caerleon Village - Excellent Transport Links
"*Guide Price £160,000 TO £170,000**MID TERRACE**THREE BEDROOMS**IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY**FITTED KITCHEN**GENEROUS RECEPTION ROOM**BATHROOM**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**OFF ROAD PARKING**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A WIDE RANGE OF FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00014531**Pinkmove a"
"GUIDE PRICE £160,000-£170,000! No Onward Chain - Three Bedrooms - Modern Kitchen - Modern bathroom - Close to local amenities - Ideal for commuting"
"3 Bedrooms, No chain, Cul-de-sac, Great potential to renovate, Searches available upfront, Good transport links"
"**Guide Price £160,000 to £170,000**NO CHAIN**SPACIOUS THREE STOREY TERRACED HOME**PRIME LOCATION OF COMMUTERS**THREE BEDROOMS**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**KITCHEN**BATHROOM AND SHOWER ROOM**ENCLOSED TIERED REAR GARDEN**REF#00018815**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this spacious, three bedroom,"
**WELL PRESENTED**READY FOR YOU TO MOVE STRAIGHT IN**THREE BEDROOM MID-TERRACED HOME**LOUNGE/DINER** KITCHEN**BATHROOM**GOOD SIZED REAR GARDEN**EXCELLENT TRANSPORT LINKS**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this lovely three bedroom mid-terraced house situated on Britten Close in Newport. It has excelle
"*REDUCED NOW Guide Price £160,000 TO £170,000*NO CHAIN**MID TERRACED PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**KITCHEN DINER**LARGE REAR GARDEN**BATHROOM**CLOSE TO LOCAL SCHOOLS AND AMENITIES**PRIME LOCATION**Pinkmove are delighted to present this spacious three bedroom terraced property si"
"YOPA is proud to present to the market this renovated three-bed, mid-terrace property in Newport. Conveniently situated within walking distance to Newport city centre, local amenities, schools, shops, and access to the M4. Please enquire early to avoid disappointment. All Offers & Interest Invited."
"GUIDE £160,000 TO £170,000 Sarah Walters is proud to present this GROUND floor apartment on a popular development along the river front, open plan living space with modern fitted kitchen, bathroom and en-suite. 2 double bedrooms, balcony & parking."
"GUIDE PRICE £160,000-£165,000!!! A house to make a home, A Three Bedroom Terrace Home available with NO CHAIN!"
**NO CHAIN**RECENTLY RENNOVATED**MID TERRACE FAMILY HOME**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS**MODERN BATHROOM**BRAND NEW KITCHEN**LOW MAINTENANCE REAR GARDEN**READY TO MOVE IN NO WORK NEEDED** PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS**We are pleased to present this well presented two double bedroom mid terrace family home si
"A great house in a cul de sac location on the popular Celtic Horizon development. The accommodation comprises lounge, fitted kitchen with integral appliances, two bedrooms and a family bathroom. The property further benefits from gas central heating, Uvpc double glazing and integral garage with p..."
"*NO CHAIN!! SPACIOUS, 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM, GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT WITH OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING/LIVING ROOM, EN-SUITE, PATIO AREA, 2 ALLOCATED PARKING & LOVELY RIVERSIDE WALKS*"
"Property located in Gold Tops, Newport"
SPACIOUS THREE STOREY HOME WITH THREE BEDROOMS CLOSE TO CITY CENTRE *No onward chain *Spacious three storey property *Impressive 7m x 5m lounge/diner *Three bedrooms and first floor bathroom *Good sized kitchen *Additional accommodation on the lower ground level *Enclosed rear garden *Wa...
"A House to Make a Home! Generous Sized Mid Terraced home located in Bettws. Three good sized bedrooms, a dual aspect lounge with a large kitchen. Best of all...No Onward Chain!!"
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. Brand new 1, 2, 3 and 4 bed luxury apartments with castle views in Newport city centre. Show Apartment Available!! Prices from £120,000 to £200,000"
"***FOR SALE BY ONLINE TRADITIONAL AUCTION*** POTENTIAL DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY***
Spacious property with plenty of potential in the popular location of Maindee. This four bedroom home offers open-plan living, a loft-conversion, off-road parking, side access and a rear garden that is approximately..."
"*WATCH THE VIDEO* STYLISH, 2 BEDROOM, GROUND FLOOR DUPLEX APARTMENT IN THE BEAUTIFUL OLD ARTS COLLEGE WITH OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING/LIVING AREA WITH BEAUTIFUL VIEWS OVER THE RIVER USK, EN-SUITE, BATHROOM, ALLOCATED PARKING, INTERCOM ENTRY & LIFT*"
Sold via Modern Method Of Auction (Tcs & Cs apply) Buyer paid fee. Exciting opportunity for development. Current commercial unit with APPROVED PLANNING PERMISSION for a detached three storey four bedroom house. REF 20/0205. Application Granted 07/07/2020. Off road parking for several cars. C...
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - Boasting stunning river views, this superb, stylish apartment offers two bedroom accommodation in a highly convenient location a brief drive from the M4 and city centre. The property features a spacious double reception room, modern kitchen, white bathroom and allocated & g..."
No Onwards Chain - Two Bedrooms - Upstairs Bathroom - Convenient Location - Close to City Centre - Excellent Transport Links
"PUBLIC NOTICE 189 Malpas Road Newport NP20 5PP We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £151,500 Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts takes place EPC Rating:D"
"**GUIDE PRICE £150,000 TO £160,000***NO CHAIN***TERRACED*THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**KITCHEN DINER**BATHROOM AND WC**ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN**SOLAR PANELS**CLOSE TO FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00019584**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this spacious, three bedroom, terraced family home si"
"A well presented two bedroom, top floor apartment located in the sought-after location of Celtic Horizons. Being offered with No Onward Chain!"
"Guide Price £150,000 TO £160,000 **NO CHAIN**THREE BEDROOMS**MID TERRACE HOUSE**KITCHEN**LOUNGE/DINER**LARGE GARDEN TO REAR **AMPLE ON STREET PARKING**GOOD TRANSPORT LINKS** Pinkmove are delighted to present this lovely three bedroom mid terrace property situated on Tamar Close in N"
End of Terrace - Two double Bedrooms - Living / Dining Room - Convenient Location - Excellent Transport Links - Close to local Amenities
"* GUIDE PRICE £150,000-£160,000 * GROUND FLOOR FLAT * TWO BEDROOMS * LOUNGE/DINER * KITCHEN * BATHROOM * COMMUNAL GARDEN * ALLOCATED PARKING"
Two Bedrooms * Ground Floor * Garage* Off Road Parking* Great Location* Close to Local amenities* Being Sold with Sitting Tenants* Can be Bought as block of 4 *
Two Bedrooms * First Floor * Garage* Off Road Parking* Great Location* Close to Local amenities* Being Sold with Sitting Tenants* Can be Bought as block of 4 *
*NO CHAIN* A Recently Renovated and Modernised Two Bedroom Mid-Terraced home located close to plenty of local amenities. An Ideal home for commuting also!
No Onwards Chain - Mid Terrace - Three Bedrooms - Popular Location - Close to local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links
* TERRACED * TWO BEDROOMS * LOUNGE/DINER * ONE BATHROOM * GARAGE * LOTS OF POTENTIAL GARDEN**
Two Bedroom Apartment with Off Road Parking & Stunning Views of the River Usk!
Modern & Stylish Two Bedroom Apartment with Master En-Suite & Parking! NO ONWARD CHAIN
Modern Property - Off Road Parking - Enclosed Garden - Sought After Location - Close to Local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links
Recently Refurbished - No Onwards Chain - Off Road Parking - Convenient Location - Close to local amenities - Excellent Transport Links
Two bedroom top floor executive apartment
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - A spacious terrace offering three bedroom accommodation in a highly convenient location a very brief drive from the M4 at junction 24. The property further features a double reception room, good size kitchen, utility room, first floor bathroom, uPVC double glazing and superb la..."
* TERRACE PROPERTY * TWO BEDROOMS * LIVING ROOM * CONSERVATORY * FAMILY BATHROOM * FRONT & REAR GARDENS * GARAGE
"A well presented and well maintained ground flood apartment in the ever popular Newport Riverfront development. Being sold with tenants in situ, this would make an ideal addition to any rental portfolio."
"Ideal first-time buy or investment opportunity in the popular location of Maindee. This family home features three good sized bedrooms, two reception rooms, a low-maintenance rear garden, and convenient travel links to the M4."
"**REDUCED NOW Guide Price £150,000 TO £160,000- NO CHAIN***IDEAL INVESTMENT OR FTB**END TERRACE PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS** LOUNGE**DINING ROOM**KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOM**CITY CENTRE LOCATION**GREAT TRAVEL LINKS**CELLAR**Pinkmove are pleased to present this three bedroom terraced property"
* SECOND FLOOR FLAT * TWO BEDROOMS * ALLOCATED PARKING * ENSUITE *BATHROOM * OPEN PLAN LOUNGE/DINER * BALCONY * RIVERSIDE VIEWS
No Onwards Chain - Modern Throughout - Walking distance to city centre - Excellent Transport links - Multiple Reception Rooms - Enclosed Garden
Offered for sale in a popular location and with vacant possession. This two-bedroom terraced property is ideal for either owner-occupiers or as a BTL investment. 
"**TWO BEDROOM HOUSE OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN** Martin & Co are delighted to offer this modern and generous mid terraced home. Situated on the popular road of Corporation Road, close to all local amenities and transport links. This home offers you two good sized reception rooms, a modern k..."
"No Chain! A Three Bedroom, Open plan living/dining room Mid-Terraced home located in the area of Bettws. An ideal house to turn into a home!"
"We are delighted to offer this fantastic opportunity to develop a spacious property in the heart of newport. The property is ideally located within walking distance to the city centre where you have an array of shops and amenities, as well as newport bus and train station for commuting. "
"River Views!! A Spectacular Two bedroom Duplex Apartment with balcony views overlooking the River Usk and more!! Off Road parking, best of all...No onward Chain"
NO CHAIN - TRADITIONAL THREE BEDROOM END TERRACED HOME REQUIRING UPDATING *No onward chain *In need of refurbishment *Three bedrooms *Two reception rooms *Enclosed rear garden with store sheds *Walking distance to excellent amenities *Major road connections close by *Ideal project for in...
"""Fantastic 2 bed terrace property with low maintenance garden, perfect for first-time buyers. No onward chain, quiet street, great road links. Call now to arrange a viewing!"""
"YOPA is proud to present this high-specification, one-bedroom apartment in the heart of Newport city centre. A modern apartment, with a new open-plan kitchen diner and secure gated parking. All Offers & Interest Invited."
"Set on the banks of the river Usk in the heart of Newports city centre is this stunning, immaculately presented & spacious top floor apartment ideal for a first time buyer, investment or downsizing opportunity. Boasting 2 large bedrooms with an ensuite shower room to the master and far reaching v..."
No Chain! A generous sized two bedroom family home with additional loft storage. The downstairs has been extended allowing three reception rooms. Close to local amenities call Haart Newport today
"* GUIDE PRICE £145,000 - £150,000 * FLAT * TWO BEDROOMS * ALLOCATED PARKING * PETS ALLOWED * OPEN PLAN LIVING ROOM/DINING ROOM"
"**SPACIOUS MID LINK PROPERTY IN POPULAR LOCATION** Sage and Co are pleased to offer FOR SALE this SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME set in the sought after village of ROGERSTONE close to local amenities including Newport City Centre, highly regarded schools (Bassaleg School catchment), ..."
11 Brand New Apartments - Open to selling indivually or whole portfolio - One to Two Bedrooms - City Centre Location - Open Plan Living - Integrated Appliances - Local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links
A modern flat that is ideal for first time buyers and a small family. It is located in a nice area in Bassaleg and is close to schools such as Bassaleg High school. Good commuting links with Pye Corner train station down the road. A well presented 2 bedroom flat.
"YOPA is proud to present this modern two-bedroom top-floor apartment at the bottom of Basslage road. with good-sized rooms, attic storage, allocated parking, and available no chain, please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Newport market. All Offers & Interest are Invited."
A Spacious Two Double Bedroom Apartment located on the ground floor or Fosmaen House. Located Close to plenty of local amenities and commuting links
"Whether you be a first time buyer, down sizer or investor this three bedroom property on Hoskins Street may be right for you. Being brought to the market with No Onward Chain do not miss out and call Haart Newport "
Sold with Sitting Tenants - Three Bedrooms - Mid Terraced - Convenient Location - Close to City Centre - Close to local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links.
"* GUIDE PRICE £140,000 - £145,000 * TWO BEDROOMS * NO CHAIN * FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT * ALLOCATED PARKING * ONE BATHROOM * SPACIOUS LOUNGE/DINER"
Ideal Investment Property - Suitable for First Time Buyers - Two Bedrooms - Mid Terrace - Close to all amenities
Calling all investors: This three bedroom mid terrace home located within easy walking distance to Newport City Centre is being sold with a sitting tenant
NO CHAIN - THREE BEDROOM TERRACED HOME REQUIRING MODERNISATION *No onward chain *Three bedrooms *Two reception rooms *Kitchen with adjoining bathroom *Large pantry cupboard *Enclosed rear patio garden *Modern gas combination boiler *Walking distance to excellent amenities *Major road lin...
Excellent opportunity to acquire a vacant second floor apartment that is being offered to market with no onward chain
"*Internal Images coming soon* A Modern, Third Floor Two bedroom apartment located in the sought after location of Jamaica Walk. Master Bedroom en-suite, family bathroom and off road parking!!"
No Onwards Chain - Recently Renovated - Modernised Throughout- Close to Local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links
Sold with sitting tenants! A Two Double Bedroom terraced home located on the Popular location of Malpas Road
No Onwards Chain - First Floor Flat - Two Bedrooms - Sought After Location - Parking - Rear Garden
* TERRACED * THREE BEDROOMS * LOUNGE/DINER * ONE BATHROOM * KITCHEN * GARDEN * ON STREET PARKING
"360 VIRTUAL TOUR - Located next to the River Usk in a very convenient development a short drive from the M4 and city centre, an attractive modern apartment offering two bedroom accommodation. The property further benefits from a superb open plan kitchen and living area, uPVC double glazing, gas c..."
"Mid terraced property within walking distance to the city centre, railway and bus stations. Excellent road links to the M4, ideal first time purchase or investment. Viewing is advised, "
11 Brand New Apartments -- Open to selling individually or whole portfolio - One to Two Bedrooms - City Centre Location - Open Plan Living - Integrated Appliances - Local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links
11 Brand New Apartments - - Open to selling individually or whole portfolio - One to Two Bedrooms - City Centre Location - Open Plan Living - Integrated Appliances - Local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links
"YOPA is proud to present this three-bedroom semi-detached property in the popular locality of Malpas. With the fantastic potential to renovate and a large rear garden that isn't overlooked, please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Newport market. All Offers & Interest are Invited"
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. Period bay fronted mid terraced 2 bedroom family home located off Corporation Road in Newport with enclosed rear garden and front fore court. Viewing recommended. 
"GUIDE PRICE £135,000-£140,000! Two bedroom ground floor apartment with separate single garage & NO ONWARD CHAIN"
NO CHAIN. A fantastic opportunity to purchase this larger than average second floor apartment split over two floors and offers plenty of living space and three generous bedrooms! Easy commute to Cardiff and Newport.
"Guide Price £135,000 TO £140,000 **HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION**FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS**LOUNGE DINER**MODERN FITTED KITCHEN**BATHROOM**ALLOCATED PARKING**EXCELLENT TRANSPORT LINKS**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this two bedroom first floor apartment situated just o"
"A deceptively spacious semi-detached house offering three bedroom accommodation in a highly convenient location a brief drive from Newport city centre and the M4 at junction 24. The property further features a spacious reception room, kitchen, first floor bathroom and an excellent size rear garden."
Two Bedroom Apartment with Allocated Parking!
Ideal first time purchase or investment on this 3 bedroom terraced family with good size rear garden. The property requires renovation throughout. Viewing recommended. 
Griffin Executive Apartments - 11 Brand New Apartments - Open to selling indivually or whole portfolio - One to Two Bedrooms - City Centre Location - Open Plan Living - Integrated Appliances - Local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links
Off Road Parking - First Floor - Two Bedrooms - Modern Apartment - Excellent Transport Links - Close to Local Amenities - Walking Distance to Tredegar Park.
A one-bedroom FIRST FLOOR apartment with PARKING featuring an OPEN PLAN living / kitchen / dining space with a BAY WINDOW - a great space for entertaining. There is one bedroom and a main bathroom. Help to Buy - Wales scheme available. 
NO CHAIN. Spacious 2 double bedroom first floor apartment located in the highly sought after residential area off Bassaleg Road in Newport. Ideal first time purchase or investment. Excellent road links to the M4 J28. Viewing is highly recommended. 
A one-bedroom GROUND FLOOR apartment with PARKING featuring an OPEN PLAN living / kitchen / dining space with a BAY WINDOW - a great space for entertaining. There is one bedroom and a main bathroom. Help to Buy - Wales scheme available. 
"BRAND NEW Omar Newmarket (45'x10') | Fully-furnished | Residential park for the over 50s | Close to the Wales Coastal Path | 10 miles from Cardiff | Community living | Mobile hairdressers | Shops, library and leisure facilities nearby | Pet friendly | Part exchange available"
"## INVESTMENT PROPERTY ### Pure Investor are delighted to bring to the market this 2-bedroom top floor apartment in Newport, South Wales. The apartment comes with a tenant in situ who is contracted till Feb 2024 and ideally would like to stay in the property for the foreseeable future."
"A modern, purpose built two bedroom apartment with NO CHAIN! Call to book your viewing on ."
58 Years on Lease- Sold With Sitting Tenants - No Onwards Chain - First Floor Flat - Sought After Location - Close to City Centre
"A very well presented modern two bedroom apartment which is part of a popular development by Taylor Wimpey. Enjoy riverside living in the increasingly popular area of Newport. The apartment is situated on the second floor and comes with a parking space and plenty of visitor spaces.
Lysaght Villag..."
"NEW PRICE NOW Guide Price £130,000 TO £140,000**END TERRACE**THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM**KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOM**REAR GARDEN**PUBLIC TRANSPORT LINKS**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A WIDE RANGE OF FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00016536**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this three bedr"
"OFFERS IN THE REGION OF £130,000. HATHWAYS are pleased to offer for sale this two bedroom terraced property overlooking the Riverside in Newport."
A one-bedroom SECOND FLOOR apartment with PARKING featuring an OPEN PLAN living / kitchen / dining space - a great space for entertaining. There is one bedroom and a main bathroom. Help to Buy - Wales scheme available. 
"Ideal Starter Home! A Two Double Bedroom, Three Story Home located a stones throw away from Newport City Centre. Offered to the market with No Onward Chain, Call today!"
"PLANNING FOR FOUR APARTMENTS TO REAR - Newly refurbished throughout, this property is in an ideal City Centre location, within walking distance to the shops and perfect for commuting to Cardiff, Bristol and London and offers easy access to the motorway."
"GUIDE £130,000-£140,000!! This two bedroom mid terrace home enjoying easy access to Newport City Centre and Junction 26 of the M4 is being offered with no onward chain"
No Onwards Chain - Off Road Parking - Convenient Location - Excellent Transport Links - Close to Local Amenities - Two Bedroom
A Two Bedroom Second Floor Apartment with views overlooking the River Usk and Newport! Located Close to local amenities and benefiting from great commuting links this property has a lot to offer!
Sold with Sitting Tenant - Suitable for investors - No Onwards Chain - Close to local amenities - Excellent Transport Links - Two bedroom End Terrace
"** NEW GUIDE PRICE OF Guide Price £125,000 TO £130,000**NO CHAIN****SPACIOUS TOP FLOOR APARTMENT**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS**OVER 60'S COMPLEX**LOUNGE DINER**BALCONY WITH LOVELY VIEWS OF THE BRISTOL CHANNEL**SHOWER ROOM**COMMUNAL PARKING**CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES**REF#00017656**Pinkmove are de"
No Onwards Chain - Off Road Parking - Modernised Throughout - Convenient Location - Excellent Transport Links - Close to Local Amenities - Two Bedroom - First Floor Apartment
"Haart ae now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £125,000 for 84 Amelia Way, Newport NP19 0LR. Anyone wishing to place an offer on the property should contact Haart, 11 Bridge Street, Newport, NP20 4AL. prior to exchange of contracts"
"Guide Price £130,000 - £140,000 -Off Road Parking - Excrllent Transport Links - Close To Local Amenities- Riverside Location - River Views- Second Floor- Ensuite To Master Bedroom."
"**SPACIOUS SECOND FLOOR TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM APARTMENT** Situated alongside the Riverfront in Newport this spacious, modern two double bedroom second floor apartment comprises of entrance hallway, spacious lounge/diner with Juliette balcony overlooking the river, fitted kitchen with gas hob, electr..."
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. Tenants in place. 2 bedroom mid terraced family home with front and rear gardens located in the Lliswerry area of Newport. Viewing is recommended.
A freehold site with vehicle access from Westfield Gardens for the construction of three luxury flats with excellent access to local amenities and A4051 to M4 J26 approximately one mile.
"A spacious terrace offering two double bedroom accommodation in this highly convenient location off Barrack Hill, a short drive from the M4 and within walking distance of the city centre train station. The property further features a double reception room, uPVC double glazing, gas combination cen..."
"Whether or not you are after your First Home, Last home or next investment this Two Double bedroom home located on Marshfield Street may be perfect. Being sold with No chain!!"
"**GUIDE PRICE £120,000 - £125,000**NO CHAIN - IDEAL OPPORTUNITY FOR A FIRST TIME BUYER OR INVESTOR**FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS**FITTED KITCHEN**BATHROOM**LOUNGE DINER**GARDEN**CLOSE PROXIMITY TO MANY FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00007750**Pinkmove are delighted to presen"
"Fantastic ground floor flat in the sought after area of Woodland Park. This wonderful two bedroom home offers two good sized bedrooms, a spacious reception room, a modern fitted kitchen, and a low-maintenance garden with a lovely patio."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Mid Terrace House Two Double B...
"YOPA is proud to present this Modern Two bedroom Duplex located near to the riverside in the City Centre of Newport. With Big Open Plan space and vaulted ceilings and easy access to the M4, Please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Newport market. All Offers & Interest are Invited"
"**Guide Price £120,000-£125,000** A generous sized Two Bedroom Ground Floor Apartment located in Collingwood Crescent. Located close to local amenities and ideal for commuting"
**BRAND NEW CITY CENTRE APARTMENTS**HELP TO BUY AVAILABLE** A spacious 1 bedroom apartment situated in the heart of Newport. Call Peter Alan Newport to book your viewing and avoid missing out.
"**OFFERS IN REGION OF £120,000**NO CHAIN**SECOND FLOOR FLAT**ONE BEDROOM**OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER**BALCONY**ALLOCATED PARKING**"
"A modern ground floor apartment offering attractive, well maintained accommodation in a quiet cul-de-sac within this very popular development a short drive from the M4. The property offers one double bedroom accommodation and further benefits from modern kitchen, white bathroom, uPVC double glazi..."
"**SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS**RECENTLY REFURBISHED**OPEN PLAN LIVING**FITTED KITCHEN**BATHROOM**COMMUNAL PARKING**IDEAL INVESTMENT**CLOSE TO MANY FACILITIES AND AMENITIES**REF#00017893**Pinkmove are delighted to offer this spacious, two double bedroom, second floor apartment situate"
Modern Executive apartment with balcony
"Peter Alan are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £114,950 for 4 Ameila Way Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact Peter Alan, 75 Bridge Street Newport before exchange of contracts."
"**GUIDE PRICE £110,000 - £120,000**FLAT**TWO BEDROOMS**SHARED GARDEN**DRIVEWAY**QUIET CUL DE SAC**LOTS OF POTENTIAL**BATHROOM**LOUNGE/DINER**"
First Floor Flat - Communal Gardens - Off Road Parking - Popular Location - Service Apartment - Warden Controlled - Over 55s - Two Bedrooms
**FLAT**ONE BEDROOM**ENSUITE**BATHROOM**OPEN PLAN LOUNGE/DINER**NO PARKING**SECURE BUILDING**CITY CENTRE LOCATION**LIFT ACCESS**
"3 Henrywood Walk Newport We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £ 115,000 on the above property. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before exchange of contracts takes place"
"Northwood are happy to introduce this modern and spacious one-bedroom apartment in the leafy suburb of Bishpool, Newport. With local schools, parks and amenities on your doorstop, as well as easy access to the M4 and a short journey into Newport City Centre, the properties&rsquo..."
"Are you looking for City centre life? This 4th floor modern apartment could be just for you. With open plan living space, exposed beams and spoilt for choice with bathroom and en-suite shower room. The kitchen is modern and fitted with appliances. Viewings is highly recommended"
No Onwards Chain - Garage - Ground Floor Flat - Sought After Area - Excellent Transport Links - Close to City Centre
"*NO CHAIN* A Two Bedroom, second floor apartment that has been fully renovated located a short walk away from Newport City Centre!"
"*PERFECT FOR INVESTORS!! SPACIOUS, FIRST FLOOR FLAT WITH 1 DOUBLE BEDROOM, EN-SUITE SHOWER ROOM, BATHROOM, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/LIVING ROOM, BALCONY, ALLOCATED PARKING, LIFT ACCESS & NO ONWARD CHAIN*"
FOR SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION - Lot 25 - Property for Investment ; ONLINE AUCTION from 7th MARCH-9th MARCH A two bedroom mid terrace property situated close to Newport city centre and ideal for renovation or for buy to let. The property has been let for numerous years and has enjoyed a goo...
"We have pleasure in offering for sale, with no chain, this first floor, flat. An ideal first time buy or buy to let property with excellent rental yield potential .Situated to the east of Newport with access to usual amenities and good transport links at the M4.. "
"*IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS OR INVESTORS!! 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM, GROUND FLOOR FLAT WITH MODERN KITCHEN & BATHROOM, LIVING/DINING ROOM, NEW ELECTRICS, SPRINKLER SYSTEM & NO ONWARD CHAIN*"
"YOPA is proud to present this Fully renovated, stylish, one-bedroom ground-floor apartment in Newport. With a modern open-plan kitchen diner, New bathroom, and a large shared car park, please enquire early to avoid disappointment in this buoyant Newport market. All Offers & Interest are Invited."
"Great investment or first time buy opportunity bought to you by Peter Alan Newport. Purchase this one bed apartment with fantastic links to the M4 and town centre, this current rental property has always had a great demand and occupancy level."
"A spacious two bedroom ground floor flat located in Alway, NP19 that's being offered to market with no onward chain"
"Sage & Co are delighted to offer for sale this recently refurbished top floor flat in Newport. This property comprises of ONE BEDROOM, THREE PIECE SUITE BATHROOM and an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/LOUNGE. The flat is within easy access to Newport City Centre and an ideal property for first time buyers and ..."
"""360 TOUR AVAILABLE"" House sales direct are delighted to bring to the market this chain-free two-bedroom apartment located in Newport. This property offers an excellent opportunity for a first time buyer to get on the property market or investor wanting to add to their portfolio. "
"Well situated apartment situated in a retirement complex for over 55's with excellent transport links to Cardiff and Bristol and within walking distance to the city centre. With two bedrooms, lounge, kitchen and bathroom. lift with access to all floors plus communal areas."
"Get your foot on the property ladder with a brand new shared ownership City Centre apartment. One bedroom, bathroom, open plan living with modern fitted kitchen, close to amenities, Call us now for further information."
For sale by auction - Link Detached - Recently Renovated - Convenient Location - Close to Local Amenities - Excellent Transport Links - sold via All Wales Auction
"*£80,000 - £85,000* A stylish ground floor apartment with garden and private entrance in this highly convenient location a brief drive to the M4 and within walking distance of city centre train station. The property further features a double reception room, modern kitchen, double bedr..."
No Onwards Chain - Sold with Sitting Tenant - Great Investment - Popular Location - Close to Local Amenities - Low Maintenance
"EXCEPTIONALLY WELL LOCATED & PRESENTED IS THIS LARGE, LIGHT & AIRY GROUND FLOOR FLAT BOASTING A PRIVATE ENTRANCE AND GARDEN AREAS ALONG WITH IDEAL ACCOMMODATION FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS, INVESTORS OR DOWNSIZING. OFFERED WITH NO CHAIN, MODERN GAS COMBI CENTRAL HEATING, ELECTRICS & UPVC DOUBL..."
"Full details to follow. NO CHAIN .We have the pleasure in offering for sale a ground floor flat situated in Newport. Offering one bedroom, a fitted kitchen, fitted bathroom and a lounge. There is off road parking to the front elevation and to the rear is a forecourt area. Viewing is recommended. "
"GUIDE PRICE £80,000 - Two bedroom link-detached property situated on Cromwell Road, Newport this property is conveniently located within walking distance of local amenities and is a short drive from Newport Retail Park and Newport City Centre."
"Fantastic investment opportunity in the popular location of Cardiff Road. This excellent ground floor flat offers one double bedroom, a modern-fitted kitchen, a spacious living area and convenient access to Newport City Centre."
Bidding opens Monday 27th March at Midday and closes Wednesday 29th March at Midday.
"Moon and Co. are delighted to bring to the market 4 Collingwood Avenue. This one bed first floor apartment is conveniently positioned in the Somerton area of Newport and close to local amenities. The property is in need of updating and comprises a stair case leading to sitting room, kitchen, ba..."
A two bedroom ground floor maisonette in need of refurbishment and offered for sale with no onward chain. 
The perfect first time buy - modern and self contained this could be the perfect first home. In a popular location and being sold chain free - this would make an ideal purchase. Call today to view
"Well situated second floor apartment situated in a retirement complex for over 55's with excellent transport links to Cardiff and Bristol and within walking distance to the city centre. With one double bedroom, lounge, kitchen and bathroom. lift with access to all floors plus communal areas."
"Third floor apartment situated in a retirement complex for over 55's with excellent transport links to Cardiff and Bristol and within walking distance to local amenities and the city centre With one double bedroom, lounge, kitchen and bathroom Lift with access to all floors plus communal areas...."
NO CHAIN - SECOND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT IN EXCLUSIVE COMPLEX WITH LIFT *Over 60's second floor retirement apartment *One double bedroom *Lounge/diner with separate kitchen *Bathroom *Lovely communal areas *Management staff and careline services *Lift access *Secure entry/intercom sy...
 INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY Perfect for those looking for a project . Conveniently located to Newport city centre . One bedroom ground floor flat with outside space...
"This one bedroom ground floor flat, being sold with tenant in situ, is an excellent investment opportunity. Located close to the M4 and local amenities, this is a great buy-to-let property with one double bedroom, a fitted kitchen and a bathroom."
"***SHARED-OWNERSHIP STARTER HOMES*** Get your foot on the property ladder with a brand new shared ownership City Centre apartment. One bedroom, bathroom, open plan living with modern fitted kitchen, close to amenities, Call us now for further information."
"This first floor apartment is situated in a retirement complex for over 55's with excellent transport links to Cardiff and Bristol and within walking distance to local amenities and the city centre. With one double bedroom, lounge, kitchen and bathroom. Lift with access to all floors plus commu..."
FOR SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION - Lot 58 - Garage & Office for Owner Occupier/Investment; ONLINE AUCTION from 7th MARCH-9th MARCH A garage with rooms over which could be converted to a house subject to planning consents - given other conversions in the street. The property is to be sold as see...
Double detached garage
"Spacious, detached property in sought after residential area that offers excellent transport links to the A55."
No Summary Provided
"An exceptionally well-equipped equestrian property and fully modernised family home, set in approx. 20 acres of land.."
"A VERY SUBSTANTIAL 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE SET WITHIN GARDENS AND ADJOINING LAND EXTENDING TO ABOUT 3.24 ACRES IN TOTAL, LOCATED IN A VERY SECLUDED AND RURAL ENVIRONMENT OVERLOOKING THE VALLEY OF THE RIVER ELWY, WOODED COUNTRYSIDE AND BEYOND EXPANSIVE VIEWS ACROSS THE VALE OF CLWYD. Located ..."
***THE DORSTONE***Exclusive New Development***Built by Pure Homes***Quality Internal Specification***
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire one of only two bespoke high quality barn conversions via a team of local craftsmen, located within a most desirable and convenient location. Set within the countryside, enjoying spectacular views to every aspect and being full of character throughout. Having ea..."
***THE WIGMORE***Exclusive New Development***Built by Pure Homes***Quality Internal Specification***
"Video Tour Available ......A fabulous detached family house in an unspoilt and beautiful setting in 3.8 acres of land with paddock and woodland. Set in a convenient location the property comprises of three bedrooms, modern kitchen and three reception rooms. Further benefits include garage, carpor..."
"Elwy is delighted to market this stunningly unique five/six bedroom family home set within beautiful private grounds, built by a highly reputably local builder in 1987; Greystones is situated close to the famous St. Asaph Cathedral and with direct links to the A55 expressway. Presented in outstan..."
"Superb Grade II Listed residence set in 0.66 acres, surrounded by rural countryside yet only a brief distance to comprehensive amenities and commuter routes. The accommodation is over two floors and showcases an excellent standard of fixtures and fittings throughout."
***THE FAIRFIELD***Exclusive New Development***Built by Pure Homes***Quality Internal Specification***
"Available for sale a detached Family home sited in a much sought after residential area in the city of St Asaph. The property briefly affords: Front Porch, Hall, two Reception Rooms, Kitchen/Diner, Rear Lobby, Utility Room & Study/Bedroom five to the ground Floor. To the First Floor is a spacious..."
"A fantastic opportunity has arisen to obtain a spacious three bedroom detached house with ample off road parking and garage in the sought after location of the Cathedral city of St Asaph, which offers a full array of shops and public services and is within easy access of the A55 expressway."
"Video Tour Available... Occupying a secluded position at the head a of a small cul de sac of similar properties, an extended and immaculately maintained and beautifully presented three bedroom detached house with garage. The property offers an individual, versatile and spacious family home. The g..."
"Williams Estates are proud to advertise For Sale, on behalf of Castle Green Homes, Plot 23 - The Wiltshire a new build property. Being situated on the Maes Yr Haul development in the sought after location of Upper St. Asaph, surrounded by the scenic North Wales countryside, enjoying spectacular v..."
"A VERY HIGHLY APPOINTED 3 STOREY 5 BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE WITH INTEGRAL GARAGE AND LANDSCAPED GARDEN TO REAR, FORMING PART OF THIS SMALL AND SECLUDED CUL-DE-SAC OF ATTRACTIVE HOUSES ONLY A SHORT DISTANCE FROM THE CATHEDRAL AND THE CENTRE OF ST.ASAPH. It affords entrance hall with cloaks, loun..."
"A BEAUTIFULLY APPOINTED 5 BEDROOM LINK-DETACHED DORMER STYLE HOUSE AFFORDING SPACIOUS AND VERSATILE ROOMS TOGETHER WITH EXCEPTIONAL LANDSCAPED GARDENS WITH GARDEN ROOM, LOCATED IN THIS POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA SOME 2 MILES FROM ST.ASAPH AND THE A55 EXPRESSWAY. The house has been extensiv..."
AN IMPOSING AND VERY SUBSTANTIAL RANGE OF FORMER AGRICULTURAL BUILDINGS BENEFITTING FROM PLANNING CONSENT FOR TWO LARGE HOUSES STANDING IN A VERY SECLUDED RURAL SETTING AT THE HEAD OF A NO-THROUGH PRIVATE DRIVE WITH SPLENDID EASTERLY VIEWS ACROSS FARMLAND TOWARDS THE CLWYDIAN HILLS. Loca...
"Video Tour Available... Offered for sale a rare opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented cottage, close to the High street of St Asaph. The spacious living accommodation oozes the charm and character going back to the 1880's. EPC Rating D62."
Available for sale a beautifully presented family home situated in a desirable residential location in the historic Cathedral city of St Asaph with the A55 within 1/4 mille. This four bedroom detached house offers modern and spacious family living with multiple reception rooms .The accommodation ...
"An opportunity to acquire a spacious Detached Bungalow sited on a good sized plot extending to circa. 0.5 acres / 0.185 acres, the Bungalow is located in the Cathedral City of St Asaph with excellent access to the A55 expressway to Chester and the motorway network beyond with the City of Chester ..."
"Williams Estates are proud to advertise For Sale, on behalf of Castle Green Homes, Plot 20 a new build property - The Salisbury. Being situated on the Maes Yr Haul development in the sought after location of Upper St. Asaph, surrounded by the scenic North Wales countryside, enjoying spectacular v..."
"Video Tour Available... Offered for sale a luxury four Bedroom semi detached house situated on the outskirts of the city of St Asaph with picturesque far reaching views of the Clwydian Hills countryside. Ffordd Brenig new development is conveniently located close to local amenities, schools, sho..."
"Williams Estates are proud to advertise For Sale, on behalf of Castle Green Homes, Plot 15 - The Alderton a new build property. Being situated on the Maes Yr Haul development in the sought after location of Upper St. Asaph, surrounded by the scenic North Wales countryside, enjoying spectacular vi..."
"This three bedroom detached home offers captivating countryside views towards the Clwydian hillsides and is adjacent to the Llannerch Estate with.  Having a mixture of character, charm and modern refineries within to include a renewed kitchen with breakfast area.  It resides in the p..."
*****HUGE POTENTIAL TO EXTEND**** POSSIBLE DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY **** Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this absolute gem of a property. Owned by the family for many years this property has masses of potential! Sitting in a sizeable plot in a semi rural position with lovely vie...
If you are looking for a good size home sat on a generous plot in a quiet cul de sac then look no further as this home will tick all the boxes..........
"Video Tour Available ...Offered for sale a character three bedroomed semi detached cottage. Standing within delightful gardens in this semi-rural setting in between Trefnant and St Asaph, within easy reach of the A55 Expressway. Affording well planned charming accommodation in brief comprises fr..."
"Video Tour Available.. Offered for sale a detached dormer bungalow with three spacious bedrooms. Situated within a quiet cul-de-sac, this property also benefits from having double glazing, gas central heating, off road parking and garage. Located in St Asaph within a short walking distance of sch..."
"A well presented and proportioned two bedroom, two bathroom and two reception room character cottage style property with extensive mature gardens of approximately 0.3 of an acre, offering great potential for extension and possible development on the land subject to the necessary permissions being..."
"A rare opportunity has arisen to purchase one of the beautifully presented stone built end terrace house, situated on the new development Livingstone place ""Former known as HM Stanley"" This stylish home with modern fixtures benefits by having three allocated parki..."
"An opportunity to acquire an impressive private historic residence that is a Grade ll* Listed Building having murals of national importance to one of its rooms. The property is situated in the historic city of St Asaph being in the vicinity of all shops, amenities, Schools, the Cathedral an..."
"This link detached family home which has been extended to provide four double bedrooms, good size lounge, dining through sitting room, fitted kitchen, cloak room, shower room and garage with off road parking.  Having gas fired heating, double glazing and gardens to both front and rear. Si..."
"Video Tour Available... Offered for sale a detached bungalow with a spacious and modern aspect throughout. With the benefits of ample off road parking, gas central heating and uPVC double glazing throughout. Simply must be viewed. EPC Rating C75. "
"A spacious 3 / 4 bedroom detached dormer bungalow/house for sale with scope for further development in a popular and desirable area . Excellent access to local amenities including schools and shops this property is perfect for families, retired or people with mobility concerns. The ground floor..."
"Offered for sale a three bedroom detached bungalow situated in the popular area of Upper St. Asaph offering easy access to the A55 expressway and all other local amenities. Benefits include double glazing, gas central heating, off road parking and extensive gardens with lovely views overlooking t..."
"A beautifully presented and very spacious 3 double bedroom detached bungalow set on a quiet cul de sac with easy access to a wealth of local amenities. Set on a generous plot with front and rear gardens, off road parking, garage. In brief the property comprises a lounge, kitchen/diner, bedrooms..."
"Constructed in the mid 1970's a deceptively spacious and versatile 2 bedroom bungalow occupying a large, desirable corner plot on this established development on the outskirts of Trefnant. The well maintained property, in need of some modernisation offers a large living room, separate dining room..."
Video Tour Available... If you are looking for a beautifully presented and modern family home then look no further. Williams Estates are delighted to bring to the market this stunning three bedroom detached house situated on Lon Y Parc development in the cathedral city of St Asaph. Viewing highly...
Standing in this popular location a three bedroom detached dormer bungalow nicely presented throughout. It can be described as 'ready to walk into' and offers quality within. Having ample off road parking with a garage facility and mature gardens to front and rear.  St Asaph is co...
"A beautifully presented, spacious 2 double bedroom detached bungalow set on a semi rural village to Abergele and Prestatyn and the A55 with a wealth of local amenities including shops and schools An ideal professionals home, retirement property or holiday investment the property in brief the pr..."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom property in a quiet cul de sac position. Offering accommodation perfect for the family buyer with an ensuite master bedroom, ground floor WC, lovely kitchen/diner, lounge which leads out onto the private rear garden and off road parking. The property has an a..."
"Monopoly Buy Sell Rent is pleased to offer for sale this well presented semi detached property located in a quiet location on the grounds of the cathedral in the city of St Asaph. The property briefly comprises entrance hall with oak flooring, downstairs WC, lounge with French doors opening onto..."
"Monopoly Buy Sell Rent is pleased to offer for sale this superb semi-detached barn located on a private lane in the grounds of the cathedral of St Asaph. The property benefits from double glazing throughout with an electric heating system and briefly comprises an entrance hall, a useful downstair..."
"Monopoly Buy Sell Rent are pleased to offer for sale this spacious three bedroom detached bungalow which comprises of a modern fitted kitchen diner, spacious living room, modern bathroom and three double bedrooms. Driveway providing off road parking, gardens to front and rear, situated in a much ..."
"Elwy are pleased to market an impressive and deceptively spacious two bedroom house occupying a prominent position in the city of St. Asaph. Within walking distance to the River Elwy, local shops, amenities and schools. Presented in lovely condition with period charm and parking to the rear. View..."
SUITED TO CASH BUYERS ONLY. Situated on this popular mature development in lower St. Asaph is this three bedroom detached bungalow occupying a large corner plot.  Internally it has been extended to provide open plan living accommodation and it benefits by way of uPVC double glazing and ga...
"This property occupies a prominent position on the corner of Ashly Court and The Roe, St Asaph located just a short distance away from the High Street. This two bedroomed Detached Bungalow is in need of some modernisation but has huge potential sitting on a corner plot. The property h..."
"This stunning recently converted first floor apartment stands in an idyllic courtyard on this sought after newly built development. Standing close to the A55 expressway for ease of commuting, the property is finished to a high standard throughout, and boasts a large open plan kitchen/diner living..."
BACK ON THE MARKET DUE TO PURCHASER LOSING THEIR SALE - An opportunity to acquire a well presented three bedroom semi detached bungalow located within the much sought after city of St Asaph. The property is located in a prime position surrounded by farm land. The property is within close proxim...
"Enfys Estates are delighted to bring to the market this fabulous three bedroomed detached cottage, being full of charm and character and for sale with No Onward Chain. Located in the sought after Cathedral City of St. Asaph, which boasts local shops, schools, leisure centre, bars & restaurant..."
"Williams Estates are proud to advertise For Sale, on behalf of Castle Green Homes, Plot 35 - The Oakley a new build property. Being situated on the Maes Yr Haul development in the sought after location of Upper St. Asaph, surrounded by the scenic North Wales countryside, enjoying spectacular view..."
Video Tour Available... A recently modernised and well presented terrace occupying a convenient location within the city of St Asaph. Offering an open plan living and dining area which is definitely the hub of the home followed by a modern kitchen. Viewing is Essential! No Chain. EPC Rating D60.
"Providing well proportioned accommodation with the benefit of gas fired central heating from a combination boiler, Part uPVC double glazing. The property comprises covered porch with small storage cupboard, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen. to the first floor a master bedroom with a built-in wardr..."
No summary available.
"Forming part of this Grade 11 Listed building known as Llanerch Hall on the outskirts of The City of St Asaph which has excellent access to the A55 expressway for commuting to Chester, Manchester & beyond. The apartment is accessed via the grand reception hall of the main building and is located ..."
"An opportunity to acquire a Two Bedroom Flat over two floors in the much sought after City of St Asaph. The Flat is situated in a very convenient location for the amenities on offer as well as access to the A55 Expressway The accommodation briefly affords: Lounge/Diner, Kitchen and Front ..."
An impressive detached Chapel of character being situated within the City of St Asaph benefiting direct road frontage onto Bronwylfa Square which maybe of interest to those seeking development properties subject to all necessary planning consents. The property benefits gas fired central heating....
"A stunning Grade II Listed Building, historically an exclusive hotel with 22 en-suite bedrooms, sitting in 15 acres of its own coastal facing land; covered heated swimming pool, tennis courts, mature landscaped gardens and Helipad and with the most spectacular views south over St Brides Bay."
"*A substantial detached 2 storey Jacobean/Georgian Listed Grade II Private Residence. *Deceptively spacious 4/5 Reception, Kitchen, Utility, 6 Bedrooms and 3 Bathroom accommodation. *Gas Central Heating, Single and Double Glazed Sash Windows and Loft Insulation. *Stone Barn 28'0"" x..."
*Grade II Listed Detached House* *7 Bedrooms* Character Property & Countryside Views* *Approximately 3 Acres of Grounds Including Paddock & Walled Garden* *Sought After Location*
A striking landmark coastal property
"Just a couple of minutes on foot from the centre of St Davids but also on the edge of the countryside, Maes Y Felin is a tranquil development built to uncompromisingly high standards. The Eira is a thoughtfully designed modern dormer bungalow, this home is perfect for everyone, from growing f..."
"Just a couple of minutes on foot from the centre of St Davids but also on the edge of the countryside, Maes Y Felin is a tranquil development built to uncompromisingly high standards. The Sophia is a spacious, meticulously designed bungalow that’s perfect for a couple or small family, this lo..."
"Situated in the Heart of St Davids this great property has alot to offer and stacks of potential! Currently a gallery on the ground floor with sitting room, kitchen and conservatory this lends itself (subject to relevant planning consents) to be a self contained unit. There is also an ..."
"* An attractive and deceptively spacious 3 Storey Linked Semi Detached Character Residence. * Well appointed 2 Reception, Kitchen/Breakfast, 3 Bedrooms, Bathroom & Cloakroom Accommodation. * Good sized easily maintained Rear Garden with Ornamental Stone & Paved Patio Areas from whe..."
"NO CHAIN - A beautifully presented and immaculate 3 bedroom detached bungalow situated just a short walk away from the city centre of St David's. Boasting lounge, open plan kitchen/diner, family bathroom, master bedroom with en suite and 2 further bedrooms. Externally there is off road parking fo..."
"Are you looking to live in the sought after area of St. David's, one of the smallest cities in the UK? Well this detached 3 bedroom property in right in the heart of St. David's just off the high street with wide range of shops & eateries, plus if you enjoy culture St. David's has it at every tu..."
"Just a couple of minutes on foot from the centre of St Davids but also on the edge of the countryside, Maes Y Felin is a tranquil development built to uncompromisingly high standards. The Glyndwr is a charming and versatile home, this bungalow is perfect for a couple or small family, offering..."
"60 New Street is a beautifully presented detached dormer bungalow located in the sought after location of St David's, close to the cathedral and city centre. The layout of the property briefly comprises of an Entrance Hall, Lounge, Kitchen/Diner, Three Double Bedrooms, Shower Room and a separate ..."
"NO CHAIN - We are delighted to market this immaculate property, the type of which rarely comes to the market in St Davids. Situated a 5 minute walk to the centre of St Davids, with its popular eateries and arts/music scene and yet a similar distance to the coastal footpath. You can walk to ..."
"2 valuable parcels of agricultural land with the benefit of roadside access being conveniently located to St Davids, Croesgoch, Fishguard, etc FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION (Subject to Conditions of Sales and unless sold beforehand) on Thursday 7 April 2022 at 7.30pm At The..."
"***Video tour available*** We are pleased to offer for sale this four bedroom semi detached property located in a sought after area of Gorseinon, in a Cul-de-sac location. Close to local amenities, schools and shops. With good access to the M4, Swansea City Centre and Llanelli. The accom..."
An amazing and unique opportunity to acquire a property with prestige. It has a four bed house which has been refurbished to an extremely high standard with a bespoke kitchen. Viewing is a must to appreciate contact Peter Alan Gorseinon on 
"***Coming Soon*** A fabulous family home which is currently being modernised and refurbished to a luxurious finish. The property offers 2631sqft of living accommodation, laid out in a contempoirary style and making the very most of space and light. The accommodation comprises tw..."
"Purplebricks is pleased to offer to market this immaculately presented 4 bedroom detached home with incredible grounds situated in the desirable Mayals area, overlooking Swansea Bay. The property is a must see to really appreciate what the home has to offer including generous living space, four g..."
"We are proud to offer this Six Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £880,000 - £975,000*"
Well Trading City Centre Bar Investment (Business Unaffected). Offers in excess of £875000.00  BUSINESS TRADING AS USUAL AND REMAINS UNAFFECTED. The premises has a Grade II listed façade with an open plan ground floor and first floor area. There are two bars on the ground floo...
Well Trading City Centre Bar Investment (Business Unaffected). Offers in excess of £875000.00  BUSINESS TRADING AS USUAL AND REMAINS UNAFFECTED. The premises comprises an open plan ground floor bar and first floor restaurant area. There is one bar on the ground floor and stor...
"EER 69C Council Tax G John Francis are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented four bedroom detached family home in the ever popular location of Mayals. Formerly the stable block of to the neighbouring farmhouse, parts of which date back circa 1850. "
"Astleys are both proud and delighted to offer for sale this impressive, well presented four bedroom detached family home in the ever popular location of Mayals. Formerly the stable block belonging to the neighbouring farmhouse, parts of which date back circa 1850. 37 Owls Lodge Lane is a..."
"A Former Bishop Residence, Delightfully Preserved, Located In Highly Sought After Area In The Heart Of The Uplands. Swansea This residential property exudes curb appeal, character and charm from the off-set. On entering, the elegant rooms greet you with impressive proportions and imposing fe..."
"A charming, greatly extended detached four-bedroom family home situated in a private and secluded off road location adjacent to Clyne Gardens and around a 10-minute drive to Swansea University, Singleton Hospital and Mumbles Village. It is in the catchment area "
A rare opportunity to purchase a unique and individual family home hidden away in Loughor within easy walking distance of Loughor Estuary Foreshore. Viewing Highly Recommended contact Peter Alan Gorseinon 
"This incredible Grade II* Listed residential property dates back to the 19th century and offers extensive flexibility of living accommodation. The property is situated in one of Uplands' most prestigious streets. The property is located directly opposite St.James Garden dating back to 1863, notab..."
"Rare opportunity to purchase this executive five bedroom detached property situated in a sought after location in the exclusive development Bryn Newydd in Derwen Fawr. Close to the seafront, Mumbles village and the award winning Gower Peninsula with easy access to Singleton Hospital, City Cent..."
"Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing on . A spacious 4 bedroom detached family home offered for sale. Located in Sketty, a sought after area, situated within close proximity to Singleton park, local shops, schools, public transport links and Swansea beach front."
"A well presented 4 bedroom plus attic room detached family home offered for sale. Situated in Sketty, sought after for its convenient position to local shops, public transport links, local schools, beaches and local parks. Please call Peter Alan Swansea on to arrange a viewing!"
"An immaculately presented, split level 5 bedroom housed offered for sale. Situated in Sketty, a sought after location for it's convenience to Swansea City centre, local schools, public transport links, local parks and Swansea beach fronts. Please call Peter Alan Swansea on to book."
Peter Morgan Exclusive | Unique in Design | Offering Versatile Accommodation | Detached Family Residence | Two Reception Rooms | Four Bedrooms | Two Driveways | EPC Rating - D | Council Tax Band - G
"P. A black are delighted to market this 5/6 bedroom property with its own self-contained, one bedroom Annex. If your looking for a property with that extra bit of outside space, or multi generation living this is the ideal property for you. Please arrange early viewings to avoid dissapointment."
Individually designed detached property. 5 double bedrooms (3 with access to en suite). 3 separate reception rooms. Kitchen/breakfast room. Utility room and a WC. Balcony with stunning views over Swansea valley. Parking for several vehicles and an integral garage. Convenient for M4 and hospital.
"A stunning apartment offering 1,600sqft of luxurious living space in the Grade II listed Clyne Castle set within the beautiful grounds of Clyne Gardens and only a short distance from the sea front promenade and vibrant Mumbles. The apartment is beautifully oppulent with extraordinarily spaci..."
"Very rare to the market and unique home!
Five double bedroom property available in the popular location of Castle Grove, Loughor, Swansea, SA4.
This family home really is something special benefiting from being in a private location with a gated entry system to the estate.
Additional benefits are..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** Boasting three floors of living space, The Witney is a stunning new home benefitting from a generous open-plan kitchen/breakfast/family area with island unit, a separate living and dining room - both with feature bay windows. "
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this beautiful family home. Individually designed and built buy the current owners, not only is this property unique it is spacious and homely too! The detached 4 bedroom property has many special features including 3 reception rooms, 2 ensuites and of..."
"Over three distinctive floors, this property has three bedrooms upstairs, along with a 4th ground floor bedroom/study that can be used in any way that suits. The heart of the home is on the first floor where you will find an open-plan kitchen-breakfast room with patio doors to a beautiful terrace."
"The 4-bedroom Aiden home is a unique home with plenty of modern living features, and lots of space for the whole family, as well as guests. As you enter the home, you’ll find an open plan kitchen/diner with French doors leading out to the garden, alongside a flexible bedroom space on this"
"***Video tour available*** A four bedroom semi detached property offered for sale with no onward chain. Set in the popular location of Killay close to local amenities, shops, Dunvant Park, library and medical surgery. Within walking distance of local Primary Schools and in the catchment area..."
"A statement townhouse home spread over three distinctive floors. The Gregory has three bedrooms upstairs, along with a fourth ground floor bedroom/study that can be used in any way that suits. The heart of the home is on the first floor where you will find an open-plan kitchen-breakfast roo"
"You can now save up to £40,000* when you reserve Plot 49 – The Gregory.
Was £499,995. Now £459,995 & Ready to move into this Summer
*Terms and conditions apply. View "
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer to the market this well presented, modern, four bedroom property in the sought after village of Sketty. Situated in the desirable location of Hendrefoilan Park is conveniently located for access to Killay precint with a range of local amenities, within the ca..."
"The 4-bedroom home is a unique home with plenty of modern living features & space for the whole family split over three floors with a garage and two parking spaces. With gardens to the front and rear, this is an ideal family home."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^***Introducing the Wenvoe, a beautiful new home featuring from a detached single garage, open-plan kitchen/family area, a dual-aspect living room with French doors to the rear garden, utility room and separate dining room/study."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer to the market this , four bedroom, detached townhouse in the sought after location of Killay, Swansea. Set in the modern Millwood Gardens developments in the heart of Killay, within walking distance to the local amenities and shops of Killay Precinct and with..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this individually designed 4 bedroom detached family home. With the spacious entrance hall, 3 reception rooms, kitchen/breakfast room, w.c., and utility room to the ground floor. To the first floor are 4 double bedrooms with the master bedroom having a..."
"A beautiful five bedroom semi detached property in a peaceful and tranquil location. The property boasts three reception rooms, four double bedrooms one single and two en suites. The property has large enclosed gardens and parking for several cars. Also on the grounds is an outbuilding with ..."
"An extremely well presented and extended 3/4 bedroom detached bungalow offering good size and versatile modern living that offers itself as a wonderful family home, situated along the main Garrod Avenue between Dunvant and Gowerton with the added advantage of ample off road parking, single detach..."
"Set in an ideal village location, The Westlake is a beautiful new home benefitting from an integral garage, utility room, spacious open-plan kitchen/dining area with island unit and french doors to the rear garden, plus four double bedrooms and an en-suite to bedroom 1. "
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this beautiful family home. Individually designed and built buy the current owners, not only is this property unique it is spacious too! The detached 5 bedroom property has many special features including underfloor heating to the ground floor, ground fl..."
"Detached, Six Bedroom, Four Reception Rooms."
"Detached, Four Bedroom, Three Reception Rooms."
"John Francis are proud to offer for sale this delightfull well presented four bedroom semi-detached family located in the heart of Sketty and close to all ameneties, Singleton hospital and Swansea University, Singleton Park . It has been renovated to an extremely high standard, yet still retain..."
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND E We are delighted to offer to the market this stunning 5-bedroom detached house on Rhydycoed in Birchgrove. The property presents a well-adapted layout, offering spacious and comfortable accommodation throughout, making it an ideal fami..."
"A freehold parcel of residential development land located within the popular Village location of Dunvant, Swansea. Outline planning has been granted for three extensive detached dwellings with associated gardens and garage/parking. Planning number: 2020/0772/OUT. The site area is circa 0.7 acres...."
***Video tour available*** Located on an extremely desirable cul-de-sac location in the popular area of Sketty with no onward chain we are pleased to bring to market a four bedroom detached property. Ideally located close to the catchment area for local schools and Gower College. Closed to l...
"Situated in the village of Penllergaer, roughly 15 minutes' drive north-west of Swansea, the Wye is a 4-bedroom home boasting an open-plan kitchen, dining, and family area, a study, a living room, three double bedrooms, an en suite to bedroom 1, and a contemporary family bathroom."
"A modern extended detached family home located on a sort after and popular esate of Gowerton. The accommodation comprises of entrance porch, hallway, cloakroom, converted garage which is now an extra bedroom with plumbing for an en-suite /study, lounge, dining room open to the conservatory ..."
This three-bedroom home offers the ultimate flexible lifestyle of living in a three-story house. The Eustace ensures that each member of the family has the space they need and want. Yet the importance of spending time together is not dismissed with an open plan dining living room and an ope
"You can now save up to £22,000* when you reserve Plot 43 – The Eustace.
Was £407,995. Now £385,995 & Ready to move into this Spring.
*Terms and conditions apply. "
An immaculately presented four bedroom town house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated in the Maritime Quarter of Swansea's vibrant SA1 development. The property further benefits off road parking for 2 cars. Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing or book on our website.
"Four-bedroom end of terrace family town house located in the popular, sought-after location of Fishermans Way, Swansea Marina SA1.
This spacious property is spread over three floors and has benefits such as two sit out balconies and two juliet balconies, walking distance to the beach and the new ..."
"Mid terrace property that has been split into two self contained one bedroom apartments. Rear vehicle access and parking area. First floor apartment has balcony and staircase from the rear. Both apartments are well presented throughout. Convenient location for access to M4, Hospital and local sho..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer to the market this immaculately presented three bedroom detached family home in the sought after location of Sketty Park, Swansea, SA2.
Situated in the desirable location of Sketty Park, the home is conveniently located for access to Sketty surgery with a range..."
This three-bedroom home offers the ultimate flexible lifestyle of living in a three-story house. The home ensures that each member of the family has the space they need and want. Yet the importance of spending time together is not dismissed with an open plan dining living room and an open kitchen.
"CASH BUYERS - NO ONWARD CHAIN John Francis are excited to bring to the market this perfect investment property situated in Lon Derw, Sketty. An ongoing project house, this property has massive potential to be a fabulous four bedroom detached bungalow in a sought after location. B..."
"* Video Tour Available * A recently refurbished four bedroom detached home located with Ravenhill, Swansea. Accommodation includes: entrance hallway, lounge dining room, modern kitchen, conservatory and shower room with WC to ground floor. To the first floor are fours bedrooms and family bathroo..."
"Council Tax Band F Four Bedroom Town-house has just launched with a virtual viewing being available. Featuring an open-plan kitchen & living area with french doors opening onto a balcony benefitings from views over the habour & study room, three baths and ample parking - this p..."
"This lovely detached home has much to offer. Located in Swansea, it boasts three bedrooms, two reception rooms and two bathrooms. It also offers ample off-road parking. This is the perfect opportunity for any home hunter. Viewing advised, we don't anticipate the property being on the market for ..."
"Council Tax Band - E John Francis is excited to bring to the market this immaculate three bedroom semi-detached house situated in Hazel Road, Sketty. On entering, you are welcomed with a homely and modern feel. Downstairs, the property benefits from two reception rooms. One of which is..."
"We are proud to present this Five Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. GUIDE PRICE - £360,000-380,000"
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND: E We offer for sale this immaculately presented, four bedroom detached family home in a highly desirable location, in the village of Pontlliw. With front and rear gardens, off road parking for two vehicles plus a single detached garage. Briefly compr..."
"Looking for an ideal family home? Look no further as we present this four bedroom detached house with immaculate living accommodation located in the well sought after area of Killay. It is conveniently located close to local amenities, Hendrefoilen Primary school as well as Dunvant Primary and..."
"A rare opportunity to acquire one of the larger properties on a very sought after development. Four bedrooms. Three reception rooms. Level enclosed garden. Driveway for several vehicles. Convenient for access to M4, hospital and local schools. Available with no onward chain. Modernisation required."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom, traditional semi detached family home. Located in the sought after Mayals area close to the local primary school and within the catchment of Bishopston Comprehensive school. With local transport Links located close by and the village ..."
"This well presented and much loved detached property, offering great potential for further development subject to the relevant planning permission. The current owner has greatly improved the property to create a deceptive home with landscaped private gardens with double length garage."
"Detached, Four Bedroom, Off Street Parking."
"End Of Terrace, Three Bedroom, No Onward Chain."
"A superb opportunity to purchase this three bedroom detached bungalow (with solar panels) on a plot of 0.09 acres, just a short distance from the bustling village of Mumbles. We feel this property is ideally placed for the hustle of Mumbles Village with all the local shops and amenities,..."
EER tbc Council Tax Band F A well positioned 3/4 bedroom link-detached property arranged over two storeys and offering deceptively spacious accommodation throughout. There are two bedrooms on the ground floor and one/two on the first so the accommodation is very flexible. All the bedroo...
"Reduced for a quick sale!
Four/five bedroom mid terrace home located in the popular area of Parc Wern Road, Swansea, SA2. Ideal For Rental Or As A Family Home As a family home - Beautiful 4/5 bedroom fanily home with fabulous views of Swansea Bay - Private Rear Garden with Garage and Parking ..."
"Detached, Three Bedroom, Garage/Off Street Parking."
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND: D 360* Virtual Tour Available Online We offer for sale, what we consider to be a well presented four bedroom detached property, set back off the road with front and rear gardens and the added benefit of a garage, plus driveway. The accommodat..."
"* VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE * A newly constructed four bed detached family home, inc lounge, WC, open plan lounge dining room with integrated appliances, island, snug, family bathroom, ensuite shower room, spacious driveway, front and rear gardens, under floor heating, partly clad in natural stone, po..."
"A well proportioned extended semi-detached family home situated in a pleasant established residential area, being close to Mumbles Village and the sea front, the sought after Welsh school is a few minutes walk away, as is the City bus service. "
"A spacious detached modern property situated on Clos Bevan Gowerton in a Cul-de-Sac location. The accommodation has a hallway, cloakroom, wet room, utility room, boiler/larder room, "" L "" shaped kitchen/breakfast room, separate dining room and family lounge. On the first floor..."
"WE'LL CONTRIBUTE £17,000, PLUS FLOORING. DETACHED home with UPGRADED open plan kitchen, separate dining room or HOME OFFICE and French doors to the south facing garden. EN SUITE main bedroom, 2 further double bedrooms and a single. Comes with a garage and parking. Plot 74 | The Alderney | Chapel..."
"A modern three bedroom semi-detached family home located within a popular modern housing estate within Gowerton, Swansea. The well appointed accommodation includes; entrance hallway, modern kitchen with integrated appliances, WC, spacious lounge and conservatory to ground floor. To the first floo..."
"Executive, Modern, Immaculately Presented, four bedroom townhouse, situated in Swansea's Maritime Quarter, just a few hundred meters walk from the beach.
Accommodation is spread over three floors and benefits from 2 parking spaces. With lovely walks along the sea-front close by, within great ac..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this four bedroom detached family home, in a highly desirable location, in the village of Pontlliw. With front, rear and side gardens, driveway parking plus a detached garage. Briefly comprising an entrance hallway leading to the study, cloakroom, living..."
"*Brand new and chain free, The Wilbury is a 4-bedroom home located roughly 15 minutes' drive north-west of Swansea and features an open-plan kitchen and dining area, a living room, two double bedrooms, and an en suite to bedroom 1. Contact us to book your appointment today. "
"This ideal family home is not one to be missed. The property itself is well-presented throughout and benefits from a spacious lounge, a dining room, a fitted kitchen and 4 double bedrooms. Externally the property has off-road parking with a detached garage and an enclosed garden with a brand-ne..."
"NO CHAIN!
Four-bedroom terrace family town house located in the popular, sought-after location of St. Margaret's Court, Swansea Marina SA1.
This spacious property is spread over three floors and has benefits such as en suite to master bedroom, two sit out balconies, walking distance to the beach ..."
"The Whitecroft is a 4-bedroom home, spanning three floors, which benefits from an open-plan kitchen and dining area, a living room, two en suites, and a family bathroom suite."
"An impressive and extended semi detached property situated in a sought after residential area of the Biswell that offers itself as a wonderful family home. The accommodation has a hallway, generous size family lounge, kitchen/dining room and utility room with door to integral garage. O..."
"A 7 bedroom mid terraced house split into 3 flats offered for sale. Situated in Swansea City centre, within walking distance to shops, public transport links and Swansea beach fronts. This is an ideal investor opportunity with potential to be a large family home or rental investment. Call to book."
"Extremely well presented three bedroom detached property located in a sought after location in West Cross nearby local schools, shops and amenities. Benefiting from an open plan kitchen/diner, spacious lounge, downstairs w/c and a separate study. Front garden is newly laid with decking cr..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this lovely 4 bedroom detached family home. Located in one of the more exclusive areas in the sought-after area of Treboeth, in Swansea. With convenient access to the city centre, the nearby retail parks and schools. Just a short drive to the M4 motorw..."
"This is a three bedroom newly upgraded executive detached property located in Morriston, Swansea. The property is located close to local amenities including schools, shops, Morfa Retail Park and offers good links to Swansea City Centre and the M4 corridor."
A well presented first floor apartment with balcony overlooking the landscaped communal gardens - Exclusively available to the over 60's.
"A Period Building sitting on the hillsides of Swansea City Centre, with extensive sea views stretching over the Swansea Coastline and City Centre itself. This development opportunity offers itself to a range of residential and commercial aspects (STP). The exterior exudes curb appeal, chara..."
"Council tax band E Situated in this very sought after location within walking distance of the centre of Sketty, a traditional four bedroom mid terrace property offering spacious accommodation arranged over three floors. The property is in an excellent catchment area for both primary and seco..."
Spacious Family Home With Beautiful Mature Gardens. Introducing a well presented family home situated in a highly desirable location. The property is set back off the main road which occupies a large plot. The property was built in the 1950s and was designed to look like a classing 19...
"LEASEHOLD Council Tax Band: E An ideal opportunity to purchase a four bedroom detached property, situated within the popular 'Parc Penllergaer' development. This property benefits from a gas central heating system and double-glazing and briefly comprises entrance hallway, cloakroo..."
Sitting within its own generous grounds and set behind double gates is this deceptive detached bungalow with versatile living space. Available with no on going chain this property offers a great opportunity as a family home with two reception rooms and five bedrooms. Ample parking and garage
A three bedroom detached bungalow situated in a quiet cul-de-sac location of similar properties in this popular and sought after residential area of the Bishwell in the heart of Gowerton approximately 4 miles from the city centre of Swansea. Immaculately presented throughout the accommodatio...
"A detached property of modern construction located at the top end of Cory Street, a “stone’s throw” from the busy Sketty Shopping Centre and close to the Doctor’s surgery, Singleton Park and about 1 ½ miles from Swansea City Centre. "
"We are delighted to offer for sale this well presented five bedroom semi detached property on the sought after Maes Y Gwernen Drive just a short walk from Morriston Hospital. This beautiful property boasts four reception rooms, four double bedrooms, one single bedroom, driveway, garage and en..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this lovely 4 bedroom detached family home. Situated in an ever popular and convenient location. Benefitting from being on a main bus route and ideally placed for access to M4, the DVLA and Morriston Hospital.
Viewing is highly recommended to fully app..."
"This is an ideal first time or investment opportunity. An immaculately presented 2 double bedroom ground floor apartment offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated within walking distance to the beach front, local shops, public transport links and Swansea City centre. Viewing recommended!"
"An extended four bedroom semi-detached property which is set in a popular residential location benefiting from spacious accommodation, making a lovely family home. The accommodation comprises cloaks, lounge, dining room and fitted kitchen to the ground floor with three bedrooms "
"* VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE * A well presented and spacious ground floor flat situated close to the heart of Sketty, Swansea. Accommodation includes; entrance hall, lounge, kitchen breakfast room, bedroom plus study. Externally there is a wrap around garden to front and side with enclosed rear garden ..."
Recently Refurbished | Georgian Maisonette | 3 Double Bedrooms | Walking Distance To The Sea Front | Sea Views | Off-Road Parking For One Car | 1582 Sq Ft | Two Bathrooms | Walking Distance To Local Amenities 
"A large traditional 3-bed semi-detached home with lots of potential. Inc spacious lounge dining room, kitchen, shower room with WC to ground floor. Three double bedrooms and bathroom to 1st floor, large plot, front and rear gardens with garage, sea views. Requires refurbishment. Council Tax Band F."
"***Video tour available*** A beautiful four bedroom middle terrace property for sale with no onward chain, recently refurbishment to a high standard. The property is conveniently located within walking distance of local schools, Swansea University, Swansea bay promenade, Singleton Hospital an..."
"A detached three bedroom split level property which is well presented throughout and situated in a convenient location being a short distance from the M4 motorway, out of town retail parks and the City Centre."
"Semi - Detached, Four Bedroom, Off Street Parking."
"This is a well-presented four-bedroom dormer bungalow in the sought after location of Wheatsheaf Drive, Ynysforgan. Located close to local amenities including schools, shops and the M4 motorway is only a 5 minute drive with great links to Cardiff & West Wales"
"Modern detached property. Four bedrooms (master en suite). Situated in a cul de sac location. Driveway and integral garage. Level enclosed garden. Convenient location for access to the M4, Morriston hospital and shopping in the enterprise park. Well presented throughout. "
"An established and traditional built three bedroom semi detached property situated along Voylart Road in the heart of Dunvant that offers itself as a wonderful family home. The accommodation comprises entrance hallway, lounge, dining room, modern fitted kitchen and shower room to the ground ..."
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND: E With no upward chain we offer for sale this double fronted four bedroom detached family home in a highly desirable location, in Bryngwyn village. With front and rear gardens, off road parking for one vehicle with an electric charging point plus a singl..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this 3 bedroom detached bungalow in the desired location of Clos Gwernen in Gowerton, Swansea, SA4.This property benefits from being in a sought after location, great transport links, local amenities just a short distance away and being within a school ..."
"
Three bedroom detached bungalow in the desired location of Lliw Valley Close, Swansea, SA4.
This property benefits from being in a sought after location, great transport links, local amenities just a short distance away and being within a school catchment area.
The property comprises of entrance..."
"Peter Alan Gorseinon are very pleased to offer a well presented 4 bedroom semi-detached house in the sought after area of Clos-Glanlliw, Pontlliw. Located in a quiet residential cul-de-sac with convenient links to the M4 motorway via junction 47."
"This well presented four bedroom detached property in Birchgrove, Swansea. Located in the popular Parc Brynheulog estate the property is close to local amenities including schools, parks and is only a short drive to the M4 motorway and Swansea City Centre."
"A well presented three bedroom detached property on a cul de sac within the Ffordd Scott estate Birchgrove. The property boasts off road parking and garage, enclosed rear garden, three bedrooms one of which has an en suite, two reception rooms and is situated ideally for schools, parks, M4, s..."
"A three bedrooms detached family home located within the popular location of Tircoed Village, Penllergaer. Accommodation includes; entrance hallway, WC, sitting room, lounge, dining room, kitchen, utility and store room to ground floor. To the first floor are three bedrooms, family bathroom and m..."
An established and traditional built three bedroom semi detached property situated along the main Gower Road in the heart of Killay that osffers itself as and ideal family home or iinvestment opportunity with the potential to develop further (subject to all the necessary planning consents). 
"THIS IS CALLING OUT TO ALL FIRST TIME BUYERS, COUPLES & FAMILIES ALIKE! IMMACULATELY PRESENTED TO A SHOW HOUSE STANDARD BENEFITING FROM A LOW MAINTENANCE REAR GARDEN DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE. Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale, what is in our opinion a great first time buyers, a family or ev..."
"A modern detached family home, located in a popular residential area. Offering good access to local amenities which include schools, local shops and Swansea City Centre where the main shopping and leisure facilities are located. We believe the property would make an ideal family home or buy ..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this lovely Detached Bungalow in the ever popular area of Cwmrhydyceirw. Offering 3 double bedrooms, a lounge /diner, kitchen, shower room, garage and driveway. There is a front garden and enclosed rear garden. Located conveniently for the M4, Morristo..."
"Please call Peter Alan Swansea on to book a viewing! An immaculately presented 3 bedroom detached family home offered for sale. Located in Fforestfach which is conveniently situated within close proximity to local shops, public transport links, M4 corridor, parks and schools."
"Step into this cosy and well-presented detached family home situated in the convenient location of Cwmrhydyceirw, Swansea."
"Council Tax Band - D We are excited to present this beautiful, 3 bedroom detached property located on the quiet cul de sac at Pen y Maes, Llangyfelach. Immaculately presented and boasting generous living areas, spacious bedrooms, off road parking and a garage. This property will appeal..."
"***Video tour available*** A well presented three storey four bedroom town house located within the sought after location of Parc Penderri, Penllergaer, close distance to Penllergaer woods, local schools, amenities and retail park. With easy access to the M4 with great transport to Carmarthen..."
"FREEHOLD Council Tax Band: C 360* Virtual Tour Available Online. WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN, we offer for sale this immaculate two bedroom detached bungalow, with off road parking for multiple vehicles and enclosed rear garden, in a highly desirable and sought after location ..."
"Detached bungalow situated on a popular development. Three bedrooms. Modernised kitchen with integrated appliances. Double glazing and gas combination central heating. Drive and garage. Low maintenance rear garden. Situated on a bus route. Convenient location for access to M4, hospital and shoppi..."
"Detached, Three Bedroom, No Onward Chain."
"Council Tax Band - D Located in the sought after area of Treboeth in Swansea, with local and convenient access to the city centre, the nearby retail parks, and a few minutes walking distance to schools. This beautiful property is located on a quiet road and has been designed to take full adv..."
"This property is a part refurbished four bedroom semi-detached house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated within close proximity to Morriston town, and good public transport links, Morriston hospital, M4 corridor and a short walk to Morriston park. Viewing is highly recommended."
"The home is located in a Quiet cul-de-sac location within a popular residential area. Convenient for the M4. This three bedroom detached house situated in the popular residential area of Fforestfach, Swansea. A well presented home with excellent open views from the front and rear aspect."
"A well presented three bedroom semi-detached house offered for sale with tenant in situ and no ongoing chain. Situated in the popular residential area of Sketty, Swansea, Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing or book 24/7 on our website. Ideal investor opportunity."
"An immaculate modern four-bedroom end link property located on an attractive development, which is positioned approximately a 5 minute walk to Swansea City Centre.  This very well-presented property has light and spacious accommodation laid out on three floors and comprises entrance "
"A mid terrace three bedroom property which is situated in a sought after residential location enjoying a pleasant outlook over De La Beche Park, and being within walking distance of all the amenities of Sketty, Singleton Park, the University and "
"Detached, Three Bedroom, Off Street Parking."
""" Location, Location, Location"" Offered For Sale With No On Going Chain!
Sought After Development! Come and enjoy city life by the river with a rare opportunity to buy an immaculately presented 3 bedroom property on arguably one of the best estates closest to the city centre. Built on this rec..."
"FREEHOLD Council Tax Band: D 360* Virtual Tour Available Online Set on the outskirts of Gorseinon town and conveniently located with just a short walk to all the local amenities, including Health Centre, shops & Gorseinon Hospital. We offer for sale this two bedroom det..."
"This three bedroom semi-detached property on the sought after Vicarage Rd, Morriston. Conveniently located close to local amenities plus good access the M4 motorway and the DVLA."
"SS0186. Well-presented and spacious extended - three-bedroom detached family home with garage located within a sought-after residential location in Morriston providing excellent access to the M4 corridor, Morriston Hospital and the DVLA.
"
"This beautifully presented three bedroom detached property is located in the sought after village of Loughor. The neighbouring town Gorseinon offers plenty of amenities such as superstores, pubs, primary and secondary schools. Viewing is highly recommend and by appointment only."
"An immaculately presented 4 bedroom semi detached house offered for sale. Situated in a Cul-De-Sac in Penlan and within close proximity to local shops, schools, public transport links and Morriston hospital. Please call Peter Alan Swansea on to arrange a viewing or book 24/7 online."
"A well presented 3 bedroom detached house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated within close proximity to local shops, public transport links, schools and Swansea City centre. Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing or book 24/7 on our website."
"Detached bungalow situated on a very sought after development. Three bedrooms. Lounge and separate dining area. Double glazing and gas central heating. Driveway for several vehicles and a detached garage. Convenient position for access to M4, hospital and shopping in Morriston centre. No chain."
"Bay fronted detached residence situated. Three bedrooms. Kitchen/dining room. Double glazing and gas combination heating. Driveway and garage. Enclosed rear garden with large decked seating area. Views over Swansea valley from the rear. Convenient for M4, hospital and shopping in Morriston centre. "
This spacious three bedroom semi-detached property located in Llansamlet in Swansea. The property is located behind double gates set back off the road and sits on a large plot with superb surroundings and drive way for several cars.
"Rare opportunity to purchase this well presented 3 bedroom detached bungalow located on the popular Jersey Road in Bonymaen. The property enjoys easy access to Swansea City Centre, Swansea Enterprise Park, Liberty Stadium, the M4 Motorway, schools and an array of local amenities
This spacious fam..."
"An extended 3 bedroom detached property situated along Priors Way in the Heart of Dunvant that offers itself as a wonderful family home or first time purchase. The accommodation comprises entrance porch, cloakroom, hallway, a good size light and airy lounge/dining room with patio doors openi..."
"This detached three bedroom bungalow is located in Morriston, Swansea. The properties location means it has easy access to Morriston park, the M4 motorway, Morriston hospital and the DVLA all around 10 minutes drive away."
"We are pleased to present this 3 bedroom terraced house located in the city of Swansea The property consists of – Living room, Kitchen/diner, Three bedrooms, Bathroom and WC This property offers well-proportioned accommodation arranged over two floors and is situated close to daily amenit..."
"A Six bed HMO investment property located within 1 mile of the city centre and approx 1.5 miles from Swansea University Bay campus. This well maintained property is current earning approx £24,000 per annum (Gross), with tenants in situ until July 2023. Inc; modern kitchen, dining room, two ..."
"A period extended semi-detached property of good proportions that has been tastefully modernised and refurbished throughout by the current owner. The property is situated in the village of Gowerton, a popular area for all buyers as there are amenities, schools (both Welsh and English), shops and ..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this lovely detached three bedroom bungalow which is situated in a popular and quiet residential cul de sac. Situated within close proximity to Swansea City centre, out of town retail parks and the M4 motorway.
Benefiting from having a large lounge/din..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this three storey Home of Multiple Occupancy, licensed property situated in Mount Pleasant. Currently, the property is set up as five studio flats achieving approximately £2,680 pcm. The rent is inclusive of bills and the electric is metered per f..."
"Council Tax Band - E John Francis Sketty are excited to bring to the market this three bedroom semi-detached townhouse situated in the popular Llwyn Teg, Fforestfach. This modern property benefits from off road parking and detached garage. Downstairs, you are welcomed with a home..."
"A well presented 5 bedroom detached house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated within close proximity to local shops, public transport links, schools and M4 corridor. This ideal family home further benefits; off road parking, gas central heating and a garage. Please call Peter Alan."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom Detached famil home, in the SA1 postcode and sought after estate in Port Tennant. Having a hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner and w.c. to the ground floor. To the first floor there are, 3 double bedrooms and a master en-suite shower room, ..."
"An end of terrace three bedroom property which is immaculately presented throughout being situated in a popular residential location. The accommodation comprises cloaks, open plan kitchen / lounge and conservatory to the ground floor with three bedrooms and family bathroom to "
"The Shaldon is a stunning new home featuring off-road parking, an open-plan kitchen/dining area with french doors to the rear garden, plus an en-suite to bedroom 1. Set in an ideal village location around 6 miles from Swansea city centre. "
"+++ Vendor in process of buying freehold ++++ A spacious extended detached modern property with integral garage and off road parking. Situated on the Elba housing estate, a popular location for many of buyers. The accommodation comprises of entrance hallway, cloakroom, open plan lo..."
***360° Virtual Tour Available*** A very well presented three bedroom semi detached property that offers itself as an ideal family home or first time purcase that has been recently refurbished to a high standard by the current owners. Conveniently situated in a quiet cul-de-sa...
"A deceptively spacious three storey mid terrace Georgian style property located on Broadmead, Killay. The accommodation consists of an entrance hallway, family lounge, kitchen/dining room on the ground floor. On the lower ground floor there is a further hallway with access to the rear g..."
"A SPACIOUS home in Gorseinon, available CHAIN FREE, ideal for INVESTORS or GROWING FAMILIES. Call to enquire! Bettermove are delighted to present this charming three bedroom detached house in Gorseinon, available with no forward chain. The property benefits from ne..."
"Peter Alan are delighted to bring to market this four bedroom semi-detached house which is situated in the village of Penllergaer which is close proximity to the M4 access to junction 47, Penllergaer Primary School and local amenities including shops and restaurants."
"A 4 bedroom mid-terraced property offered for sale with sit in tenant and no ongoing chain. Located in Brynmill, Swansea. The property is conveniently located for Swansea University, Swansea City Centre and all local amenities. This is an ideal investment opportunity. Please call Peter Alan Swansea."
"Council Tax Band: C FREEHOLD 360* Virtual Tour Available Online. With no upward chain, we offer for sale this ideal family home in the centre of Gorseinon, within walking distance of all the local amenities, including bus station, park, shops, restaurants, schools, coll..."
A spacious three bedroom end of terrace property situated in a popular location close to the City Centre and a few minutes’ walk to Swansea Bay sea front promenade. The well-proportioned family home has the considerable advantage of a double 
"A three bedroom semi detached property which is set in a cul de sac location in the popular residential area of Dunvant.  The property has been beautifully maintained and comprises entrance porch, lounge, dining room and fitted kitchen to the "
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale, this semi-detached family home. The extended property is situated within a popular quiet location with good access to local shops, amenities, Fforestfach retail park, transport links and the M4. Viewing is highly recommended to fully appreciate all ..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this well presented 3 bedroom house, superbly located for the train station and with local shops and amenities close by. You also have the choice of Welsh and English medium schools. The property benefits from having an en-suite, integral garage and kitc..."
"A three bedroom semi detached home in the highly sought after location of Sketty, Swansea, SA2.
This desirable home has been modernised and benefits from being within several school catchment areas, boasts spacious accommodation with low maintenance garden to the rear of the property. location be..."
"A semi detached property that has recently received modernisation and upgrading to a high standard. The accommodation has a hallway, cloakroom, family lounge and open plan modern kitchen/dining room. On the first floor are three bedrooms and a contemporary bathroom. Other benefits ..."
"**Ideal Family Home * 4 Bedroom Semi Detached House * Sun Room * Front & Rear Garden * Garage** We are delighted to offer for sale this four-bedroom semi-detached house located in the heart of Sketty, offering the potential as a welcoming home just a short walk from Sketty high street and Singleton "
"FOR SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION - Lot 64 - Property for Investment; ONLINE AUCTION from 7th MARCH-9th MARCH A three bed maisonette apartment located in a convenient location, close to all amenities and within close proximity to the beach front. This bay fronted apartment is ideal for those l..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer to the market this modern, three bedroom, end of terrace property in the popular location of Morriston. Conveniently located within close proximity to local shops, amenities, schools as well as excellent road links to Morfa Retail Park, Swansea City Centre and..."
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND: C 360* Virtual Tour Available Online We offer for sale, what we consider to be a well presented three bedroom, semi-detached property, set back off the road with front and rear gardens and the added benefit of parking for two vehicles. The ..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this 3 bedroom semi-detached house located in the ever popular Parc Penllegaer location. With off road parking, garage converted to sitting room or could be used as an office or even a 4th bedroom, to mention just some of the features. The property has ..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this well presented three bedroom semi- detached family home in an excellent location with easy access to the M4, Morriston Hospital, good local schools and close to the DVLA. This is a LEASEHOLD PROPERTY - details on request. There is NO FORWARD CHAIN..."
"A three bedroom semi detached home in the highly sought after location of Lon Mefus, Swansea, SA2.
This desirable home has been recently renovated and benefits from being within a school catchment area, and boasts a conservatory, large garden with pond, and fantastic views of Swansea Bay.
The pro..."
"Modernised detached bungalow. Three bedrooms. New kitchen and bathroom. Double glazing and gas combination heating. Driveway. Convenient for M4, hospital and shopping in the enterprise park. Available with no chain. Solar panels at the property will reduce electricity costs. Council tax band C"
***360° Virtual Tour Available*** A three bedroom semi detached property with driveway parking and single detached garage with the added advantage of a larger than average enclosed south facing garden that has the potential to develop further (subject to all the necessary planning ...
"A well presented 3 bedroom detached family home located on a popular development in Gorseinon. The property is close to Gorseinon Town Centre with plenty of amenities such as supermarkets, pubs, shops and Welsh and English Primary and Secondary schools."
"Peter Alan Gorseinon are pleased to present this 3 bedroom town house property located on the popular development in Bryngwyn Village, Gorseinon. The property is situated close to Gorseinon Town Centre with a range of local amenities such as supermarkets, shops and restaurants"
"A three bedroom semi detached home in the highly sought after location of Dunvant, Swansea, SA2.
This desirable home has been modernised, with a conservatory added and benefits from being within several school catchment areas, boasts spacious accommodation with an enclosed rear garden. The home i..."
"Council Tax Band - D Are You Looking For An Investment Property? Then This Is The Property For You. Situated in the popular Brynymor, this six bedroom property end of terrace property with plenty of off road parking and low maintence garden, this property is the perfect buy-to-let inves..."
"***360° Virtual Tour Available*** A three bedroom semi detached dormer style property situated in the heart of Killay within easy reach of all the local shops and amenities of the Killay precinct, as are all good schools with the added advantage of Woodcote Park and the cycle track..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this lovely semi-detached bungalow with 3 bedrooms and off road parking. Situated in the residential area of Treboeth, close to Gwyrosydd Primary School and a range of local amenities. This area offers good access to the City Centre and the M4 motorway.
..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this 3 bedroom semi-detached house in the heart of Gorseinon. Close to all local amenities and good access the the M4, Swansea and Llanelli.
The property offers off road parking and a garage. There is NO FORWARD CHAIN involved in the sale of this prope..."
"Brought to the market by Yopa Swansea is this well-maintained 3 bedroom family home situated in the desirable location of Treboeth. The property benefits from 3 good size bedrooms, a modern kitchen, driveway & garage to the rear, front & rear gardens and has no onward chain."
"Offered with no ongoing chain, is this well presented three bedroom, semi detached dormer bungalow. Benefiting from modern kitchen/breakfast room, ground floor bathroom, flexible accommodation, driveway and single car garage, along with a substantial rear garden. Situated in a convenient locat..."
"FREEHOLD Council Tax Band: C 360* Virtual Tour Available Online. With no upward chain, we offer for sale this two bedroom semi-detached bungalow, with detached garage and front and rear gardens. Located in the village of Loughor, within walking distance of schools, college,..."
"FREEHOLD Council Tax Band: D Set within a development of similar properties, we offer for sale this well presented three bedroom mid terraced town house. Approximately three years old this house benefits from lounge, kitchen / dining room with patio doors leading to the enclosed..."
"A three bedroom semi detached property located along Woodcote in the heart of Killay within a short walk of the local park and the cycle track of Clyne. The accommodation has an entrance hallway, generous size light and airy lounge, modern fitted kitchen and dining room to the ground floor"
"* Video tour available * A modern three storey 4 bedroom town house situated within a popular modern estate in Port Tennant, Swansea. Accommodation includes: entrance hallway, WC, kitchen, lounge dining room to ground floor, two bedrooms and Jack and Jill family bathroom to 1st floor, a further ..."
"COUNCIL TAX BAND - C A spacious family home or first time buy situated in the ever-popular area of Llansamlet. We are pleased to offer to the market this good size bungalow with three bedrooms, large living area, spacious bathroom and kitchen all on the same floor. To the re..."
A THIRD FLOOR TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT BENEFITING FROM TWO PRIVATE BALCONIES Pantygwydr Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 33 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by a lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points ...
"A 5 bedroom HMO offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Located in the popular residential area of Brynmill, Swansea and situated conveniently to Singleton University Campus, Uplands, Swansea beach front, Singleton hospital and Swansea City centre. This is an ideal investment opportunity."
A Three bedroom property with off road parking and garage with no ongoing chain. Positioned with excellent access to local schools and amenities and good links to the major A roads. Ideal first time purchase.
"***Video tour available*** A three bedroom semi detached property offered for sale with no onward chain. Ideally located in the popular area of Morriston. Close to local schools, shops and amenities, with great transport links to Swansea City Centre, Morfa retail Parc and the M4. The a..."
"An immaculately presented recently renovated 2 bedroom semi detached house offered for sale. Situated within close proximity to local shops, public transport links, schools and Swansea City centre. Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing or book 24/7 on our website."
"Council Tax Band - C John Francis Sketty are pleased to bring to the market this stunning end of terrace property situated on Vivian Road, Sketty. In excellent location, this property offers convenient access to local amenities and shops situated just down the road. Downsta..."
"A very well presented two bedroom apartment situated in the popular and sought after McCarthy & Stone development at Pantygwydr Court. The apartment is conveniently located for all the local amenities the Uplands has to offer including local shops, restaurants and bus routes. It is located on..."
"An extended 3 double bed mid terraced family home situated in a coastal location, Includes: spacious lounge, kitchen dining room, 1st floor 4-piece bathroom, front and rear gardens, outbuilding. The property is a short stroll away from Swansea Bay, Marina, City Centre, Swansea entertainment aren..."
This is a lovely Two Bedroom Cottage of superior quality situated in an established setting with an eye catching semi rural back drop. There are local amenities at the nearby village of Gowerton with Swansea City Centre only a fifteen minute drive away. Road links to the delightful Gower Peninsul...
EER D64 Council Tax Band D A lovely two bedroomed home is offered for sale in the ever popular West Cross. The property has been well maintained and updated over the years to include a downstairs shower room and further reception room. The accommodation briefly comprises two ...
"This traditional three bedroom detached house is offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated in Morriston centre and within walking distance to local schools, shops and transport links."
"***360° Virtual Tour Available*** An extremely well presented and extended three bedroom semi detached property with garage and off parking. The property offers itself as a wonderful first time purchase or family home and is located on Brithwen Road, Waunarlwydd where amenit..."
"A spacious 3 double bedroom maisonette located in a private location within Uplands, Swansea. Includes entrance hallway, spacious lounge dining room, modern kitchen, two shower rooms, separate WC. Externally is access to well maintained communal gardens and allocated parking. The property is walk..."
"Peter Alan Gorseinon are pleased to offer this 3 bedroom semi-detached property to the market in the popular location of Penyrheol road, Gorseinon. Located close to schools, shops and other local amenities, plus good transport links to the M4 motorway."
"John Francis is excited to bring to the market this well presented Four bedroom family home, in the sought-after Springfield Street, Morriston. This beautiful family home offers extensive living accommodation, with charming original features and a modern twist. There are multiple living rooms, as..."
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND C 360* Virtual Tour Online. An ideal opportunity to purchase a three bedroom property, situated within the popular 'Parc Penllergaer' development. This freehold property benefits from a gas central heating system and double-glazing and briefl..."
"EER 72 Council Tax Band D A well maintained family sized home. Accommodation comprises two reception rooms, kitchen downstairs shower room and separate WC, four bedrooms and bathroom upstairs. Externally there is an enclosed low maintenance patio garden . Ambleside ..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this traditional 2 bedroom mid terrace property situated in this very popular and sought after location within walking distance of the vibrant Uplands with its many bars and restaurants, and close to both Swansea University and Singleton Hospital. Ther..."
Purplebricks are pleased to offer this excellent 4 bedroom HMO property in a great location with tenants currently in situ until 30th June 2023. This spacious mid terrace property has the bonus of a loft room. Located in the ever popular SA1 - St. Thomas area. Viewing is highly recommended to fu...
"Immaculate two double bedroom modern semi detached property, located within walking distance of the Swansea train Station, City Centre and River walks linking to SA1 and the ever popular Marina. Location benefits from being within close proximity to the M4 and University Campus.
The well present..."
"This Stunning 2 bedroom bungalow sits in a lovely quiet cul-de-sac in Grovesend, with large reception rooms, a large garden, great access to facilities and motorways. area. Viewing is highly recommended please contact our Gorseinon office on "
Council Tax Band - C John Francis are glad to bring to the market this beautifully presented two bedroom upper floor flat located in Richmond Court. Nestled in the quiet area of Uplands with gorgeous views down onto Ffynone Close and across to the Swansea Bay. Comprising of a larg...
"***Video tour available*** We are pleased to bring to the market a three bedroom semi detached property situated in the sought area of Cockett. Conveniently located to local schools, shops and amenities. With great transport links to Swansea City Centre, FForestfach Retail Parc and the M4 c..."
"A modern semi-detached home located within the popular location of Treboeth, Swansea. Includes: spacious through lounge dining room, utility area and kitchen to ground floor, three bedrooms and bathroom to first floor. Externally are front and enclosed rear gardens with detached garage and drivew..."
"An Impressive Investment Property In Prime Residential Area! Currently used as two properties, a studio apartment to the lower ground floor and a two bed house with attic room above. The property is well presented and neutrally decorated through-out. Further benefits include a good sized rea..."
"* Coming Soon * A 3 bed plus attic room semi-detached home, includes; entrance hallway, spacious lounge dining room, kitchen and bathroom to ground floor. Bed 1 (ensuite shower room), Bedroom 2 (ensuite WC), Bedroom 3 to 1st floor. Enclosed rear garden, detached garage, scope to convert to accomm..."
A two bedroom end of terrace property that occupies a larger than average corner plot with the added advantage of 2 allocated off road parking spaces. Built by Wilcon Homes situated in the ever popular Hendrefoilan Woods estate in the heart of Killay that offers itself as an ideal first time purc...
"A charming traditional bay windowed semi-detached home with large garage/workshop situated within walking distance of the City Centre. The well appointed accommodation includes: entrance hallway, lounge, dining room and kitchen to ground floor. To the first floor are three bedrooms, bathroom and ..."
"Detached bungalow situated on a popular development. Two double bedrooms. Double glazing and gas central heating. Level garden. Driveway for several vehicles. Convenient location for access to the M4, hospital and shopping in Morriston centre. Available with no onward chain. Council tax band C."
"Council Tax Band - B John Francis is pleased to bring to the market this exceptional end of terrace property situated in the popular Manselton. This rare opportunity of a property to this scale has come up and it is not to be missed!! Comprising of three large reception rooms, a ..."
"Astleys are delighted to bring to the market this beautifully presented two bedroom semi detached property located on a sought after development within Llangyfelach. The property situated in a cul-de-sac, which boasts off road parking for several cars, conservatory and rear enclosed garden. C..."
A three bedroom semi detached property situated along the main Gorwydd Road in the heart of Gowerton that offers itself as an ideal first time purchase or investment opportunity with the added advantage of the potential to develop further (subject to all the necessary planning consents)opportunit...
EER 57 Council Tax Band D A deceptively spacious property conveniently located with easy access to Mumbles Village and The promenade with the local beaches of the Gower and Swansea City Centre a short drive away. The Accommodation is set over two floors with staircase leading down...
"Immaculate two double bedroom modern mid terrace property, located within walking distance of the Train Station, City Centre and River walks linking to SA1 and the Marina. Convenient for the M4 and University Campus. The well proportioned property briefly comprises; entrance hallway, fitted kitch..."
"A deceptively spacious extended end of terrace property that has been refurbished to a high standard. The accommodation has a generous size lounge/dining room, contemporary style kitchen/breakfast room to the ground floor. On the first floor are two double bedrooms and one single bedroo..."
"FREEHOLD Council Tax Band C 360* Virtual Tour Available Online. With no onward chain, we offer for sale this three bedroom property with lounge, dining room, kitchen and bathroom and an enclosed rear garden. The property also benefits from a driveway for a number of ..."
"A two bedroom upper floor apartment located in a vibrant area of SA1 offered for sale with sit in tenant. The property is within close proximity to local restaurants, bars and shops whilst also convenient for the University Bay Campus & M4 corridor. Please call Peter Alan to book."
"FREEHOLD Council Tax Band: C 360* Virtual Tour Available Online We offer for sale, this three bedroom semi-detached family home, set within the ever popular Garden Village area of Gorseinon. With two reception rooms including a substantial lounge/dining room and a sep..."
"Semi detached property situated on popular development. Three bedrooms. Kitchen/breakfast room. Double glazing and gas combination heating. Parking and single garage. Rear pedestrian access. Views towards woodland and over Swansea valley from the rear. Convenient for M4, hospital and local schools. "
"Peter Alan are proud to present this beautiful 3-bedroom semi-detached property in Penyrheol, Gorseinon. Viewing is highly recommended to truly appreciate this property. The area provides a short commute to both Penyrheol Primary and Comprehensive schools, Gorseinon high street and the M4"
"A well presented 3 bedroom detached house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated in Fforestfach and within close proximity to local shops, public transport links and schools. Please contact Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing or book 24/7 on our website."
"Purplebricks offer to the market, with no ongoing chain this semi detached, two bedroom property in the popular location of West Cross. Conveniently located just a short walk to neighbouring shops and eateries and only a short drive to Mumbles village where an array of local amenities, cafés and..."
"Offered with no ongoing chain is this beautifully presented two bedroom detached property benefiting from a modern kitchen/diner, conservatory, w/c, long rear garden and garage. Set in a popular location close to Fforestfach Retail Parc with easy access to the M4 and the City Centre. View..."
"Well pesented two double bedroom modern terraced property, located within the popular location of Heol Y Celyn, Swansea, SA7.
Location benefits from being within close proximity to the M4, local amenities and quiet location.
The well presented property briefly comprises; entrance, living room, ki..."
"A well presented 3 double bedroom detached house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated within close proximity to local shops, public transport links, schools and the M4 corridor. Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing on or book 24/7 on our website."
"A three bedroom end link home located within a very popular location within Fforestfach, Swansea. Accommodation includes: entrance hall, lounge dining room and modern kitchen to ground floor. To the first floor are three bedroom and bathroom. Externally the property has a driveway, front garden a..."
"***COMING SOON - The Brunel Wood Apartments is a stunning new development from Hygrove Homes*** Apartments will be ready for occupation from late 2023. They are situated on the periphery of the popular residential development of Brunel Wood nestled in the heart of Swansea, rig..."
"New to the market for 2023!
Three bedroom semi-detached property situated in the popular village of Waunarlwydd. Ideal location for local amenities, great transport links across Swansea and within school catchment areas.
The home comprises of entrance porch, lounge, kitchen/dining area, downstair..."
"John Francis are excited to bring to the market this two bedroom mid terrace property located in this very popular and convenient location, within walking distance of all the amenities Sketty has to offer, including the local college. The property is in an excellent catchment area for both primar..."
"***Video tour available*** A three bedroom end of terrace property offered for sale with no onward chain in the sought after residential area of Sketty within close proximity to Singleton Hospital, the University, good transport links to Swansea City Centre and Uplands, excellent school catch..."
"We are pleased to bring to the market this three bedroom semi detached property in the ever popular town of Morriston. The property boasts three bedrooms, loft room, enclosed rear garden, off road parking and is located ideally for schools, DVLA,, supermarkets, M4 and local amenities making i..."
"End of terrace property. Three bedrooms. Double glazing and gas central heating. Enclosed rear garden. Driveway and garage. Available with no onward chain. Convenient location for access to the M4, Morriston hospital and shopping in Morriston centre. Ideal first purchase or buy to let. Council tax B"
"A 3 bedroom mid-terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated in Swansea, within walking distance to town centre, local shops, public transport links, local bars, restaurants and Swansea beach fronts. This is an ideal first time or investor opportunity. Call Peter Alan to book."
"**Ideal First Time Buyers Property**Well presented two double bedroom semi detached property, this well presented home consists of lounge/diner with French doors to low maintenance rear garden, cloakroom & bathroom. In our opinion this is an ideal first time buy . Viewing highly recommended. ..."
"A well presented one or two bedroom detached bungalow offered for sale located in Morriston, Swansea. Situated just a short distance from Morriston town centre, local transport links and local schools."
"A 3 bedroom semi detached house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated in Cockett a sought after location for its convenience to local shops, schools and public transport links. Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing or book 24/7 on our website."
"*** Video tour available*** A two bedroom semi detached property offered for sale in a cul-de-sac located in the popular area of Birchgrove. The property is close to local amenities including schools, parks and shops, a short drive to the M4 motorway, with good transport links to Swansea C..."
"An immaculately presented two double bedroom home located in the sought after village of Birchgrove, Swansea and is situated in a cul-de-sac within a few minutes to the M4 corridor, local schools, and local amenities."
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND C 360* Virtual Tour Online NO ONWARD CHAIN Set in a quiet cul de sac location conveniently situated on the outskirts of Gorseinon, we offer for sale this two bedroom property, benefitting from a reception room, kitchen and bathroom a..."
"Set on a quiet residential street this three bedroom mid-terrace property situated in a popular and sought after spot in Port Tennant, benefitting from easy access to Swansea's Bay University and City Centre. We feel this would make an ideal first time buy or investment, and boasts gre..."
"Council Tax Band - D John Francis are excited to bring to the open market this three bedroom semi detached property situated in Sketty. Comprising of two large reception rooms and a spacious kitchen downstairs. Upstairs, there are three fabulous sized bedrooms and a good sized f..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this two bedroom ground floor apartment situated in the popular Swansea Marina, offering views across the Marina. The property comprises of, an entrance hallway, lounge area with balcony (overlooking the Marina), into kitchen area, 2 bedrooms and bathroo..."
An attractive Two Bedroom Second Floor Flat for age group 60 and over in an impressive purpose built development close to the lovely community and shopping centre of Uplands. There are excellent road links to Swansea City Centre and to The Gower Peninsular while the wonderful parks of Brynmill an...
"A 4-storey mid terraced property situated within a popular location. Includes; 3 double bedrooms, 3 reception rooms, kitchen, shower room, enclosed rear garden, requires some refurbishment, close to Swansea Bay, Parks and Swansea University. No chain. Council Tax Band D."
"Show Home Open by appointment Only. Brand new ground floor 2 bedroom apartment, available on the extremely popular Brunel Wood site. With its low maintenance and convenient location this apartment would suit and investor or anyone with a busy lifestyle. Parking space included! FOR FUR..."
"Show Home Open by appointment Only. Brand new first floor 2 bedroom apartment, available on the extremely popular Brunel Wood site. With its low maintenance and convenient location this apartment would suit and investor or anyone with a busy lifestyle. Parking space included! FOR FURT..."
"A well presented 2 bedroom apartment offered for sale with no ongoing chain and sit in tenant. Situated within close proximity to local shops, public transport links and Swansea beach front. To the outside there is allocated parking for 1 vehicle. Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing."
"A spacious two bedroom ground floor apartment in this popular residential development of Brunel Wood nestled in the heart of Swansea, right on the doorstep of all the social and shopping amenities and employment this vibrant city has to offer. The apartment will have a contemporary style..."
"A spacious two bedroom first floor apartment in the popular residential development of Brunel Wood nestled in the heart of Swansea, right on the doorstep of all the social and shopping amenities and employment this vibrant city has to offer. The apartment will have a contemporary styled ..."
"Council Tax Band - C NO ONWARD CHAIN John Francis are pleased to bring to the market this three bedroom details property situated in the popular Lon Enfys, Llansamlet. In an excellent location, this property offers close links to the M4, local amenties and shops. Boast..."
"A spacious family home or first time buy situated in the ever-popular road of Lon Enfys. We are pleased to offer to the market this good size, traditional property with three bedrooms, open plan living area and upstairs bathroom. To the rear there is mostly laid to lawn with a small pa..."
"Situated in the heart of the lovely suburb of Port Tennant, this spacious mid-terrace house would be ideal for both first time buyers and buy-to-let investors alike. The property has been upgraded and redecorated by the current owners, and boasts family space including two reception rooms an..."
"Peter Alan are pleased to present to the sales market this two bedroom, second floor apartment located within easy reach of the beach and enjoys views over the Marina from the rear. The accommodation comprises of: Hallway, lounge with sit-out balcony, fitted kitchen with appliances,"
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Detached Bungalow Four Bedroom...
"A well-presented recently decorated two bedroom terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated in the popular Parc Bryn Heulog Estate in Birchgrove and within close proximity to local shops, schools and M4 corridor."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom end of terrace property with breathtaking panoramic views of Swansea. Located on the sought after Trewyddfa Road, within walking distance of Morriston Town, Liberty Stadium and short drive from schools, hospital, local amenities and easy access to M4. The..."
"Viewing Recommended! Peter Alan Swansea has the pleasure to introduce this two bedroom third floor apartment located in a vibrant area of SA1. The property is within close proximity to local restaurants, bars & shops whilst also convenient for the University Bay Campus & M4 Corridor."
"An immaculately presented, recently renovated 4 bedroom terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated within walking distance to Swansea City centre, public transport links and local shops. Please call Peter Alan Swansea on to arrange a viewing or book 24/7 online."
"VIEWINGS AVAILABLE 23/3 ONWARDS - We are proud to offer this Two Bedroom Mid Terrace House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £160,000 - £170,000*"
"Freehold Council Tax Band: B 360* Virtual Tour Available Online. We offer for sale this two bedroom semi-detached house situated in the popular village of Penllergaer. Set off the road with garden and driveway to the front, this property briefly comprises entrance hall..."
"Traditional semi detached property. Two/three bedrooms. Two reception rooms. Double glazing and gas central heating. Large basement area. Large parking area and garage/workshop to the rear. Convenient location for access to the M4, hospital and shopping. Available with no chain. Council tax band B."
"A three bedroom mid link property that offers itself as an ideal first time purchase, family home or investment opportunity. The accommodation comprises entrance hallway, lounge, dining room and fitted kitchen to the ground floor, whilst to the first floor there are 3 bedrooms and a bathroom..."
"COUNCIL TAX BAND 360* Virtual Tour Available Online. Conveniently situated on the outskirts of Gorseinon, this three bedroom property benefits from two reception rooms, kitchen and an upstairs bathroom as well as an enclosed rear garden. The property also benefits from..."
Modern mid link property with views of the River Tawe. 3 double bedrooms and spacious lounge/diner. Enclosed low maintenance garden to rear. in walking distance of Ystradgynlais Town Centre with its many amenities. Popular location built 22 years ago on the site of the Old Butchers Arms.
"A lovely three bedroom middle terraced property in the ever popular area of Manselton. The property has a good size kitchen/dining room, enclosed rear garden and is situated ideally for schools, Morfa and Fforestfach retail parks, Swansea.com stadium, parks, shops and local amenities making i..."
"A spacious three bedroom semi detached property with good links to City Centre and M4. The property has a detached garage, enclosed rear garden, conservatory and is situated ideally for schools, parks, Morfa retail park shops and local amenities making it a perfect family home or first time p..."
"Family home located in the sought after location of Millwood Street SA5.
This property location benefits are things such as great transport links, local amenities and being within school catchment area.
The ground floor comprises of entrance porch leading to large Living room area, Kitchen and sh..."
"A well presented, recently renovated 4 bedroom end terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated in Landore, sought after for it's convenient links to local shops, schools and public transport links. This is an ideal first time or investment opportunity. Please call to book."
"This one bedroom apartment situated in Maritime Quarter, Swansea. The property is conveniently located close to local amenities including bars, restaurants, leisure centre and close to Swansea City Centre. Viewing Highly Recommended!"
"A well presented three bedroom mid terraced house offered for sale with no on-going chain. Conveniently located to local amenities, Swansea City Centre, access to the M4 corridor and Fforestfach Retail Park. Further benefits; gas central heating and double glazing and is modern throughout."
"John Francis are pleased to announce to the market this three bedroom mid-terrace property in Landore that is being offered with NO CHAIN. Comprising of three reception rooms, kitchen, study, bathroom & shower room, two double bedrooms and a single bedroom. This property requires moderni..."
Brand New Park Home (36'x20') | FULLY FURNISHED | Traditionally Styled Park Home | Contemporary Fitted Kitchen | Master Bedroom with En suite | Excellent Location and Established Friendly Community | Private Parking | Close to Local Amenities | Part Exchange Available
"Mid link property. Two double bedrooms. Kitchen/breakfast room. Double glazing and gas combination heating. Conservatory. Driveway. Convenient for M4, hospital and shopping in Morriston centre. Available with no onward chain. Ideal first purchase or buy to let. Council tax band B."
"FREEHOLD Council Tax Band: B 360* Virtual Tour Available Online We offer for sale, this three bedroom end terrace family home, set within the ever popular town of Gorseinon. With three reception rooms including two reception rooms and a dining room. The property also..."
"Council Tax Band - C John Francis Sketty is excited to bring to the market this two bedroom, well presented property located in Sarlou Court, Uplands. Comprising of two bedrooms one of which is a good sized double and the second a single. The living/dining area is a fabulous size and b..."
"**360 VITUAL TOUR AVAILABLE*** Council Tax Band - John Francis are pleased to bring to the market this three bedroom, mid terrace property situated in the popular Portia Terrace. Having recently undergone full refurbishment, this property requires no work and can be moved s..."
"Council Tax Band - B John Francis is pleased to bring to the market this two bedroom end of terrace property situated in the fabulous location of Waun-Y-Pistyll, Treboeth. Benefiting from the bigger plot, this property benefits from a large garden with side access from the front pedestr..."
"Calling All First Time Buyers! This beautifully presented family home is located on the outskirts of Swansea’s’ cosmopolitan city centre. The current owners have created a gorgeous and tranquil property, ready to move straight into. By opening up the accommodation, they have prod..."
"Council Tax Band - C We are pleased to bring to the market this immaculate one bedroom flat located on the beachfront on Oystermouth Road. Prevously rented, this property boasts character perfect for the seafront. For sale fully furnished, this property is perfect for someone loo..."
"A three bedroom terrace home situated conveniently for Morriston Town, M4, DVLA, Hospital and schools. The accommodation comprises to the ground floor of an entrance hall, lounge/dining room, kitchen/breakfast room and bathroom. On the first floor you will find three bedrooms and a show..."
"New to the market for 2023!
This two bedroom mid-terrace property is situated in the popular village of Waunarlwydd. Ideally set for local amenities, great road links throughout Swansea and within school catchment areas.
The home comprises of entrance porch, lounge and kitchen leading to rear enc..."
A two bedroom end of terrace property occupying a corner plot situated in quiet cul-de-sac location of similar properties in this popular and sought after residential area of the Elba in the heart of Gowerton that offers itself as an ideal first time purchase or investment opportunity. The a...
"A well presented 1 bedroom 3rd floor apartment offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated in Maritime Quarter which is sought after for it's short walking distance to local shops, bars, restaurants and the beach front. Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing or book online."
"This four bedroom mid-terraced property in the popular residential area of Plasmarl, Swansea. Good transport links which are convenient for access to Swansea City Centre, Morriston Town Centre, The Swansea.com Stadium, local schools, and The M4 motorway."
"Council Tax Band - B John Francis are pleased to bring to the market this well-presented three bedroom mid-terrace property situated in Verig Street, Manselton. On entrance, you are welcomed with a modern yet homely feel. The living/dining area is a fabulous size and benefits fro..."
"If You're Looking For A Glorious Garden, Period Features With A Twist Of Modern - Then Look No Further! The current owner has presented and up kept this property to a high standard, making it ready to move straight into. This traditional mid-terrace property has been styled perfectly to comp..."
"A three bedroom end terrace property in need of modernisation in the sought after area of Manselton. The property has three double bedrooms, two reception rooms, enclosed rear garden and is located ideally for schools, Morfa retail park, stadium, City Centre, shops and local amenities making ..."
"FOR SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION 17th May 2023. A semi-detached cottage in need of updating conveniently located for the out of town shopping complex at Fforestfach and with easy access to Swansea City Centre, M4 corridor at Penllergaer Junction 47. The property is situated on an extensiv..."
"LEASEHOLD ***NO ONWARD CHAIN*** COUNCIL TAX BAND B We are delighted to offer to the market this well presented 2-bedroom terraced house on Lon Enfys in Llansamlet. The property offers a well-adapted layout, offering spacious and comfortable accommodatio..."
Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this recently renovated 3 bedroom middle terraced property. Located in an ever popular and convenient location in Morriston. The current owner has put some high quality flooring in and dimmer switches to mention just some of the recent work carried out. ...
"**REDUCED NOW Guide Price £140,000 TO £150,000****WELL PRESENTED SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY**THREE BEDROOMS**LIVING ROOM**DINING ROOM**KITCHEN**FAMILY BATHROOM**LARGE REAR GARDEN**CLOSE TO LOCAL SHOPS AND AMENITIES**Pinkmove are pleased to present this lovely three bedroom semi-detached prop"
"Council Tax Band - C A Well Proportioned Family Home In Desirable Residential Area. This good sized family home offers fantastic potential for investors and first time buyers alike. Benefiting from a modern kitchen, two great sized reception rooms and two double bedrooms - its ready and..."
"A 3 double bedroom double fronted mid terraced house offered for sale with sit in tenant and no ongoing chain. Situated in Townhill, within walking distance to local shops, schools and public transport links. Please call Peter Alan to arrange a viewing or book 24/7 on our website."
"John Francis is pleased to bring to the market this two bedroom, immaculately presented flat located in the ever popular Runnymede, Sketty. Comprising of one double bedroom at the front of the flat, fitted with wardrobes for plenty of storage space. The second bedroom is a good sized single..."
"A 2 double bedroom second floor apartment offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated in the heart of Swansea City Centre, within walking distance to local shops, public transport links, beach front and restaurants. Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing or book 24/7 online."
"Terraced, Two Bedroom, No Onward Chain."
"Tyron Ash Real Estate are proud to bring to market this 3 bedroom detached family home in Gowerton, Swansea, which is ideal for families or for an investment property"
"Council Tax Band - B John Francis are pleased to bring to the open market this four bedroom detached property located in Landore, Swansea. A perfect investment property or for a first-time-buyer for someone looking to put their own stamp on a property. Situated in perfect locatio..."
"Two bedroom terraced home locatedin the popular location of Portia terrace, Swansea, SA1.
The property location benefits from being close to Swansea Uni, City Centre and easy acces to the M4. The home comprises of living dining room, kitchen and access to the garden all to the ground floor. Firs..."
"With easy access to the local amenities, schools and transport links is this end of terrace property. Two reception rooms, bathroom, kitchen and three bedrooms. Courtyard garden to the front and garden to the rear."
"An extended, three bedroom end of terrace house situated in St.Thomas, Swansea. Accommodation includes, two reception room, kitchen/diner, ground floor bathroom, three bedrooms with bed 1 having ensuite. Externally is paved rear garden. Located close to city centre, ideal first purchase. No chain."
"*VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE* Offered for sale with No Chain the spacious ground floor retirement apartment for over 60's which is within walking distance of all the amenities Sketty has to offer including; shops, doctors surgery, Singleton Park and a short distance from Swansea Bay seafront. ..."
"***Video Tour Available*** A well presented two bedroom semi detached property offered for sale with no onward chain. Ideally located for local schools, Morfa retail park, Swansea.com Stadium, shops and local amenities. Great transport links to Swansea City Centre and the M4. The accommoda..."
"Council Tax Band - B John Francis Sketty is pleased to bring to the market this two bedroom semi-detached property in Fforestfach. This property is perfect for a first-time-buyer or someone looking to get on the property ladder. This property comprises on two double bedrooms, a s..."
"Please call Peter Alan Swansea on to book. A 2 bedroom first floor apartment offered for sale with sit in tenant and no ongoing chain. Situated in a sought after location and within close proximity to local shops, Swansea City centre, public transport links and Morfa Retail park."
"Semi detached property. Two bedrooms. Double glazing and gas central heating. Enclosed rear garden. Cul de sac location. Convenient for access to M4, Hospital, DVLA and shopping in Morriston centre. Ideal first purchase or buy to let. Council tax band A."
"Freehold Council Tax Band: C 360* Virtual Tour Available Online With no upward chain we offer for sale this semi-detached house which benefits from three bedrooms, one reception room, kitchen, utility room, cloakroom and upstairs bathroom. The rear garden gives access..."
"A four bedroom mid-terrace house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated in Port Tennant, Swansea which is conveniently located for all local amenities, Swansea Marina, Swansea City Centre and Swansea University Bay Campus as well as the M4 Corridor. Call Peter Alan to book."
A 3 bedroom mid-terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated within walking distance to Swansea City centre and public transport links. This is an ideal first time or investment opportunity ideal for student accommodation. Call to book.
Council Tax Band - B NO ONWARD CHAIN John Francis are pleased to bring to the market this perfect opportunity for over 55's in this sought after retirement complex. Boasting plenty of living space and prime location with local amenities and shops close by. This property is ...
"End of link property. Three bedrooms. Two reception rooms. Double glazing and gas combination heating. Rear vehicular access and parking. Available with no onward chain. Convenient for access to the M4, hospital and enterprise park. Ideal first purchase or buy to let. Council tax band A."
"Please call Peter Alan Swansea on or arrange a viewing or book 24/7 on our website. A well presented 3 bedroom terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated in Port Tennant and within close proximity to local shops, schools, Swansea university and the M4 corridor."
"SSTC - Still Viewing. Peter Alan are pleased to market this beautifully presented two bedroom flat in the Bryngwyn Village. This flat is close to Gorseinon Town Centre with plenty of amenities such as supermarkets, pubs, shops and Welsh and English Primary and Secondary schools."
"Fantastic opportunity to acquire an apartment that has been a very successful investment property in the ever popular location of Swansea Marina.
Situated in the heart of Swansea Marina and with close proximity to the beach and local amenities.
This second floor apartment offers two double bedroo..."
"Wonderfully presented 2 bed, mid terraced house, located in Brynhyfryd, Swansea. Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hallway Spacious, bright and airy lounge / dining room Modern, well-appointed kitchen with base and wall units Master bedroom Second large..."
"A three bedroom end of terrace house located in Cwmdu, Swansea. Accommodation includes; entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, ground floor bathroom and three bedrooms, with bedroom 3 having an en-suite w.c. Externally the property benefits from a sizeable rear garden. Property requires modernising but ..."
"LEASEHOLD:- Length of Lease:- 99 years from 1995 Ground Rent: to follow Annual Service Charge: to follow Council Tax Band: C 360* Virtual Tour Available Online With no upward chain, we offer for sale, what we consider to be an ideal first time or investment ..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer to the market, with no ongoing chain, this two bedroom, mid terrace property in the popular location of Manselton. Conveniently located close to local amenities, transport links and good access to Swansea City Centre. The property comprises of entrance hallwa..."
"If you're looking for the perfect first time purchase in a convenient location, then look no further! We offer for sale, in our opinion, a delightful, two bedroom, mid-terrace house in Wern Road, Landore. Benefitting from a 23' Lounge/Dining Room with dual aspect windows immersing the room ..."
"A Well Presented Traditional End Terrace - Fab First Time Buy! Located in a popular residential area offering good access to the Liberty Stadium and Parc Morfa retail park. The property has been re-modernised by the current owner, to a good standard and benefits from double glazing, thr..."
A lovely One Bedroom Second Floor Apartment with Balcony by McCarthy and Stone for age group 60 and over in a modern purpose built complex on the edge of Sketty Road bordered with mature trees providing seclusion and privacy. This eye catching superior development is only a short distance from th...
"John Francis are pleased to announce to the market this two bedroom mid-terrace property in Landore that is being offered with NO CHAIN. Comprising of two reception rooms, kitchen, bathroom, two double bedrooms and an attic room - this property is perfet for a first-time-buyer! To the..."
"A well maintained ground floor apartment offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated within close proximity to local shops, public transport links, local surgeries and beach fronts. The property further benefits; communal lounge, communal wash room and communal parking. Viewing recommended!"
"A 3 bedroom mid terraced house offered for sale. Situated within close proximity to local shops, schools and public transport links. This is an ideal firs time or investor opportunity. Please call Peter Alan Swansea on or book 24/7 on our website."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN! An ideal first time buy or investment property! A deceptively spacious mid terrace with a two double bedrooms, two reception rooms and open plan kitchen diner ready for you to move into! To the rear of the property there is a tiered garden with decking areas and p..."
We are proud to offer this Two Bedroom Terraced House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
"A 3 bedroom mid terraced house offered for sale. Situated within close proximity to local shops, public transport links and schools. This is an ideal family home and first time opportunity. Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing on or book 24/7 on our website."
Council Tax Band - B John Francis are pleased to bring to the market this two bedroom mid terrace property situated in the popular area of Manselton. This property boasts potential and will be ideal for first-time buyers or buy-to-let investors. Located in close proximity to Swans...
"** Video tour available** A recently modernised, extended, three bedroom mid terrace house situated in Townhill, Swansea. Accommodation includes; entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, ground floor bathroom and three bedrooms. Externally property benefits from front and rear garden. Sold with no chain. "
"A traditional 3 bedroom mid terraced house offered for sale. Located in the popular residential area of Brynhyfryd. Swansea. The property is situated within close proximity to local shops, public transport links and schools. Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing on ."
"This is a well presented two bedroom end-terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain located in Llansamlet, Swansea. Situated within a two minute drive to the M4 corridor, Morfa retail park, local schools and shops"
"Peter Alan are pleased to market this well presented two bedroom apartment in the Bryngwyn Village. The property is situated close to Gorseinon Town Centre with plenty of amenities such as supermarkets, restaurants, shops and Welsh and English Primary and Secondary schools."
"**NEWLY RENOVATED 3 BEDROOM TERRACE PROPERTY**Get Sold UK are delighted to offer this NEWLY RENOVATED 3 bedroom terrace property which would be an ideal investment or first time buy.The accommodation is as follows: Entrance porch, lounge/diner, open plan new modern kitchen, utility & bathroom. To..."
"A spacious two bedroom end-terraced house offered for sale. Situated within close proximity to Morriston town centre, public transport links, M4 corridor, Morriston hospital and local schools."
"Peter Alan are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £110,000 for Phoebe Road. Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact Peter Alan, 49 Mansell Street, SA1 5SW, before exchange of contracts."
"***Video Tour Available*** A well presented one bedroom retirement apartment on the first floor, located in between the popular areas of Sketty and Uplands. A short walk away from local amenities, doctors surgery, Brynmill Park, great transport links and easy access to Swansea City Centre, Sk..."
"FREEHOLD Council Tax Band: C 360* Virtual Tour Available online. With no upward chain, we offer for sale this three bedroomed family home which would benefit from some modernisation. It is located within walking distance of local shops and local amenities including doctors..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this2 bedroom middle terrace property located in the SA1 - Port Tennant area of Swansea. This mid terraced property is being sold with NO FORWARD CHAIN and the property to the ground floor comprises of entrance hall, lounge, diner, kitchen/breakfast room..."
"We are pleased to able to offer for sale a unique bungalow at Woodland Park in Gowerton. The property consists of three Bedrooms, bathroom, open plan kitchen sitting room. The property is freehold and is on leased land so there is a small monthly charge for the services provided."
"A two bedroom retirement apartment on the second floor in the Convenient location of Sketty with a chemist, post office, supermarket, local amenities, bus stop with good transport links to Swansea City Centre, Singleton Hospital and Mumbles. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hallway, l..."
"Traditional mid terrace property with accommodation arranged over 3 floors. 2 bedrooms. Double glazing and gas combination heating. Rear pedestrian access. Convenient for M4, hospital and shopping in Morriston centre. No onward chain. Ideal first purchase or buy to let. Council tax band B. "
"Council Tax Band - B John Francis is excited to bring to the market this two bedroom, mid terrace property located in the popular Manselton. Downstairs, the property benefits from a large living/dining area, perfect for family life. The kitchen is a fabulous size and has plenty of pot..."
"Immaculate second floor retirement apartment in central and convenient location. One double bedroom. Communal facilities include laundry, lounge and conservatory. Well maintained grounds. Development is gated and secure. Lift Access to all floors. Emergency assistance facilities. Council tax B."
"End of link property. 3 double bedrooms. Double glazing. Gas combination heating. Convenient location for access to the M4, hospital and shopping in Morriston centre . The property requires remedial attention but offers good potential for a buy to let or first purchase. No chain. Council tax band A."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: End of Terrace House Three Bed...
"A well presented ground floor apartment located in the Mariners Court complex for over 55's in SA1. The location is within walking distance to Swansea Marina, City Centre and M4. The accommodation comprises; main entrance with secure voice entry system, hall with storage cupboard, kitc..."
"A well presented home in Morriston, ideal for INVESTORS and FIRST TIME BUYERS. Call for Details!Bettermove are proud to present this 2 bedroom end of terrace house in Morriston available with no forward chain.The property benefits from double glazing, gas central heating througho..."
"AUCTION GUIDE PRICE £110,000 Offered for sale by online Auction. THE BIDDING WILL OPEN ON THE 5TH OF APRIL AT MIDDAY AND WILL CLOSE ON THE 6TH APRIL AT MIDDAY. A three bedroom end terrace property situated within walking distance to Morriston Town which has a range of amenities to includ..."
"This three bedroom mid terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain in Morriston, Swansea. Situated within close proximity to local shops, public transport links and local schools."
"Traditional mid terrace property in central and convenient location. Two bedrooms. Two separate reception rooms. Double glazing. Gas combination central heating. Enclosed rear garden. Convenient location for access to M4, hospital and local shopping. Available with no chain. Council tax band B."
"This property is within proximity of Morriston town with its amenities is this end of terrace home arranged over three floor and with a good sized rear garden. Hallway, living room / diner, breakfast kitchen, bathroom and three bedrooms. Views of surrounding area to the rear. Viewing recommended."
"This three bedroom mid terraced house offered for sale in Clase, Swansea. Situated within close proximity to local shops and morriston hospital, public transport links and schools."
A 2 bedroom end terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain and tenant in situ. Situated within walking distance to Swansea City centre and public transport links. This is an ideal first time buy or investment opportunity. Please call Peter Alan Swansea or book online.
"This spacious and modern two bedroom mid-terraced home situated in Plasmarl, Swansea is located close to local amenities, parks and the M4 motorway and good links to Swansea City Centre and the Mumbles."
"This lovely semi-detached house has much to offer. Located in Swansea, it boasts three bedrooms, two shower rooms and three reception rooms. It is the perfect find for home hunters. Book a viewing to avoid missing out. "
"Three bedroom end terrace home available in the popular location of Trinity Street, Gorseinon, SA4.
The property is in need of renovation and is perfect for someone wanting to put their own stamp on a property in a sought after location.
The area benefits from transport links, local amenities and..."
"Well pesented two double bedroom terraced property, located within the popular location of Neath road, Swansea SA6.
Location benefits from being within close proximity to the M4, local amenities and links to local schools.
The property briefly comprises; entrance, living room, kitchen with access..."
"A Perfect First-Time-Purchase with Expanding Views of Swansea Valley in Elphin Crescent, Townhill. This property is offered with No Chain, making it perfect for those who are looking for a QUICK SALE!! This three double bedroom end-of-terrace property boosts potential and is ideal for t..."
"The Property:-
PurpleBricks is pleased to offer for sale this Level 2, ‘Studio’ apartment located in a vibrant area of SA1 Waterfront, Swansea. The property is within close proximity to local restaurants, bars & shops whilst also convenient for the University Bay Campus, Trinity St. David Campus,..."
"A rare opportunity to acquire a first floor apartment situated in a convenient location. Two double bedrooms. Double glazing and gas combination heating. Level garden to rear. Driveway and garage. Convenient location for access to M4, hospital, DVLA and shopping in Morriston centre. No chain."
"CASH BUYERS ONLY
One bedroom apartment now available in the popular location of Belleisle apartments, Phoebe Road.
Situated in the sought-after Copper Quarter, the location benefits from close proximity to local amenities, great transport links and close to Morfa retail park.
The property compris..."
"A modern upper floor Riverside Apartment located within the Copper Quarter, Swansea. Accommodation includes: entrance hallway, bathroom, open lounge with modern kitchen and bedroom. The property enjoys lift access, beautiful river views, a sit out balcony and allocated parking. The property is wi..."
"Two bedroom first floor modern apartment in the sought after location of Copper Quarter. With easy access to Swansea City Centre, a main cycle and bus route, this apartment is ideal for commuters. Investment Opportunity, cash buyers preferred. There is no onward chain with this apartment."
"Council Tax Band - C A bright and well-presented one bedroom apartment, situated on the second floor of a characteristic, purpose built development just moments from Swansea City Centre. This beautiful property is offered with no upward chain and is ready to move in to. In our opinion ..."
"This traditional three bedroom mid terraced property located in the Mount Pleasant area of Swansea which offers convenient access to Swansea City Centre, Swansea Train Centre and local nearby schools. To arrange a viewing please contact Peter Alan Swansea or book 24/7 on our website."
Auction Property | Building Plot | Detached Dwelling | Close Links To The M4 Corridor | Popular Area | Short Drive to Morfa and Swansea City Centre 
"A well presented 1 bedroom apartment offered for sale with no ongoing chain and sit in tenant. Situated within walking distance to Swansea City Centre, local shops, beach front and marina. This is an ideal investment opportunity. Please call Peter Alan Swansea or book online to arrange a viewing."
"A three bedroom terrace property situated close to the City Centre and within easy reach to the M4. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge, dining area and kitchen. On the first floor you will find three bedrooms and a bathroom. EPC Rating - F."
"FREEHOLD Council Tax Band: B No Onward Chain. Sold As Seen. Floor Plan to follow. Set in the village of Gorseinon and within walking distance of local amenities, including schools, college, shops, public houses and restaurants, we offer for sale this..."
"Peter Alan are pleased to market this one bedroom flat in the Bryngwyn Village. This flat is close to Gorseinon Town Centre with plenty of amenities such as supermarkets, pubs, shops and Welsh and English Primary and Secondary schools."
"Offered with no ongoing chain is this immaculately presented ground floor studio apartment in the ever so popular SA1 waterfront location. Benefiting from an open plan living space, modern bathroom, secured underground parking and lift access. Conveniently located nearby Swansea University and..."
"A 3 bedroom mid-terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated within walking distance to Swansea town centre, local shops, public transport and Swansea beach front. his is an ideal investment opportunity with potential to improve. Please call Peter Alan to book a viewing."
"*360 Virtual Tour Available* A Well Presented Upper floor Flat situated in the heart of Morriston. This property is ideal located within walking distance to Morriston's high street, which boost local amenities, pubs, restaurants, health centres and shops. This property is perfect..."
"LEASEHOLD: Ground Rent £425 pa Service Charge £2600 pa Lease Term 125 years from 01 April 2007 Council Tax Band: C 360* Virtual Tour Online Set within the popular Retirement Apartments, purpose built by McCarthey & Stone within Gorseinon..."
"360* Virtual Tour Available Online. Set on the outskirts of Swansea City Centre and conveniently located with just a short walk to all the local amenities, including schools, Health Centre, shops & Local Parks. We offer for sale this chain free, three bedroom semi detached house with e..."
"This two bedroom property is situated in the heart of Morriston. Located just minutes away from the busy shopping centre with many local amenities including shops, schools and also offering great links to Morriston Hospital, DVLA, M4 motorway and public transport."
TENANT IN SITU | Cash Buyers Only! | Investment Opportunity | Private Balcony | Allocated Parking | Leasehold | Council Tax Band - C | EPC - C | Close to Morfa Retail Park | Open-Plan Kitchen/Living Area
"This three bedroom semi-detached house offered for sale with no ongoing chain located in Llansamlet, Swansea. Situated within close proximity to M4 corridor, local shops and local schools."
"Guide Price £80,000 - £90,000 - Offered for sale by online Auction. THE BIDDING WILL OPEN ON THE 5TH OF APRIL AT MIDDAY AND WILL CLOSE ON THE 6TH APRIL AT MIDDAY. A five bedroom terrace property located in the area of Mount Pleasant. Located conveniently for all amenities and within walk..."
"Please call Peter Alan Swansea on or book 247/7 on our website. An immaculately presented, rare 1 bedroom bungalow offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated within close proximity to local shops and public transport links. Viewing is highly recommended to appreciate."
"A two bedroom mid terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated within walking distance to Morriston town, public transport links, Morriston hospital and the M4 corridor. Viewing is recommended."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN PUBLIC NOTICE - 90 Gellifawr Road, Morriston, Swansea, SA6 7PW - We have received an offer of £ 101,000.00. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts takes place. EPC Rating () Please log i..."
"Please contact Peter Alan Swansea to book a viewing. A modern style one bedroom apartment offered for sale with sit in tenant. Situated in the popular Copper Quarter Development which offers superb river views and is convenient for Morfa Retail Park, Swansea City Centre and the M4 corridor."
"***Freehold bought on completion*** ****Cash Only Buy****** This semi-detached two bed mid-terraced is situated in Morriston, Swansea. The property location means it is convenient for the City Centre, Morriston hospital and the M4 Motorway. The property will become a Freehold upon completion."
"Peter Alan are pleased to market this ground floor two bedroom flat in the Bryngwyn Village. This flat is close to Gorseinon Town Centre with plenty of amenities such as supermarkets, pubs, shops and Welsh and English Primary and Secondary schools."
"*** Video tour available *** A second floor one bedroom retirement apartment (over 60's) ideally located within walking distance to Sketty including local amenities, doctors surgery, Singleton Park and a short distance from Swansea Bay seafront. The accommodation comprises of an hall, storage..."
"This apartment is ideally situated in a purpose built over 55's development in trhe centre of Gorseinon with extremely convenient access to amenities including a handy Supermarket, Post Office and coffee shops, with its own designated car park at the front of the development. The building its..."
LEASEHOLD: Ground Rent £250 pa Service Charge £2000 pa Lease Term 125 years from 01 January 2009 Council Tax Band: C 360* Virtual Tour Available Online. With no upward chain we offer for sale what is in our opinion an ideal first time or investm...
"NO FORWARD CHAIN!
CHECK THIS GREAT APARTMENT OUT VIA OUR PROFESSIONAL ""MATTERPORT 360"" WALK THROUGH TOUR!
DON'T DELAY BOOK DOWN LOAD OUR APP TODAY 24/7 !
Viewing is recommended If you are looking for a modern home with great access to the city centre.
Great opportunity for first time buyers to wa..."
"A 3 bedroom mid-terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated within close proximity to local shops, public transport links and schools. Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing or book 24/7 on our website."
A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT LOCATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR Cwrt Hywel was built by McCarthy & Stone and is conveniently located in the heart of Gorseinon for the many local shops and amenities. The Development consists of 53 apartments arranged over three floors each served by a lift. Th...
"Property Address:32 Waun Wen Terrace We advise that an offer has been made for the above property in the sum of £60,000. Any persons wishing to increase on this offer should notify the agents of their best offer prior to exchange of contracts. Agents Address:49 Mansel Street, SA1 5SW."
"A two bedroom detached park home situated along Oak Drive in this popular and sought after retirement development of Woodland Park in the heart of Waunarlwydd approximately 4 miles from the City centre of Swansea. The accommodation comprises a good size light and airy lounge, fitted kitchen,..."
A SECOND FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT Maxime Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 54 properties arranged over 5 floors served by a lift. The Resident Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in the event o...
"*** VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE *** A ground floor retirement apartment (over 60's) within walking distance of all the amenities Sketty has to offer including doctors surgery, local shops, Singleton Park and a short distance from Swansea Bay seafront. With good transports links to uplands and Swans..."
A well maintained 1 bedroom ground floor apartment offered for sale with no ongoing chain. Situated in Sketty a desirable area and sought after for it's walking distance to local shops and public transport links. This is an ideal retirement or down size opportunity. Please call Peter Alan Swansea.
**Ideal Investment Opportunity * In Need Of Modernisation * Two Bedroom Detached House * Swansea Centre Location** We are pleased offer to market the opportunity to purchase this two bedroom detached property located in the heart of Swansea. The property is being sold via the modern method of auctio
"NOTICE OF OFFER: 109 Heol Frank, Penlan, Swansea, SA5 7AH. We advise that an offer has been made for the above property in the sum of £62,500. Any persons wishing to increase on this offer should notify the agents of their best offer prior to exchange of contracts. A chain free three bedro..."
"We are proud to present this One Bedroom Retirement Flat – OFFERS OVER £70,000"
"A one bedroom ground floor retirement apartment with rear doors opening to the communal gardens. The benefits of Home Gower house include; resident management staff, lift, communal lounge, gardens, laundry, guest facilities and residents and visitors parking. Conveniently located very close t..."
"A ONE BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT OVERLOOKING FRONT OF DEVELOPMENT Homegower House has three local GP surgeries along St Helens Road, bus stop outside which takes 5 minutes into the city centre or about a 10-minute walk. Other Local convenience stores in walking distance: post offi..."
"We are pleased to bring to the market this one bedroom ground floor studio flat located in prime location near Uplands! Comprising of one bedroom, one bathroom with shower unit, kitchen and toilette - this property is a perfect buy-to-let investment! Located in close proximi..."
"A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE GROUND FLOOR WITH PATIO DOOR TO PATIO AREA. Homegower House has three local GP surgeries along St Helens Road, bus stop outside which takes 5 minutes into the city centre or about a 10-minute walk. Other Local convenience stores in walking dista..."
"A 3rd floor city centre retirement apartment located within the Popular Home Gower House Complex, Swansea. Accommodation includes: entrance hallway, lounge dining room, kitchen and shower room. The property over looks the communal gardens and has economy seven electrical heating. The block has a ..."
"For sale on a 70/30 shared ownership with Pobl, a first floor one bedroom retirement apartment, enjoying a popular location with good shopping facilities around which includes post office, supermarket, chemist and with great links and bus routes to the City Centre, Mumbles and Gower. The acco..."
"Council Tax Band - D John Francis are pleased to bring to the market this one bedroom retirement flat at Homegower House. Located on the ground floor and comprising of a large living area, modern kitchen, large double bedroom, accessible bathroom and access to the communal gardens, th..."
"***For sale by auction on 18th April 2023*** A 3 bedroom mid terraced house offered for sale with no ongoing chain, situated in Bonymaen and within close proximity to local shops, public transport links and schools. Please call Peter Alan Swansea to arrange a viewing or book 24/7 online."
"A one bedroom third floor retirement apartment overlooking the rear gardens from the lounge. The apartment comprises of an entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, bedroom and a shower room. The benefits of Home Gower house include; resident management staff, lift, communal lounge, gardens, laun..."
"AUCTION SALE 18 April 2023 - Three bed mid terraced house situated in Bonymaen and within close proximity to local shops, public transport links and schools."
"We offer for sale this two bedroom detached Park Home having the benefit of a single detached garage with private enclosed garden. Situated in a popular and convenient location of Waunarlwydd the accommodation comprises lounge, kitchen, bathroom and two bedrooms. Other benefits include double g..."
"AVAILABLE AT £45,000 - Leasehold ground floor flat,TO SELL YOUR PROPERTY IN OUR NEXT AUCTION CALL US NOW"
"VERY LENGTHY LEASEHOLD: A large strip of woodland located within Dunvant, runs parallel to local cycle track/Walter Row/Garrod Avenue. The land is of long leasehold title (further details on request). Currently Green Belt Land under the current Local Development Plan. land area c3.5acres"
An opportunity to purchase a piece of land for a possible allotment situated on the popular development of Parc Brynheulog. Buyers to pay sellers costs.
Located in the very much sought after residential area of garden village close to wat’s dyke primary school is this very well proportioned semi-detached bungalow which occupies an extremely generous plot size. The dwelling does require some updating with huge scope to extend. this howeve...
"Set within an exclusive development of 6 individually designed properties, this is an impressively spacious and well presented 4 bedroom, 2 bathroom detached property that must be viewed to be fully appreciated. This exemplary family home offers stylishly presented and superbly appointed living a..."
Offering superb accommodation is this spacious and extended 5 bedroom detached family home enjoying a lovely position on this sought after development close to Erddig National Trust Parkland having a good sized private rear garden adjoining playing fields. The accommodation has many impressive fe...
Presented in immaculate condition is this spacious 4/5 bedroom detached family home on a corner plot overlooking the green within the highly sought after area known as Green Park adjoining the picturesque National Trust Parkland of Erddig. With both primary and secondary schools within walking di...
"Retaining a wealth of architectural features, this five bedroom and three bathroom detached family residence has been skillfully extended in previous years to encompass an impressive recreation room and hub of the house kitchen area with open plan dining area and utility off as well as retaining ..."
""" VIEWING IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED"" We are DELIGHTED TO OFFER FOR SALE this BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED Four/ Five Bedroom Detached Family Home with off road parking, garage, good sized garden to the rear with Garden Room. Situated in a highly sought after location within walking distance of the pictu..."
"Reid and Roberts Estate Agents are absolutely delighted to offer this Extended Four Bedroom Detached Family Home located in the sought after area of Garden Village. The Property offers versatile accommodation to comprise of Entrance Hallway, Downstairs WC, Modern Fitted Kitchen/Diner, L..."
AN IMMACULATELY PRESENTED UPGRADED AND EXTENDED DETACHED FOUR BEDROOM / TWO BATHROOM BUNGALOW IN A SOUGHT AFTER CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION BY ACTON PARK ON THE CHESTER SIDE OF TOWN. EPC RATING - 55|D.
"Welcome to 29 St. Mellion crescent, a well presented fully renovated 4 bedroom detached property. Situated in the popular and residential estate of the Fairways. Only a short drive onto the A483, connecting the property to Chester, Oswestry, North Wales and beyond. Additionally the property is only"
"Beautiful 4 bedroom detached family sized house located in the desirable Coed Y Glyn area on the outskirts of the City of Wrexham. As you enter the property, you will be impressed by the large open hallway and spacious lounge that provides a comfortable and welcoming environment. The dining kitch..."
An immaculately presented 4 bedroom detached family home with detached double garage offering spacious accommodation located in the sought after area of Garden Village within a small select development of just 2 other similar properties. Enjoying views towards Minera mountain from the rear and ad...
NO CHAIN - AN INDIVIDUAL DETACHED RESIDENCE PROVIDING SPACIOUS (1862 SQ.FT.) TWO RECEPTION / FIVE BEDROOM ACCOMMODATION STANDING IN A CUL-DE-SAC IN A SOUGHT AFTER RESIDENTIAL LOCATION CONTAINING A MIX OF PROPERTY TYPES BY ACTON PARK. EPC RATING - 61|D.
An immaculately presented 4 bedroom detached family home with spacious conservatory overlooking the south facing rear garden located within the highly sought development of Coed y Glyn within walking distance of the picturesque Erddig National Trust Parkland and both Primary and Secondary Schools...
"**WOW! WHAT AN OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A SUBSTANTIAL FAMILY HOME WITH EARNING POTENTIAL OF 2 MAISONETTES BOTH INDIVIDUALLY REGISTERED AND CURRENTLY HAVE TENANTS IN SITUE WITH A MONTHLY RENTAL INCOME OF OVER £1000 BETWEEN THEM BOTH** This superb, individually designed family home offers impres..."
"DESCRIPTION: An opportunity to purchase this large 4 bedroom detached bungalow which is situated in this much favoured and sought after location. The property has versatile and adaptable family living accommodation to briefly comprise entrance porch, entrance hall, cloakroom, inner hall, master b..."
"Welcome to this beautiful 3 storey family home, set in the private development of Howards Field, close to Erddig Hall and the National Trust Estate. This detached home has 5 bedrooms, and benefits from 2 ensuites and a fantastic double garage with parking to the rear. Well presented thr..."
"Located in the highly desirable sought after suburb of Wrexham is this detached dormer-bungalow which sits on a generous, sized plot in an enviable elevated position at the top of Snowdon Drive, having a significant well sized rear garden enjoying a lovely sunny aspect. In brief, the property com..."
"A unique opportunity to purchase a spacious 3 bedroom detached bungalow with attic room set within large gardens of approximately 0.3 acres that includes ample parking and 3 garages. Located in the convenient and popular Borras area with its excellent link roads, shops, schools and picturesque pu..."
"An immaculately presented four double bedroom detached family home set within the popular residential development known as The Fairways. With spacious flexible living spaces , modern en-suite and bathroom and beautiful gardens and garage, this property would be ideal for the growing family."
"**** REDUCED BY MOTIVATED SELLER ***** Reid and Roberts Estate and Letting Agents are delighted to offer this Spacious Five Bedroom Victorian, Semi-detached Family Home, situated close to the City Centre within the Erddig District Conservation Area. Local amenities include St. Giles Prim..."
"A traditionally built four bedroom DETACHED home with INTEGRAL GARAGE offering an entrance hall, lounge, cloakroom and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER with UTILITY and FRENCH DOORS doors leading to the FULLY TURFED REAR GARDEN. Including a 10 YEAR NHBC WARRANTY for complete peace of mind. "
"A superbly presented and spacious 3 double bedroom detached bungalow with en-suite bathroom and partial far reaching views that has been recently renovated to an excellent standard by the current owner. Situated in the sought after area of Acton, close to a wide range of amenities, bus service an..."
"A traditionally built four bedroom DETACHED home offering an entrance hall, lounge, cloakroom and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER with UTILITY and FRENCH DOORS doors leading to the FULLY TURFED REAR GARDEN. Including a 10 YEAR NHBC WARRANTY for complete peace of mind. "
"A modern four bedroom detached family house (main bedroom en-suite) situated on the fringe of the City close to the parkland surrounding Erddig National Trust. The property is fully double glazed and gas centrally heated from a modern boiler, whilst to the rear the accommodation has been extende..."
"Newly refurbished to an impressive standard is this beautifully presented 3 bedroom detached bungalow with garage located in the sought after area known as Ty Gwyn with its excellent range of amenities including the nearby Wrexham to Chester bus service. With views towards the green, the bungalow..."
"Situated in this popular and sought location is this spacious extended 4 bedroom semi detached bungalow which stands in a large corner plot with living accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall, fitted kitchen/breakfast room with integrated appliances, lounge, inner hall, master bedroom wit..."
"A spacious 3 bedroom detached house with the benefit of a south facing garden, located in the popular and established residential development within walking distance of Chester Road and the frequent bus service into Wrexham and Chester. The property includes gas fired central heating and Upvc dou..."
"An individual, superbly appointed, four bedroom and three bathroom detached family residence sitting on a large corner plot having ample parking (for five cars) together with an over-sized detached brick garage within this sought after development of only three houses. The property is situated a..."
"***EXCELLENT CONDITION***A MUST VIEW*** Reid and Roberts Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this beautifully presented Three Bedroom Detached Family Home, situated within walking distance to Wrexham 'City' Centre. The property has been well maintained and improved by..."
"A four bedroom detached house standing in a good sized corner plot in the highly sought after Garden Village area of Wrexham. With excellent potential to modernise the interior, the property is offered for sale with No Onward Chain. EPC Rating - 57|D."
"Virtual Tour Available In a quiet cul-de-sac on the popular Goulbourn development in Borras, a three bedroom detached bungalow which has been subject to extensive refurbishment within the last 12 months. The internal specification briefly comprises: living room, kitchen/diner, the bedrooms, fa..."
"A superb opportunity to purchase this substantial 4 bedroom detached family home with 3 reception rooms located within the highly regarded area known as Garden Village with its excellent range of convenient amenities, schools, bus service and road links. Positioned on a corner plot, the property ..."
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a bay window fronted 3 bedroom detached home with garage located within the highly sought after area of Garden Village that has the benefits of local amenities, frequent bus service to Wrexham or Chester, Schools and good road links. Having retained some perio..."
"Before leaving for countryside on the Bersham Road approximately a mile from Wrexham town centre is The Homestead, a cul-de-sac largely of detached bungalows. Wrexham has a wealth of shops ,schools and local amenities, an excellent bus service to local areas and beyond, a railway station and..."
"Welcome to 79 Box Lane, a well presented 3 bedroom semi-detached property situated on the popular residential location of Acton. Only a stones throw from the highly rated Acton primary school in addition only a short walk to Acton park, where an endless amount of walks can be found and is the perfec"
"NO CHAIN - A CONVENIENTLY SITUATED GRADE TWO LISTED SEMI-DETACHED RESIDENCE PROVIDING WELL PROPORTIONED ACCOMMODATION OF CONSIDERABLE CHARACTER EXTENDING TO APPROXIMATELY 1830 SQUARE FEET (170 SQUARE METRES) WITH TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, FOUR PIECE BATHROOM, TWO CLOAKROOMS, GAR..."
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a good sized four bedroom detached property situated in a sought after location. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, dining room, conservatory, downstairs W/C and utility room on the ground floor, with four bedrooms and bathroom on the firs..."
There are very few more attractive views than a tree lined avenue with attractive and mature residential dwellings on either side and possibly why the location of this property is in one of the most admired and sought after residential...
""" VIEWING IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED"" We are DELIGHTED to Offer FOR SALE this BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED AND SPACIOUS Three/ Four Bedroom Detached Family Home which offers GENEROUS Family Living Accommodation to briefly comprise Entrance Porch, Entrance Hall, Dining Room/ Bedroom Four, Lounge, Fitted K..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a five bedroom semi detached house situated in a sought residential location in Wrexham. The spacious internal accommodation comprises an entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, downstairs w.c, dining room, conservatory to the ground floor, three bedrooms and bath to t..."
"Reid and Roberts Estate and Letting Agents are delighted to offer this beautiful Four Bedroom Detached Family Home with the added benefit of a Detached Two-Storey Garage/Office Building known as ""The Coach House"". The property is situated on Saxon Street which is just a few minutes work from both..."
"Situated close to the very popular and sought after Erddig area of Wrexham is this 5 bedroom, detached, family home. Whilst the property is in need of some updating it is rare to find such a large property in this area and has the potential to make an excellent family home for many years to come...."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase an extended three bedroom detached house situated in a sought after residential location in Wrexham. The internal accommodation comprises an entrance porch, hallway, lounge, kitchen/breakfast room, dining room open plan into a family room, three bedrooms and a ..."
"Located in a sought after suburb of Wrexham, this deceptively spacious three bedroom detached bungalow enjoys the benefit of gas fired central heating, double glazing and detached garage. It is located within walking distance of good local facilities including shops, veterinary surgery and school..."
Reid and Roberts Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this Immaculately Presented Spacious Three Bedroom/Four Bedroom Detached Family Home situated in the popular and sought after location of Little Acton. The property has undergone renovation throughout and briefly compri...
Reid and Robrets are delighted to offer to the market this Immaculately Presented Four Bedroom Detached Family Home situated in a popular and sought after residential area. Epsom Way is located in a much favoured residential area approximately 1 ½ miles from the town centre and on the e...
"""VIEWED HIGHLY RECOMMENDED"" A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED Four Bedroom Link detached property located within a popular residential area in Wrexham. This superb family home offers beautifully appointed living accommodation throughout . The Property is ideally situated close to Wrexham City Centre a..."
"Located on one of the most respected and sought after residential areas in Wrexham, this extended property has more than its fair share of kerb appeal as well as many original internal features that offer both character and charm. "
"A fabulous, spacious, family home, sitting on an elevated plot in a highly favoured residential area, boasting three separate reception rooms and four ""double bedrooms"". "
"A fantastic example of a detached, luxuriously appointed, three bedroom, bungalow in a favoured residential area within walking distance of the National Trust Parkland of Erddig. "
A beautifully presented and extended 3-4 bedroom detached dormer bungalow with garage enjoying a pleasant aspect overlooking the green located within the sought after area of Borras with its good range of amenities including Acton Park and primary and secondary schools. The accommodation has been...
"A detached, elegantly positioned, bungalow that has waves of kerb appeal offering an attractive corner plot with single detached garage."
Reid and Roberts Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this Immaculately Presented Four Bedroom Three Storey Town House situated in a popular residential area within walking distance of Wrexham City Centre. This Deceptively Spacious Property offers accommodation to briefly c...
"NO CHAIN - A THOROUGHLY RENOVATED, IMMACULATELY PRESENTED, PRE WAR STYLE BAY FRONTED SEMI PROVIDING THEE RECEPTION ROOM / THREE BEDROOM FAMILY ACCOMMODATION IN A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA OFF CHESTER ROAD LESS THAN A MILE ON LEVEL GROUND FROM THE CITY CENTRE AND ALL AMENITIES. EPC RATING - AWAITED."
"AN EXTENDED BAY FRONTED SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, THREE BEDROOMS, TWO BATHROOMS, DOUBLE DRIVE AND OVER-SIZE GARAGE IN A SOUGHT AFTER RESIDENTIAL LOCATION OFF CHESTER ROAD WITH WESTERLY FACING REAR GARDEN ENJOYING VIEWS OVER THE TOWN TOWARDS MINERA MOUNTAIN."
"A brilliant opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented, extended three bedroom semi detached property situated in the sought after Acton area of Wrexham. The stylish internal accommodation comprises an entrance hall, two reception rooms, conservatory, modern kitchen, three bedrooms and a bat..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented and extended three bedroom semi detached house situated on a favoured residential street in the sought after Garden Village area of Wrexham. The internal accommodation comprises a spacious ground floor with a welcoming entrance hall, lou..."
A three storey four bedroom detached family home within this popular modern residential development on the outskirts of Wrexham town centre enjoying a lovely position along a private road. The well presented accommodation briefly comprises a part glazed entrance door to hallway with central stair...
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a spacious three bedroom detached property in a sought after village location on the outskirts of Wrexham town. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge/diner, kitchen, reception room, utility, and cloakroom on the ground floor, with three bedrooms and ba..."
"A spacious 4 bedroom detached dormer bungalow situated within a popular residential area close to Wrexham city centre. This excellent property offers a spacious lounge, 2 bedrooms to the ground floor and 2 bedrooms to the first floor as well as a double garage and ample off road parking. Located..."
"TOWN AND COUNTRY ARE PROUD TO PRESENT THIS: Well presented three bedroom apartment set in a convenient location close to Wrexham town centre. The property comprises; entrance hall, open plan lounge/diner/kitchen, three bedrooms, one en-suite and bathroom internally, with balcony and patio area ex..."
NO CHAIN - A MODERN DETACHED TWO / THREE BEDROOM / TWO BATHROOM BUNGALOW OCCUPYING A CORNER PLOT ON THE FRINGE OF THE CITY CLOSE TO OPEN COUNTRYSIDE. EPC RATING - 60|D.
"Situated in a desirable and sought after area, close to Wrexham City Centre is this beautifully presented and deceptively large Georgian style 4 bedroom family home. Accommodation briefly comprises; entrance hall, 3 receptions rooms, kitchen, utility, basement, 4 good sized bedrooms and 2 bathr..."
"Situated in a much sought after and favoured location is this substantial period semi-detached property which has family living accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall, sitting room, lounge, fitted kitchen/diner with feature glazed vaulted ceiling and to the first floor there are 3 bedroo..."
FAMILY SIZED HOME IN BORRAS. Are you looking for a 4 bedroom detached home in a popular location? This could be the one for you. Situated at the head of a small cul de sac just off Norfolk Road. The property also has plenty of parking and a good sized rear garden.
"A deceptively spacious three bedroom detached bungalow situated in the sought after village of Borras. The property comprises; entrance porch/hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner, conservatory, three bedrooms, en-suite and wet room internally. Externally is a good sized driveway leading to a single gar..."
"A brilliant opportunity to purchase a four bedroom detached property situated in a cul de sac location in the Borras area of Wrexham. The internal accommodation comprises an entrance hallway, w.c, lounge, dining room, kitchen, four bedrooms and family bathroom. Externally there is an attractive r..."
"An extended and superbly presented 3 bedroom detached house with garden /sitting room, double garage and sauna. Located within a popular residential development just a short distance from Chester Road and both primary and secondary schools, the accommodation briefly comprises an open fronted porc..."
"A great opportunity to purchase a spacious and well presented three bedroom detached property situated in a sought after village location on the Chester side of Wrexham. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen and cloakroom on the ground floor, with three bedrooms and ..."
"A generously sized three bedroom detached bungalow located within the popular residential area of Rhosddu, being in close proximity to Wrexham town. Benefitting from gas central heating and UPVC double glazing, the property briefly comprises; entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, three bedrooms and bat..."
"Located within popular residential area of Borras is this very well presented two bedroom detached bungalow refurbished in 2013 to include re-wiring, new central heating system with Worcester combination boiler, new bathroom, new kitchen, electric garage door, etc, and is well worthy of inspectio..."
"VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED"" To Appreciate this Beautifully presented and Extended Three Bedroom Detached property in the very sought after area of Acton. The property has UPVC Double Glazed windows, Gas central heating system, Single garage and off road parking. The Accommodation comprises:..."
Set behind double privacy gates is this spacious and well presented 3 bedroom detached bungalow situated in a sought after location within walking distance of the picturesque Acton Park and a parade of shops. The bungalow has the benefit of Upvc double glazing and gas central heating and briefly ...
"A traditionally built three bedroom DETACHED home offering an entrance hall, lounge, cloakroom, MASTER BEDROOM with EN-SUITE and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER with MORNING ROOM and FRENCH DOORS doors leading to the FULLY TURFED REAR GARDEN. Including a 10 YEAR NHBC WARRANTY for complete peace of mind."
"A traditionally built three bedroom DETACHED home offering an entrance hall, lounge, cloakroom, MASTER BEDROOM with EN-SUITE and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER and STUDY with FRENCH DOORS doors leading to the FULLY TURFED REAR GARDEN. Including a 10 YEAR NHBC WARRANTY for complete peace of mind."
"Located within the highly desirable Wrexham suburb of Garden Village, this beautifully presented and extended three bedroom semi-detached home which benefits from gas central heating, UPVC double glazing, and in brief comprises an entrance hall, a through kitchen/diner, cloakroom WC, sitting room..."
"Located in a highly desirable Ty Gwyn part of Wrexham it’s beautifully presented, and well maintained, three bedroom detached bungalow both gas central heating UPVC double glazing and sit in an enviable position, looking out over Cambridge Square. The property at South comprises a vestibule, an e..."
"Situated in a popular and sought after location is this well presented 3 bedroom detached bungalow which has internal accommodation to briefly comprise entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, conservatory, 3 bedrooms and shower room.The accommodation is c..."
"A newly refurbished and spacious 3 bedroom semi detached bay window fronted home with gated private driveway, garage and sunny aspect rear garden. Conveniently located on the fringe of the city centre yet within walking distance of the picturesque Erddig National Trust Parkland, this family home ..."
"An extended four bedroom, semi detached property with three reception rooms and a paved driveway offering off road parking. Located in a very popular and sought residential area, this is a dwelling that does require some updating but has enough internal space to satisfy the requirements of a f..."
"Beresford Adams are proud to bring to the market ... Elmwood, A well-presented 4 Bedroom and 3 bathroom semi-detached ideal family home. Situated in a popular and sought after area with local amenities on your door step easy access to Wrexham town centre and excellent links to main roa..."
"HELP TO BUY AVAILABLE ON THIS PLOT. Traditionally built three bedroom DETACHED home offering an entrance hall, lounge, cloakroom and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER with FULLY INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. FRENCH DOORS doors lead to the FULLY TURFED REAR GARDEN. Including a 10 YEAR NHBC WARRANTY."
"!!!THIS PLOT QUALIFIES FOR HELP TO BUY WALES!!!!A traditionally built three bedroom DETACHED home offering an entrance hall, lounge, cloakroom and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER with FRENCH DOORS doors leading to the FULLY TURFED REAR GARDEN. Including a 10 YEAR NHBC WARRANTY for complete peace of mind."
A superbly presented 3 bedroom detached house with garage and garden room/studio refurbished to an excellent standard blending charming period features with modern day comforts to an include an impressive sociable kitchen dining room with full width sliding patio doors. Conveniently located withi...
"Situated in a popular and sought-after location is this generous size 3 bedroom detached bungalow which has internal living accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall, cloakroom, fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, lounge, side hall, inner hall, 3 double bedrooms and combined bathroom..."
Offering 4 good sized bedrooms is this detached family home with garage located just a short walk to Erddig National Trust Parkland on the outskirts of Wrexham close to a range of amenities and good road links. The accommodation benefits from Upvc double glazing and gas fired central heating and ...
"Situated on a large corner plot towards the end of a small cul-de-sac in the popular residential area of Borras is this well maintained, extended 3 bedroom detached bungalow. Accommodation briefly comprises; entrance hall, living room, kitchen/diner, conservatory, utility area, WC, 3 bedrooms a..."
"A brilliant opportunity to purchase a detached home with easy access to Wrexham and Chester! This Three Bed detached property would be a fantastic family home or first-time buy! The property briefly comprises an Entrance Porch, an Open plan Living room/Dining room, Kitchen, Conservatory, Three..."
"Beresford Adams are delighted to market this spacious 3/4 bedroom semi-detached family home. This semi-detached dormer bungalow is located in the popular residential area of Wrexham, Garden Village. Ffordd Estyn has a wealth of amenities on its door step including a Local convenient ..."
"A fantastically renovated bungalow that you can move into without changing a thing! This beautiful 2 bedroom detached TRUE Bungalow has been renovated to a high standard over the last year and sits in Borras, with easy commuting links to Wrexham City Centre and Chester! The property briefly comp..."
"A traditionally built three bedroom DETACHED home offering an entrance hall, lounge, cloakroom and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER with FRENCH DOORS doors leading to the FULLY TURFED REAR GARDEN. Including a 10 YEAR NHBC WARRANTY for complete peace of mind."
"Located in the sought after residential district of Borras is this link detached three bedroom bungalow enjoying a larger than average corner plot, gas central heating and UPVC double glazing. Borras is located approximately a mile from the centre of Wrexham where there is a wealth of shops,..."
"""VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED"" We are DELIGHTED TO OFFER FOR SALE this BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED and NEWLY BUILT Three Bedroom Semi-Detached property which is set in a POPULAR location with close proximity to Erddig park and Wrexham City Centre. The property comprises; Entrance Hall, Lounge, Kitche..."
Situated in an established part of the town is this mature 4 bedroom detached property which requires a program of refurbishment and stands in a large plot to include a yard and various garages and outbuildings to the rear. The property has internal accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall...
"Welcome to Stables Cottage, a 3 bedroom well presented detached cottage, only a stones throw away from Wrexham town center."
A well presented 3 bedroom semi detached house enjoying a sunny aspect rear garden located within the popular area of Garden Village with its good range of convenient amenities and bus service to Wrexham and Chester. The accommodation has the benefit of gas central heating and Upvc double glazing...
"Welcome to our new property 17 Talbot Road .... Situated on the fringe Wrexham City Centre, a Victorian four bedroom mid-terraced property which is full of character and boasts beautiful secondary glazed stain glass bay windows. The internal specification briefly comprises; a large li..."
Beresford Adams are proud to present to the Market 4 Holyrood Crescent... Situated in the popular and sought after location of Garden Village within easy access of the town centre is this spacious 3 bedroom detached bungalow which occupies a generous size corner plot and has internal a...
"DESCRIPTION: Situated in this popular and convenient location is this impressive 3 bedroom detached family home which has internal living accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall, cloakroom, lounge, fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, dining room which is open plan to garden room an..."
"A well presented 3 bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated in a cul-de-sac location within a popular residential location close to Wrexham city centre. This superb bungalow offers a modern fitted kitchen and bathroom, 3 bedrooms, immaculately maintained gardens and a single garage with electric d..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a 3 bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated within a popular residential location in the desirable area of Garden Village. The property is in need of some modernisation internally but offers wonderful potential with good size rooms, 2 bedrooms to the ground flo..."
"""VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENED"" A brilliant opportunity to purchase a spacious Three Bedroom, Three Reception Room Family Property. Situated in a sought after residential location in the desirable Borras area of Wrexham. The property is conveniently located with a wealth of local amenities within..."
"Situated in a popular and sought after location is this generous size period semi detached property which requires modernisation and has internal accommodation to briefly comprise entrance porch, cloakroom, entrance hall, lounge, sitting room,dining area, fitted kitchen and to the first floor the..."
"A well presented 2 bedroom semi detached bungalow with garage located in the established area of Little Acton just a short walk from Chester Road, convenient shopping facilities and the picturesque Acton Park. The bungalow has the benefit of gas central heating and Upvc double glazing and briefly..."
A spacious three bedroom detached house which has been extended by way of a conservatory overlooking the rear garden. The property is situated in a highly sought after development on the fringes of Borras and benefits from a private rear garden. An early viewing is advised. EPC Rating - 69|C.
"A fabulous, beautifully presented 3 bedroom semi-detached house, located in the very desirable area of Acton. The property benefits from having a contemporary kitchen and bathroom as well as being tastefully decorated throughout. The property briefly comprises: Lounge, Dining Room, Kitchen, Playr..."
"***Opportunity To Enhance*** A Spacious 3 bedroom semi-detached property ideally located within easy access to both Wrexham Industrial Estate and the city centre. The property boasts 2 reception rooms, additional breakfast area and off road parking. The property also benefits from UPVC doub..."
"A well presented 2/3 bedroom semi detached bungalow with garage and good sized conservatory enjoying a private rear garden and excellent private parking. Located within the established and sought after area known as Borras with its good range of amenities and road links, the accommodation has the..."
"Situated in a great location on the Chester side of Wrexham, and finished to a high standard, is this traditional bay fronted and extended 3 bedroom semi detached family home. Accommodation briefly comprises; porch, entrance hall, downstairs WC, living room, large kitchen/diner, 3 bedrooms and..."
"STUNNING SEMI WITH NO CHAIN! Enjoying a quiet set back position along a private pathway which gives access to only a few properties, this stunning semi-detached house is situated just a few minutes from Wrexham City centre. Having modern interior and a spacious feel, internal inspection wil..."
"*** NO CHAIN *** Reid and Roberts Estate and Letting Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this Two Bedroom Detached Bungalow, situated in the popular residential location of Borras. The property benefits from being a corner plot in a sought after cul-de-sac with plentiful local ."
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a three bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated in an established village location. The property comprises; kitchen, lounge, three bedrooms (with potential to utilise one as an additional reception room instead) and family bathroom internally. Externally is ..."
"This detached two bedroom bungalow occupies an elevated corner position, within the desirable Wrexham suburb of Borras, benefitting from gas central heating and UPVC double glazed windows and doors. The property itself in brief comprises; an entrance vestibule, reception hall, lounge/dining room,..."
"Situated in a popular and sought after location is this modern style 3 bedroom semi detached property. The property occupies a generous size corner plot with internal living accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall, lounge, modern fitted kitchen with integrated appliances and to the first ..."
"This very well presented modern 3 bedroom semi detached house, located on the outskirts of Wrexham, is a must-see for anyone seeking a comfortable and stylish home. The property boasts a large lounge/diner that is perfect for family gatherings or entertaining friends, as well as a bright and airy..."
"Location remains one of the most if not the most important considerations of any prospective buyer. This property, which enjoys positive kerb appeal, is located in a highly favoured residential area and although it requires some updating and refurbishment it retains huge potential as very envi..."
A mature three bedroom bay fronted semi-detached house standing within a good size plot. Offered for sale with no onward chain the property offers plenty of potential for internal modernisation to the new owners tastes. Viewing advised. EPC Rating - 46|E.
"NO CHAIN! This impressive 3 bedroom detached house has a modern interior. The property comprises: downstairs WC, kitchen/diner, two double bedrooms and one single bedroom, upstairs bathroom and ensuite off bedroom 1. Externally, the property provides a single detached garage with off road parking..."
"Beresford Adams are proud to present are new property 4 OAKLANDS AVENUE ..... Located in a sought after area of Wrexham, this deceptively spacious two/three bedroom detached bungalow on a large plot enjoys the benefit of gas fired central heating, double glazing, detached garage and is being sol..."
"A superbly presented 2 bedroom semi-detached property situated in a desirable residential location within Garden Village. This excellent property offers a beautifully presented lounge, kitchen/dining room, 2 double bedrooms and an attractive, well maintained rear garden, all of which can only be ..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN - Viewing is highly recommended to appreciate this well presented semi-detached bungalow in the sought after location of Borras. Situated in the cul de sac location, the property offers lounge and conservatory, Modern refitted kitchen and bathroom, 2 bedrooms, driveway, extended..."
"A spacious and extended 2 bedroom semi detached home with cottage style features yet having modern day comforts, located within the highly desirable area of Garden Village having the benefit of a good sized private rear garden. Briefly comprising an enclosed Entrance Porch, hall with stairs to 1s..."
"""VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED"". An immaculately presented 3 bedroom terraced property located in the desirable area of Garden Village on the outskirts of Wrexham Town centre. This well appointed home offers a modern fitted kitchen, ample off road parking and a good size, well maintained rear ga..."
"""VIEWING RECOMMENDED"" We are DELIGHTED to offer this brilliant opportunity to purchase a Two Bedroom Semi Detached Bungalow situated in a POPULAR and SOUGHT AFTER Residential location close to Wrexham town centre. The internal accommodation would benefit from a scheme of modernisation but off..."
'NO CHAIN' to this property. Situated in the sought after residential district of Acton is this very well presented three bedroom semi detached property benefitting from gas central heating and uPVC double glazing. Acton is located approximately a mile from Wrexham town centre whe...
"Welcome to 32 Ffordd Jarvis, a fully decorated and well presented 3 bedroom semi detached property. Situated in a residential location, only a stones throw away from Acton Park and local schools."
"This Victorian mid-terraced property currently operates as fully licensed HMO generating an income of approximately £2,200 per month. Located within easy walking distance of Wrexham city centre and all convenient amenities close at hand. The property benefits from gas central heating and UPVC dou..."
"**VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE** A fantastic opportunity to purchase a 4 bedroom **HMO PROPERTY** located in Acton on the outskirts of Wrexham city centre. This excellent investment property offers four good size bedrooms all to the first floor, well presented open plan kitchen/lounge and single garage..."
A recently remodelled two bedroom semi-detached bungalow with a spacious lounge/diner and kitchen. The loft has recently been converted into a bedroom with an en-suite shower room. Highly sought after location. Viewing advised. EPC Rating - 65|D.
An excellent opportunity to purchase a two bedroom detached bungalow situated on an elevated corner plot located in a popular residential location within the Borras area of Wrexham. The property would benefit from scheme of modernisation and offers potential to create a brilliant home. The intern...
"A modern and very well presented detached house on the popular stansty development near the town centre and good road connections. Having 3 bedrooms, master with en suite, garage and gardens. Conveniently located with local schools, shops and bus services, whilst the Oswestry/Wrexham/Chester lin..."
"A spacious and well presented 3 bedroom semi detached home with garage and private driveway for 3 cars located within walking distance of the city centre. Having the benefit of gas central heating and Upvc double glazing, the accommodation briefly comprises an enclosed entrance porch, hall with s..."
"We are pleased to present this three-bedroom, semi-detached property located in the Welsh city of Wrexham. The property consists of – Living Room, Kitchen/Diner, Water Closet, Bathroom, En-suite, 3 bedrooms. This property is a modern, attractive, semi-detached house with modern ..."
"Set within a popular development on the cusp of Wrexham town and countryside, this three bedroom detached family home which has recently been redecorated and re-carpeted benefits from gas central heating, UPVC double glazing. The property comprises; an entrance hall, lounge, dining room, conserva..."
"An immaculately presented 3 bedroom semi-detached property located on the outskirts of Wrexham town centre. This deceptively spacious and well appointed property offers 2 reception rooms, modern fitted kitchen, a conservatory and well maintained gardens and must be viewed to be fully appreciated...."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN. An excellently presented two bedroom semi-detached bungalow set in a sought after residential location on the Chester side of Wrexham with convenient access to local amenities. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, two bedrooms and bathroom internally. Externall..."
"3 bedroom mews property set on the popular and semi-secluded Farmhouse Mews development on the Goulbourne Estate in Wrexham. The property benefits from NO ONWARD CHAIN, rear garden and off road parking. Conveniently located in the popular area of the Goulbourne with local amenities including scho..."
"This is modern three bedroom terraced property, which is presented to a very high standard, in a convenient location within a small cul-de-sac development, is  ideal for first time buyers or investors. "
A very well presented 2 bedroom semi detached bungalow with detached garage conveniently located within the established residential development of Plas Goulbourne with a good range of shopping amenities and bus service nearby. The bungalow has been recently upgraded and briefly comprises a Upvc d...
"A SPACIOUS, CONTEMPORARY FAMILY HOME conveniently located only MINUTES FROM TOWN CENTRE."
"A well presented 3 bedroom end mews style house situated on this modern popular residential development on the fringe of the city centre close to the Maelor Hospital, Moneypenny and excellent road links. The accommodation briefly comprises an entrance hall with cloaks/w.c. off, lounge with attrac..."
"Situated in a prominent position on this small residential development, close to the centre of Wrexham and the Plas Coch retail park, is this modern, well presented 3 bedroom family home. Accommodation briefly comprises; entrance hall, living room, kitchen/diner, separate WC, 3 bedrooms and fam..."
This is an opportunity to acquire a very well presented much larger than average three double bedroomed semi detached property with more than adequate off road parking and a good sized rear garden. Fenwick Drive is located approximately half a mile from Wrexham town centre where there is a w...
""" VIEWING RECOMMENDED"" This is a great Opportunity to Purchase a Lovely Three Bedroom Semi-detached property located on the outskirts of Wrexham town centre, overlooking the playing fields, A truly lovely location. This well appointed property offers Two reception rooms, Fitted kitchen, garde..."
"Whitegates Estate Agents are pleased to offer this 3 Bedroom Semi Detached House. Benefiting from gas central heating and UPVC double glazing. The property boasts a large rear Conservatory. Kitchen, Lounge and Dining Room. To the first floor there are 3 bedrooms and bathroom. Conveniently locate..."
An impressively spacious and well presented 2 bedroom ground floor apartment being part of an exclusive development within Wrexham city centre. Belmont house was formerly a hotel but has now been converted to high end apartments and must be viewed to be appreciated. The apartment offers spacious ...
Situated in the popular residential area of Rhosnesni on the outskirts of Wrexham is this 3 bedroom semi detached family home. The future owner will likely want to put their own stamp on the property however the property is well presented and ready to move into. Accommodation briefly comprises;...
"Situated in a popular and convenient location is this well presented 3 bedroom town house which offers generous size family living accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall, cloakroom, modern fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, lounge, and to the first floor there is the master bedro..."
An extended three bedroom end-of-terrace property located on the fringe of Wrexham Town Centre and within walking distance of the local amenities including Schools and Medical Centre. Occupying a generous corner plot with off-road parking to front and side together with a large level lawned garde...
"*TO BE SOLD WITH TENANTS IN SITU & HMO LICENCE* A three bedroom mid terraced property situated in a popular and convenient location within close proximity to Wrexham town. The property benefits from a Wrexham Council HMO licence, double glazing, full gas central heating and is fully furnished."
"NEW to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this fantastic three-bedroom semi-detached family residence situated within the sought after location of Rhosddu. This family home offers large and spacious living accommodation. Comprising; entrance hallway, lounge, good sized kitchen with a dining are..."
"This superb 2 bedroom semi detached house, located close to the centre of Wrexham, is a must-see for anyone seeking a comfortable and stylish home. The property boasts a large lounge/diner that is perfect for family gatherings or entertaining friends, as well as a converted attic which could be u..."
"A fantastic opportunity to live in this characterful former brewery. Closed down in the 1980's, the former brewery was converted to a complex of luxury apartments which are perfectly situated near the city centre. Exposed timber beams, sash windows and high ceilings help keep the characte..."
Calling all INVESTORS/ FIRST TIME BUYERS .... Looking for an investment property to rent out/ HMO or looking to put your own stamp on your forever home? Being sold NO CHAIN. 11a Derby road located in an established part of the city is a spacious size 4 bedroom mid terrace property wh...
"NEW to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this delightful three bedroom semi-detached family residence located on the outskirts of Wrexham City Centre. The internal accommodation comprises; entrance hallway, cloakroom, lounge, kitchen/diner, three bedrooms with en-suite to the master bedroom and..."
Situated in the sought after residential district of Acton is this attractively presented and extended three bedroom semi detached property benefitting from gas central heating and UPVC double glazing. Acton is located approximately a mile from the centre of Wrexham where there is a wealth o...
"*NO ONWARD CHAIN* An opportunity to purchase a very well presented two bedroom mews property situated in cul-de-sac with close proximity to Wrexham town. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner and cloakroom on the ground floor, with two bedoroms and bathroom on the first flo..."
"**VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE** A wonderful opportunity to purchase this 4 bedroom **HMO PROPERTY** located in Wrexham city centre. The property offers a fantastic investment opportunity with the annual income when fully occupied being circa £19,500 per annum. The property offers 2 double bedrooms and..."
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase a spacious, well presented first floor apartment within an exclusive development in Wrexham City Centre. The building was formerly a hotel but has now been converted into high end apartments with this particular apartment offering a spacious open plan, lounge/k..."
"FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION 23rd March 2023 at Lion Quays Hotel, Oswestry at 2.00 pm. A deceptively spacious and modern semi-detached bungalow having three bedroom accommodation with living room, dining kitchen and bathroom primarily designed for occupation by a mobility occupier but equally fu..."
"Guide Price £160,000 For sale by unconditional online auction, registration is now open. A two storey building being situated in a prominent position in Wrexham Town Centre, being close to other entertainment venues, for a number of years having traded as a Nightclub venue. The groun..."
"Reid and Roberts Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this Spacious Two Bedroom Mid Terraced Property situated in the popular location of Acton, which is walking distance into Wrexham City Centre and Acton Park. In brief the property comprises ; Entrance Hallway, Lounge, K..."
"*No chain!* A fantastic opportunity to purchase an extended 3/4 bedroom property situated close to Wrexham town, in need of some updating. The property comprises; entrance porch, lounge, kitchen, wet room and an additional reception room which could be utilised a bedroom to the ground floor, with..."
"Conveniently situated less than one mile from Wrexham City Centre, a semi-detached house which has two double bedrooms, a private garden and driveway parking. The internal specification briefly comprises; living room and kitchen/diner to ground floor, two bedrooms and family bathroom to first ..."
"Situated in a popular and convenient location is this 3 bedroom semi detached property which has internal accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall, lounge, fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, side hall, ground floor bathroom and to the first floor there are 3 bedrooms. The accommoda..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this 2 bedroom mews property situated in a popular village location, providing fantastic transport connections to Wrexham Industrial Estate and the A483 bypass. Briefly, the property comprises of a kitchen and lounge area to the ground floor; with two bedrooms ..."
"A fabulous opportunity to purchase a three bedroom end of terrace property situated on the outskirts of Wrexham town, providing excellent connections to the A483 and beyond. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen and bathroom on the ground floor, with three bedrooms a..."
"A three bedroom semi-detached house which has a spacious garden and driveway parking. The internal specification briefly comprises; living room, kitchen/diner, utility and cloakroom to ground floor; three bedrooms and family bathroom to first floor. "
"Attractive two-bedroom modern mid-town house situated in the popular location of Abenbury Fields. The property comprises of driveway, lounge, kitchen/diner, two bedrooms and family bathroom. Benefiting from rear garden with patio area. Close to local amenities and public transport links."
TOWN AND COUNTRY WREXHAM are delighted to bring to the market this spacious 3 bedroom semi detached house which is well presented throughout. Boasting a large kitchen/diner and off road parking the property is situated in a highly popular area and an early viewing is strongly advised. Internally ...
"***TENANT IN SITU - LANDLORDS ONLY!*** A three bedroom mid terrace property situated within walking distance of Wrexham city centre. The property currently has long term tenants in situ and currently achieves £660 pcm. The internal accommodation comprises an entrance hall, two reception rooms, ki..."
A three bedroom semi detached house having the benefit of a larger than expected side and rear garden located on the outskirts of Wrexham town centre. The accommodation has the benefit of upvc double glazing and gas fired central heating and briefly comprises a part glazed entrance door opening t...
"Reid and Roberts are delighted are to offer to the market this Deceptively Spacious Three Bedroom Property ideally located within easy walking distance to the Town Centre and available For Sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The internal living accommodation comprises; Entrance Hallway, Reception..."
"A three bedroom mid terrace property situated in a convenient location on the edge of Wrexham town centre. The internal accommodation comprises a generous lounge, kitchen/diner, three bedrooms and bathroom. Externally there are gardens to the front and rear with a pleasant out look to the front e..."
"Located in a desirable suburb of Wrexham, this well maintained two bedroom townhouse benefits from gas central heating, UPVC double glazing and UPVC facias. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner on the ground floor, with two bedrooms and bathroom on the first floor. To the ..."
"A good sized three bedroom end-terraced property situated within walking distance of Wrexham town, being an ideal first time buy or investment. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge/diner and kitchen on the ground floor, with three bedrooms, bathroom and separate W.C on the first floor. E..."
**LANDLORDS ONLY - THE PROPERTY IS BEING SOLD WITH THE TENANT IN SITU** An investment opportunity to purchase a three bedroom end of terrace property set on a corner plot. The property has long term tenants in situ and currently achieves £675pcm. The internal accommodation comprises an entrance h...
"Ideal investment or first time buyers property. This three bedroom semi-detached property is positioned on a large, enclosed corner plot.  The property does require updating, so gives the buyer an opportunity to put their own stamp on it."
"Presented in good order, this modern purpose-built ground-floor residential apartment is situated just around the corner from the Garden Village shopping parade, Watts Dyke playing field and the bus routes to Wrexham and Chester. The apartment has a spacious living area with fitted kitchen off, w..."
"A much larger than average 2 bedroom home just a 5 minute walk from the centre of Wrexham City Centre There is also the added benefit and rarity of off road parking! The property does require some cosmetic updating, but this would make a great home with fantastic access to all main routes and the..."
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a three bedroom semi-detached property situated in close proximity to Wrexham town, in need of some internal modernisation. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge, kitchen and cloakroom on the ground floor, with three bedrooms and bathroom on the first ..."
"""VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!"" A beautifully presented Two Bedroom apartment situated in a HISTORIC Converted brewery. The Apartment is conveniently located in the heart of Wrexham Town centre which has a wealth of amenities close to hand and also benefits from secure off road parking. This ..."
"Ideally located within the popular Caxton Place development on the fringe of Wrexham town centre within walking distance of all the major shopping facilities and amenities, Bellevue Park, Coleg Cambria, Glyndwr University, Wrexham FC Stadium, Wrexham Maelor hospital, GPs, in addition to the train..."
ATTENTION INVESTORS - TO BE SOLD WITH SITTING TENANTS. This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase this end of terrace which has been converted to two self contained one bedroom flats. 
"Situated close to Wrexham town centre is this three bedroom semi detached property benefitting from off road parking, gas central heating and UPVC double glazing. There are good sized gardens to both the front and rear and plenty of internal storage space. Deva way is located approximately a..."
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a 2 bedroom ground floor apartment with the benefit of a garage conveniently located in the sought after area of Rhosnesni, near to the Acton Park and the convenience of Borras shops. The new owners will also acquire a 25% share of the freehold to maintain a r..."
"A two bedroom, two reception room, two bathroom end of terrace property conveniently situated within walking distance of Wrexham city centre. The internal accommodation comprises an entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, downstairs shower room, two double bedrooms and family bathroom. Exter..."
"Situated in a popular and sought-after location is this well presented first floor apartment which has internal accommodation to briefly comprise communal entrance, entrance hall, lounge/diner, fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, 2 bedrooms and combined bathroom and wc. The accommodation i..."
"Available with No Onward Chain. A bright and spacious TWO BEDROOM lower ground floor apartment located within the purpose-built block with lift access and dedicated secure parking space. The accommodation comprises an entrance hallway with store cupboard, open plan kitchen/lounge/dining room, two..."
"Located on the outskirts of Wrexham City Centre in the residential area of Caia Park is this neatly presented, part modernised 3 bedroom terraced home. The 3 bedrooms have all had new carpet, the bathroom has been updated. The kitchen requires some updating but is perfectly functional. Accommod..."
"Situated in a popular and convenient location is this well presented 2 bedroom mid terraced property which has spacious living accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall, lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, and to the first floor there are 2 bedrooms and combined bathroom and wc. The accomm..."
"Situated in a popular and convenient location is this mature 2 bedroom end terraced property which requires modernisation with internal living accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall, lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, and to the first floor there are 2 bedrooms and combined bathroom an..."
"situated in a popular and convenient location is this generous size first floor apartment which has internal accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall, lounge/diner, fitted kitchen, 2 bedrooms and combined bathroom and wc. The accommodation is complimented by electric heating and double gla..."
"Situated in a popular and convenient location is this well presented 2 bedroom terraced property which has been improved by the present owners to a high standard and has living accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall, lounge, dining area, modern fitted kitchen with integrated appliances a..."
"Available with No Onward Chain and located within the historic Tuttle Street Brewery Building is this one bedroom first floor apartment. With secured gated entry and private parking, the property is ideally situated within the Town Centre and close to local amenities and facilities. The accommoda..."
"Located within this popular modern development on the outskirts of the city centre is this well proportioned 2 bedroom 1st floor apartment with private ground floor entrance, garage and lawned garden. Having a choice of supermarkets, the Maelor Hospital, Moneypenny HQ and Technology Park all wit..."
"LANDLORDS/PROPERTY INVESTORS ALERT.This property is located within easy walking distance of the Town Centre and currently is occupied with long standing and reliable tenants with no arrears. The dwelling has been well maintained, offering very comfortable accommodation, including two be..."
Here's an opportunity to purchase this unique 1 bedroom duplex City centre apartment. The property forms part of a former brewery complex with secure gated access and parking. There's no need to enter the main block with this apartment as it has its own entrance. Call Whitegates to request a view...
"AN EXCELLENT PROPERTY PROSPECT for First Time Buyers or Investors. Located on an attractive tree lined crescent, this mid terrace property displays all the best attributes of a former Council owned property being both well built and enjoying generous room dimensions. Although well cared for, t..."
NO CHAIN - A TWO RECEPTION ROOM / TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM TOWN HOUSE WITH FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM IN A CONVENIENT LOCATION BETWEEN THE CITY CENTRE AND ERDDIG.
"This well presented and updated mid-terrace property boasts a prime location just a stone's throw away from Wrexham city centre, offering easy access to a host of local amenities. With two generously-sized bedrooms and two reception rooms, this property offers ample living space for families, cou..."
"We love this modern apartment, perfect for first time buyers and investors alike! This lovely home offers stylish open plan living space, two double bedrooms, bathroom and hallway. Perfectly located in the heart of Wrexham town close to local facilities and transport links. The apartment is gr..."
"A great opportunity to purchase a deceptively spacious two bedroomed terraced property situated close to Wrexham town centre, stations and hospital with gas central-heating and a toilet to both floors. The property benefits from relatively new: roof; double-glazed windows; and boiler (recently se..."
"In need of some upgrading works, this mid-terrace three bedroom property is an IDEAL FAMILY HOME, offering SPACIOUS accommodation with a surprisingly large, enclosed, rear garden. The property briefly comprises of hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner & w/c, upstairs there are three bedro..."
"BUY TO LET OPPORTUNIY WITH TENANTS IN SITU - A deceptively spacious ground floor apartment which is located within a few minutes from Wrexham town centre. The property has electric heating and double glazed windows and in brief comprises communal entrance, entrance hall, lounge with bay wi..."
A modern Coachman style 2 bedroom 1st floor bedroom apartment with garage below situated on this popular residential development on the outskirts of the city. Briefly comprising a private entrance door with stairs to the 1st floor landing providing access to the Kitchen having a fitted range of b...
"A spacious 3 bedroom semi detached house having the benefit of a private driveway and enclosed rear garden. Located on the fringe of the city centre enjoying good road links to Wrexham, Chester and the Industrial Estate, the accommodation briefly comprises an entrance porch, hall with stairs to 1..."
"Situated in a popular and convenient location is this mature 3 bedroom end terraced property which has internal accommodation to briefly comprise entrance hall, sitting room, lounge, fitted kitchen, rear hall, downstairs bathroom and to the first floor there are 3 bedrooms. The accommodation is c..."
"***TO BE SOLD WITH A SITTING TENANT*** The property briefly comprises of lounge, spacious kitchen/diner and Conservatory. Upstairs there are THREE BEDROOMS, with TWO OF THE BEDROOMS BEING GOOD SIZED ""DOUBLES"" as well as a genuine single bedroom and a family sized bathroom. E..."
"No Onward Chain! Set within easy walking distance of town with all amenities close at hand is this two bedroom end of terrace property, benefitting from gas fired central heating and UPVC double glazing throughout. The internal accommodation in brief comprises; entrance hall, living room, dining ..."
"FIRST TIME BUYERS ALERT !First things first, there is an appreciable amount of work to do to this property but it has offers real potential as a first home with two reception rooms, an upstairs bathroom and two ""double bedrooms"". It also has a rear garden that is approximately 70 feet i..."
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a 2 bedroom terrace property on the outskirts of Wrexham city centre. The property does require modernisation but has superb potential, offering 2 double bedrooms, gas central heating and double glazing. Situated close to the city centre there are an array of ..."
"Ideal investment or first time buyers property, this two bedroom mid terrace property has been improved by the current vendor but does require ""finishing off"" so still gives purchasers an opportunity to put their own stamp on it. "
NO CHAIN - A TWO RECEPTION ROOM / TWO BEDROOM / TWO BATHROOM TERRACED PROPERTY CONVENIENTLY SITUATED BETWEEN THE CITY CENTRE AND ERDDIG. EPC RATING - 60|D. 
"A well presented two bedroom mid terrace property within walking distance of Wrexham city centre. Situated in the heart of the city centre there are an array of amenities close to hand and has excellent access to the A483 for commuting. In brief the property comprises of; lounge, dining room and ..."
"***TO BE SOLD WITH A SITTING TENANT***This spacious internal accommodation briefly comprises; Lounge, Kitchen, Dining Room, Three bedrooms (two doubles) and a family bathroom. Externally the property is set back from the road and has a small front lawned area and a larger e..."
"Beresford Adams are pleased to bring to the market this three bedroom terraced property currently being used as a four bedroom. In breif the property comprises of the following: Lounge/currently used as bedroom 1, sitting room/dining room, kitchen, bathroom to the ground floor. The first flo..."
"A spacious and well presented 2 bedroom first floor apartment conveniently located in the heart of Wrexham City Centre. The apartment offers a well appointed kitchen, en-suite and really must be viewed to be appreciated. Located in the city centre there is an array of local amenities close to han..."
"Reid and Roberts Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market This Two Bedroom Mid Terraced Property Offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The Property in brief comprises; Lounge, Dining Room, Kitchen, Utility area and Downstairs Bathroom. To the first floor there are Two Be..."
"A good sized and well presented two bedroom terraced property situated within close proximity to Wrexham town. The property comprises; entrance, lounge, kitchen/diner on the ground floor, with two bedrooms and shower room on the first floor. Externally are lawned gardens to front and rear. An ide..."
"This 2/3 bedroom terrace with bedroom 3 off bedroom 1. Landlords of this property are presently receiving £625PCM. The property has 2 reception rooms, gas central heating and conveniently located on the outskirts of Wrexham Town Centre in the village of Rhosddu, with schools, shops and bus ..."
"Available CHAIN FREE! Grow Property are delighted to present to the market this traditional three-bedroom terrace property situated within a Five-Minute walk of the Town Centre. The internal accommodation comprises; entrance hallway, lounge/dining room, utility room, fitted kitchen and family ba..."
A well-presented traditional 2 bedroom terrace house with 1st floor bathroom located within walking distance of the city centre and all its amenities. Having the benefit of gas central heating and upvc double glazing the accommodation briefly comprises a Upvc double glazed entrance door opening t...
"OFFERS INVITED! HIGHLY MOTIVATED SELLER! A brilliant opportunity to purchase an exceptional one bedroom apartment located on the second floor of the prestigious Tuttle Street Brewery development. The internal accommodation comprises an entrance hall with two useful storage cupboards, a living/din..."
A semi-detached single-bedroom bungalow in immaculate order and ready to move into. The property has a high energy efficiency rating of a Band C with full double-glazing and central heating to radiators from a gas-fired combination boiler. Externally the property has an enclosed yard. The propert...
CALLING ALL INVESTORS/ FIRST TIME BUYERS .... Beresford Adams are pleased to bring to the market this two-bedroom End-terraced property in an ideal location being walking distance to the Town Centre making all amenities easily accessible. The property in brief comprises of the followin...
"Situated in Wrexham town centre is this attractive two bedroom mid terrace benefitting from gas central heating and UPVC double glazing, a rear yard with garden beyond. Wrexham has a centre of shops, schools and local amenities, a railway station and excellent bus service to all local areas...."
"Attracting all investors, perfect opportunity to purchase this two bedroom terrace property located on the outskirts of the town centre. Very well presented and has been looked after by current tenants who are paying £580 per calendar month and have lived in the property for over 2 years. Viewing..."
Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this one bedroom terraced house which is tucked away on a quiet road on the outskirts of the City. The property is well presented throughout and is an ideal First Time Buy/Investment Purchase. Viewing advised. EPC Rating - 67|D.
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND B We are delighted to offer to the market this pleasant 2-bedroom semi-detached house on Tan y Bryn in Wrexham offering no upward chain. The property presents a well-adapted layout, offering spacious and comfortable accommodation through..."
"DESCRIPTION: Situated in a popular and convenient location is this mature 2 bedroom end terraced property which has accommodation to comprise, entrance hall, dining area, lounge, utility area, fitted kitchen and to the first floor there are 2 bedrooms and combined bathroom and wc. The accommodati..."
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** A spacious 2 bedroom end terrace with the bonus of a large cellar, close to Wrexham Town Centre and the Maelor Hospital, available with NO ONWARD CHAIN and having recently installed a new kitchen and bathroom, this property is perfect for investors and first time buyers...."
"A good sized two bedroom ground floor apartment overlooking Acton Park in need of updating. The property comprises; entrance, lounge, kitchen, two bedrooms and shower room internally , with lawns to front and rear. Offering no onward chain, this property must be viewed! *Leasehold property*"
"Boasting two double bedrooms, this first floor apartment is situated in a popular part of Acton within close proximity of Acton Park. The property is presented to a high standard throughout and benefits from a contemporary kitchen and shower room, as well as a spacious lounge/diner. The property ..."
A well presented two bedroom ground floor apartment of interest to investors currently let at £500 pcm to tenants taking occupation in October 2019. Conveniently located within close proximity to Wrexham City Centre the accommodation briefly comprises a communal entrance hall with secure voice en...
"Located just a short stroll from Wrexham city centre with many convenient amenities close at hand, is this two bedroom mid terrace property benefitting from gas central heating via a gas combination boiler and UPVC double glazing. In brief comprises of living room, dining room, kitchen, rear hall..."
A spacious end terrace property which has been much improved by the current vendor with a newly fitted kitchen & bathroom. The property offers convenient and comfortable accommodation internally and a private garden area to the rear. 
"Lovely two bedroom modern apartment in the popular development of Rivulife, close to the new development of Eagles Meadow in Wrexham Town Centre. The apartment comprises of: two bedrooms, one family bathroom, an open plan kitchen – living area and a good size balcony. The property come..."
"Investment opportunity. Giving the new owner the opportunity to enhance to one's own taste. Overlooking an open green area this end terrace house benefits from 3 bedrooms, ground floor bathroom and off road parking. The property comes with No Onward Chain. Situated within a short driving d..."
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a spacious two bedroom terraced property situated in close proximity to Wrexham town. The property briefly comprises; lounge, dining room, kitchen and bathroom on the ground floor, with two bedrooms on the first floor and a loft room. Externally is courtyard t..."
"Available with No Onward Chain - An excellent opportunity to purchase this superb one bedroom ground floor flat located in the much favoured location of Little Acton. This spacious and fully refurbished property internal living accommodation comprises; entrance hallway, lounge, newly fitted kit..."
"ABC are delighted to offer this one bedroom first floor modern apartment, located within walking distance to the University and Hospital. 
Stairs and lift access to the first floor
This property comprises of large lounge/dining room, fully fitted kitchen, a modern white 4-piece bathroom suit..."
"A mid terraced property with lawned garden to front, located approximately a mile from Wrexham town centre where there is a wealth of shops, schools and local amenities. A regular bus service accesses the town and beyond and all major road links lie nearby, there is also a railway station. T..."
"1 Bedroom PURPOSE BUILT first floor flat with Gas Combi heating and Upvc double glazed. Benefiting from off road parking, good sized lounge and bedroom. Situated on Lorne Street, Rhosddu giving convenient ACCESS to Wrexham Town Centre and Eagles Meadow Shopping and Leisure development. Also withi..."
"Situated a short distance from Wrexham town centre is this first floor apartment benefitting from UPVC double glazing and wall mounted electric convection heaters. Wrexham has a wealth of shops, schools and local amenities, a railway station and excellent bus service to all local areas and b..."
An excellent opportunity to purchase a prime building plot measuring 117 ft x 50 ft in a desirable residential location within easy commuting distance of the town centre with full planning permission (WRR P/2014/0854) was granted on the 2nd January 2015 for a single detached dwelling and off road...
"Situated to the rear of East Avenue , close to the town centre of Wrexham is this insulated single garage, the end one of four with parking available to the front. Wrexham has a wealth of shops, schools and public amenities, a regular bus service and railway station. All major road links lie..."
